THE  CONTRIBUTION  OF  THE  SOCIAL
SCIENCES  TO  THE  ENERGY  CHALLENGE

HEARING

BEFORE THE

SUBCOMMITTEE ON RESEARCH AND

SCIENCE EDUCATION

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND

TECHNOLOGY

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

SEPTEMBER  25,  2007

Serial No. 110–55

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology

(

Available  via  the  World  Wide  Web:  http://www.house.gov/science

37–984PS

WASHINGTON  : 

2007

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

COMMITTEE  ON  SCIENCE  AND  TECHNOLOGY

HON.  BART  GORDON,  Tennessee,  Chairman

JERRY  F.  COSTELLO,  Illinois
EDDIE  BERNICE  JOHNSON,  Texas
LYNN  C.  WOOLSEY,  California
MARK  UDALL,  Colorado
DAVID  WU,  Oregon
BRIAN  BAIRD,  Washington
BRAD  MILLER,  North  Carolina
DANIEL  LIPINSKI,  Illinois
NICK  LAMPSON,  Texas
GABRIELLE  GIFFORDS,  Arizona
JERRY  MCNERNEY,  California
LAURA  RICHARDSON,  California
PAUL  KANJORSKI,  Pennsylvania
DARLENE  HOOLEY,  Oregon
STEVEN  R.  ROTHMAN,  New  Jersey
JIM  MATHESON,  Utah
MIKE  ROSS,  Arkansas
BEN  CHANDLER,  Kentucky
RUSS  CARNAHAN,  Missouri
CHARLIE  MELANCON,  Louisiana
BARON  P.  HILL,  Indiana
HARRY  E.  MITCHELL,  Arizona
CHARLES  A.  WILSON,  Ohio

RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas
F.  JAMES  SENSENBRENNER  JR.,

Wisconsin

LAMAR  S.  SMITH,  Texas
DANA  ROHRABACHER,  California
KEN  CALVERT,  California
ROSCOE  G.  BARTLETT,  Maryland
VERNON  J.  EHLERS,  Michigan
FRANK  D.  LUCAS,  Oklahoma
JUDY  BIGGERT,  Illinois
W.  TODD  AKIN,  Missouri
JO  BONNER,  Alabama
TOM  FEENEY,  Florida
RANDY  NEUGEBAUER,  Texas
BOB  INGLIS,  South  Carolina
DAVID  G.  REICHERT,  Washington
MICHAEL  T.  MCCAUL,  Texas
MARIO  DIAZ-BALART,  Florida
PHIL  GINGREY,  Georgia
BRIAN  P.  BILBRAY,  California
ADRIAN  SMITH,  Nebraska
PAUL  C.  BROUN,  Georgia

SUBCOMMITTEE ON RESEARCH AND SCIENCE EDUCATION

HON.  BRIAN  BAIRD,  Washington,  Chairman

EDDIE  BERNICE  JOHNSON,  Texas
DANIEL  LIPINSKI,  Illinois
JERRY  MCNERNEY,  California
DARLENE  HOOLEY,  Oregon
RUSS  CARNAHAN,  Missouri
BARON  P.  HILL,  Indiana
BART  GORDON,  Tennessee

VERNON  J.  EHLERS,  Michigan
ROSCOE  G.  BARTLETT,  Maryland
RANDY  NEUGEBAUER,  Texas
DAVID  G.  REICHERT,  Washington
BRIAN  P.  BILBRAY,  California

RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas

JIM  WILSON  Subcommittee  Staff  Director

DAHLIA  SOKOLOV  Democratic  Professional  Staff  Member
MELE´ WILLIAMS  Republican  Professional  Staff  Member

MEGHAN  HOUSEWRIGHT  Research  Assistant

(II)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

C O N T E N T S
September  25,  2007

Witness List .............................................................................................................
Hearing Charter ......................................................................................................

Opening  Statements

Statement  by  Representative  Brian  Baird,  Chairman,  Subcommittee  on  Re-
search  and  Science  Education,  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology,  U.S.
House of Representatives ....................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Statement  by  Representative  Vernon  J.  Ehlers,  Ranking  Minority  Member,
Subcommittee  on  Research  and  Science  Education,  Committee  on  Science
and Technology, U.S. House of Representatives ...............................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................

Witnesses:

Dr.  Robert  B.  Cialdini,  Regents’  Professor  of  Psychology  and  Marketing,  Ari-

zona State University

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Dr.  Duane  T.  Wegener,  Professor  of  Psychological  Sciences;  Initiative  Leader
for  Social,  Economic,  and  Political  Aspects  of  Energy  Use  and  Policy,  En-
ergy Center at Discovery Park, Purdue University

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Mr.  John  ‘‘Skip’’  Laitner,  Visiting  Fellow  and  Senior  Economist,  American

Council for an Energy Efficient Economy

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Dr.  Jerry  Ellig,  Senior  Research  Fellow,  Mercatus  Center  at  George  Mason

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Dr.  Robert  F.  Bordley,  Technical  Fellow,  Vehicle  Development  Research  Lab-

oratory, General Motors Corporation

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Discussion .................................................................................................................

University

Page
2
3

7
8

9
11

12
14
16

17
19
34

35
36
48

48
50
55

56
58
60
67

(III)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

THE  CONTRIBUTION  OF  THE  SOCIAL

SCIENCES  TO  THE  ENERGY  CHALLENGE

TUESDAY,  SEPTEMBER  25,  2007

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES,

SUBCOMMITTEE ON RESEARCH AND SCIENCE EDUCATION,

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY,

Washington, DC.

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  call,  at  10:04  a.m.,  in  Room
2318  of  the  Rayburn  House  Office  Building,  Hon.  Brian  Baird
[Chairman of the Subcommittee] presiding.

(1)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

2

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

3

HEARING CHARTER

SUBCOMMITTEE ON RESEARCH AND SCIENCE

EDUCATION

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY

U.S. HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

The Contribution of the Social

Sciences to the Energy Challenge

TUESDAY, SEPTEMBER 25, 2007

10:00 A.M.–12:00 P.M.

2318 RAYBURN HOUSE OFFICE BUILDING

1. Purpose

On  Tuesday,  September  25,  2007,  the  Subcommittee  on  Research  and  Science
Education  of  the  House  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology  will  hold  a  hearing
to  examine  how  research  in  the  social  sciences,  including  the  behavioral  and  eco-
nomic sciences, contributes to the design, implementation and evaluation of effective
policies for energy conservation and efficiency.
2. Witnesses
Dr. Robert Bordley, Technical Fellow, Vehicle Development Research Laboratory,
General Motors Corporation
Dr.  Robert  Cialdini,  Regents’  Professor  of  Psychology  and  Marketing,  Arizona
State University
Dr.  Jerry  Ellig,  Senior  Research  Fellow,  Mercatus  Center,  George  Mason  Univer-
sity
Mr. John ‘‘Skip’’ Laitner, Visiting Fellow and Senior Economist, American Coun-
cil for an Energy Efficient Economy
Dr. Duane Wegener, Professor of Psychological Sciences, Purdue University

3. Overarching Questions

• What  contribution  do  the  social  sciences  make  to  our  ability  to  predict  or
evaluate the effectiveness of public policies in changing individual and collec-
tive behavior related to energy use?

• What new and continuing areas of basic research in the social sciences could
significantly  improve  our  ability  to  design  effective  policies?  What  new  tech-
nologies and methodologies are enabling advances in the research? Are there
promising research opportunities that are not being adequately addressed?

• To what extent are policies (both private and government) to influence energy
consumption  patterns  actually  being  shaped  by  what  has  been  learned  from
the social sciences?

4. Federal Spending on Social, Behavioral and Economic Sciences

Basic  and  applied  research  in  the  social,  behavioral  and  economic  (SBE)  sciences
is funded out of a number of federal agencies, including the National Science Foun-
dation  (NSF),  the  National  Institutes  of  Health  (NIH)  as  well  as  other  agencies
within the Departments of Health and Human Services, Agriculture, Commerce, De-
fense,  Education,  Homeland  Security,  Housing  and  Urban  Development,  Interior,
Justice, Labor, State and Transportation. The National Endowment for the Human-
ities and the Smithsonian Institution also provide some funding in these areas. No-
tably,  given  the  topic  of  this  hearing,  the  Department  of  Energy  does  not  have  a
program of social science research applied to the energy challenge.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

4

According to research funding statistics compiled by NSF1, a total of just over $1
billion  was  obligated  to  basic  and  applied  research  in  all  social  sciences  for  fiscal
year 2004 (FY04), including $200 million for economics. Psychology was counted sep-
arately,  and  was  funded  at  a  total  of  $1.85  billion  in  FY04,  of  which  $1.7  billion
was funded by NIH and over $90 million was funded by DOD and Veterans Affairs.
The primary interest of those three agencies is the medical aspect of psychology.

The  main  support  for  basic  research  in  the  social  sciences  comes  from  the  SBE
Directorate  at  NSF.  Overall,  NSF  accounts  for  61  percent  of  federal  support  for
basic research in anthropology, social psychology and the social sciences at U.S. col-
leges  and  universities.  In  some  fields,  including  archaeology,  political  science,  lin-
guistics,  and  non-medical  aspects  of  anthropology,  psychology,  and  sociology,  NSF
is  the  predominant  or  exclusive  source  of  federal  basic  research  support.  The  NSF
SBE  budget  request  for  fiscal  year  2008  (FY08)  is  $220  million,  an  increase  of  3.9
percent  over  FY07.  In  addition  to  funding  basic  research  in  the  social,  behavioral
and  economic  sciences,  NSF’s  SBE  Directorate  funds  the  collection  and  analysis  of
data on science and engineering research, education and workforce trends (including
the  data  presented  here),  resulting  in  the  biannual  ‘‘S&E  Indicators.’’  This  activity
accounts  for  $31  million  in  FY08,  or  approximately  15  percent  of  the  SBE  Direc-
torate budget.
5. Social, Behavioral and Economic Sciences and the Energy Challenge

A key part of the solution to our energy challenge is the development of more effi-
cient,  cleaner  energy  technologies.  This  is  a  primary  mission  of  the  Department  of
Energy.  However,  while  it  may  be  impossible  to  quantify,  individual  and  collective
behavior also plays an important role, not just through direct use of energy, but also
by  creating  or  failing  to  create  market  demand  for  more  energy  efficient  tech-
nologies. Individuals across the United States make decisions every day about what
vehicle  or  appliance  to  purchase,  whether  to  drive  or  take  public  transportation,
what  light  bulbs  to  install,  whether  to  shut  down  their  computers  at  night.  Each
one  of  these  decisions,  from  turning  off  the  computer  to  buying  a  35  mpg  sedan
versus  a  15  mpg  SUV,  has  an  impact  on  the  supply  and  demand  curve  that  drives
both  energy  prices  and  energy  technology  development,  has  some  environmental
footprint,  and  in  the  case  of  oil  and  natural  gas,  may  have  an  impact  on  national
security.

These  impacts  are  generally  quantified  in  the  aggregate,  based  on  data  collected
by  the  Energy  Information  Administration.  In  2005,  U.S.  households  consumed  21
quadrillion  BTU  (quad)  of  primary  energy,  accounting  for  21  percent  of  total  U.S.
energy  consumption.  To  put  this  in  perspective,  people  in  the  United  States  con-
sume  2.4  times  as  much  energy  at  home  as  those  in  Western  Europe,  in  large  part
because our homes are twice as large and not designed for energy efficiency, despite
the  availability  of  affordable  technologies  to  make  them  so.  Household  vehicles  ac-
count  for  an  additional  14  quad  or  14  percent  of  primary  energy,  resulting  in  an
overall  household  total  of  more  than  one-third  of  annual  U.S.  energy  consumption.
In 2005, the National Academy of Sciences (NAS) produced a report on ‘‘Decision-
Making  for  the  Environment:  Social  and  Behavioral  Science  Research  Priorities.’’
Much  of  the  research  called  for  in  the  report  is  of  an  applied  nature—for  example,
quantifying  the  environmental  or  economic  impact  of  every  minute  action,  such  as
running  the  clothes  dryer  during  peak  hours  instead  of  off-peak  hours.  Information
such  as  this  might  help  policy-makers  prioritize  efforts  and  could  even  stimulate
technological  innovation,  but  it  isn’t  clear  that  such  information  would  actually  in-
fluence  consumer  behavior.  In  the  chapter  on  Environmentally  Significant  Indi-
vidual Behavior, the NAS panel states that, ‘‘A basic understanding of how informa-
tion,  incentives,  and  various  kinds  of  constraints  and  opportunities,  in  combination
with individuals’ values, beliefs, and social contexts, shape consumer choice in com-
plex  real-world  contexts  would  provide  an  essential  knowledge  base  for  under-
standing,  anticipating,  and  developing  policies  for  affecting  environmentally  signifi-
cant consumer behavior.’’

Energy-related behavior is significant not just to the environment, but to the con-
sumer’s own monthly expenses, to the economy as a whole, and to national security.
The  National  Science  Foundation  is  not  responsible  for  generating  the  needed  data
on  environmental  and  economic  impact  called  for  in  the  NAS  report,  or  for  sharing
it with the public. However, NSF does fund the basic research in the social, behav-
ioral  and  economic  sciences  that  can  help  inform  policy-makers  at  all  levels  in  the
development,  implementation  and  evaluation  of  information  campaigns,  incentives

1 Data are based on self-reporting by agencies. In many cases, especially where there is inter-
disciplinary work, it is hard to tally exact dollars spent on one field or another, so these values
are at best an estimate.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

5

programs, regulations and other public policies to change how we use energy in this
country.

A similar story can be seen in the recent history of smoking in the United States.
Changing  societal  norms  resulted  in  a  society  that  is  now  hostile  to  smokers  and
as  such  have  greatly  reduced  the  number  of  smokers,  resulting  in  reduced  health
risks for individuals and a reduced burden on our collective health system. But link-
ing  smoking  to  lung  and  other  cancers  was  not  sufficient  to  bring  about  this  de-
crease. Nor was the knowledge that second-hand smoke was harmful to others. Ad-
vertising  by  tobacco  companies  still  made  smoking  look  ‘‘sexy’’  just  as  car  company
advertisements  make  large  SUV’s  look  very  appealing  to  the  typical  consumer.  In
addition  to  laws  restricting  advertising,  and  the  near  elimination  of  smoking  from
movies  and  television  (the  characters  who  light  up  in  today’s  movies  are  typically
the  ‘‘bad  guys’’),  public  officials  and  non-profit  organizations  launched  major  infor-
mation campaigns targeted at different populations. Many of those information cam-
paigns  failed  to  influence  smoking  behavior,  in  particular  among  youth.  Social  and
behavioral researchers eventually helped to determine what kinds of advertisements
and other anti-smoking campaigns work for which target populations.

There  are  many  parallels  to  behavior  and  persuasion  in  the  energy  challenge.  A
2003  survey  commissioned  by  the  Alliance  to  Save  Energy  found  that  an  over-
whelming majority of consumers (92 percent) agree that business, government, and
consumers have an equal responsibility to reduce energy use. But attitudes have not
translated  into  action.  Social  science  researchers  can  help  create  and  provide  infor-
mation in an understandable manner, a particularly challenging task in the case of
energy;  determine  how  information  interacts  with  all  of  the  other  factors  listed  by
the  NAS  panel  to  affect  consumer  behavior;  understand  variation  in  these  inter-
actions across subsets of the population; and work with policy-makers to help shape
targeted information campaigns and policies.

The Department of Energy launched an ‘‘Energy Hog’’ energy efficiency campaign
in  2004.  The  Energy  Hog  website  provides  useful  information  to  consumers  about
how  to  save  energy  without  spending  a  lot  of  money.  Such  information,  however,
is primarily reaching those self-selecting consumers who actively seek it. The major-
ity of Americans, despite concern for both the environment and rising energy prices,
simply don’t consider energy in their own behavior or in that of their neighbors. The
purpose  of  this  hearing  is  to  explore  the  basic  research  that  could  help  policy-mak-
ers understand why attitudes about energy don’t currently translate into action.
6. Questions for Witnesses
Dr. Robert Bordley

background and experience as a social scientist influences your work.

• Please  describe  the  type  of  market  research  you  do  for  GM  and  how  your
• What  has  social  science  research  revealed  about  factors  that  influence  an  in-
dividual’s  vehicle  purchasing  decisions?  What  questions  remain  unanswered?
Have you looked specifically at the issue of fuel economy?
• How  are  recent  breakthroughs  in  research  incorporated  into  marketing  or
business  strategies?  What  role  might  the  National  Science  Foundation  play
in  building  bridges  between  academic  social  science  researchers  and  govern-
ment and industry policy-makers?

Dr. Robert Cialdini

• Please  describe  the  work  you  have  done  recently  on  individual  behavior  and
energy  conservation.  What  have  you  learned  about  what  influences  the  deci-
sions individuals make with respect to energy use?
• How  can  this  research  be  used  more  effectively  to  inform  policy?  Do  you  as
a  researcher  reach  out  to  policy-makers  or  others  in  a  position  to  influence
policy?  If  not,  how  would  you  propose  that  these  connections  be  made?  Can
the National Science Foundation play a role?
• What  basic  social  psychology  research  questions  relevant  to  the  energy  chal-
lenge remain unanswered? Do social scientists have all of the tools they need
to  answer  these  questions  and  adequate  resources  to  pursue  promising  re-
search  directions?  Are  there  as  of  yet  undeveloped  or  underdeveloped  tech-
nologies or methodologies that would help advance this research?

Dr. Jerry Ellig

• How predictive is a purely economic approach to evaluating the impact of en-
ergy  policy  on  individual  and  communal  behavior?  What  factors  other  than

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

6

price  signals  need  to  be  considered  when  developing  and  applying  economic
models to energy-related behaviors?
• To what extent are policies to influence individual and community energy use
being  shaped  by  what  has  been  learned  from  research  in  the  social  sciences,
including economics?
• What  tools  and  methodologies  are  most  appropriate  for  evaluating  the  effec-
tiveness  of  policies  to  incentivize  consumer  behavior  with  respect  to  energy
use? What kinds of basic research questions underlie the development of such
tools and methodologies?

Mr. John ‘‘Skip’’ Laitner

• How predictive is a purely economic approach to evaluating the impact of en-
ergy  policy  on  individual  and  communal  behavior?  What  other  factors  need
to be considered to match economic theory to empirical data? To what extent
are such data even available? That is, to what extent are relevant energy poli-
cies being evaluated for effectiveness?
• To what extent are policies to influence individual and community energy use
being  shaped  by  what  has  been  learned  from  research  in  the  social  sciences,
including  economics?  Are  you  aware  of  particular  sectors  of  industry  or  gov-
ernment  that  make  more  of  an  effort  to  incorporate  the  results  of  such  re-
search into the design and evaluation of policy?
• Please  describe  the  purpose  and  scope  of  the  first-ever  Behavior,  Energy  and
Climate  Change  Conference  being  organized  by  ACEEE.  What  do  you  hope
to  achieve  through  this  conference?  How  much  interest  have  you  seen  from
industry, government officials, and others in a position to influence policy?

Dr. Duane Wegener

• Please  describe  your  involvement  in  the  Purdue  Energy  Center,  and  in  par-
ticular  the  mission  and  goals  of  the  Social,  Economic,  and  Political  Aspects
of  Energy  Use  and  Policy  team  of  the  Center.  How  and  to  what  degree  does
your  team  interact  and  collaborate  with  the  technology  teams  at  the  Center?
• How  much  support  do  you  and  your  colleagues  in  this  area  get  from  federal
funding  agencies?  Have  you  sought  any  support  from  or  partnerships  with
public or private utilities or other non-governmental entities?
• What  has  social  science  research  revealed  about  factors  that  influence  how
Americans form attitudes relevant to energy use and policy? How can this re-
search be used more effectively to inform policy?
• What  basic  social  psychology  research  questions  relevant  to  the  energy  chal-
lenge remain unanswered? Do social scientists have all of the tools they need
to  answer  these  questions  and  adequate  resources  to  pursue  promising  re-
search  directions?  Are  there  as  of  yet  undeveloped  or  underdeveloped  tech-
nologies or methodologies that would help advance this research?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

7

Chairman  BAIRD.  We  will  now  call  this  hearing  to  order,  and  I
want  to  thank  all  our  witnesses  and  guests  here  and  my  good
friend  and  colleague,  Dr.  Ehlers,  for  being  here.  I  want  to  also
thank  staff  for  their  outstanding  work  in  putting  this  hearing  to-
gether.

I  am  especially  excited  about  today’s  hearing  because  it  sets  the
ground  work  for  a  number  of  hearings  that  I  hope  to  hold  in  this
committee  looking  at  how  the  social  sciences  can  help  us  address
some  of  the  most  difficult  challenges  we  face  in  our  country  today.
Energy,  in  my  opinion,  ranks  among  the  country’s  top  three  chal-
lenges,  next  to  health  and  national  security.  Solving  our  nation’s
energy challenges will depend on a combination of technological in-
novations and behavior changes. This committee and this Congress
have  held  countless  hearings  on  the  energy  technologies  of  tomor-
row.  What  we  don’t  talk  often  enough  about  is  behavior  and  how
changes  in  behavior  can  start  making  a  big  dent  in  our  energy
challenge  today.  Whereas  we  talk  about  the  technologies  of  tomor-
row, behavior can help us make the changes today.

The  panel  sitting  before  us  will  give  us  insight  into  how  we
might  achieve  this  goal.  One  witness  will  tell  us  how  a  simple
change  in  a  written  message  to  hotel  guests  asking  them  to  reuse
their towels could save 39 barrels of oil and 72,000 gallons of water
in an average—in one hotel in one year. If you multiply that by all
the hotels in all the cities in this country, that adds up to real en-
ergy savings, and that is just one example of the kind of things we
can learn from this hearing today.

Imagine  if  every  American  decided  to  turn  off  their  lights  when
they left the room, shut down their computers at night, or look for
Energy  Star  labels  the  next  time  they  shop  for  a  major  appliance.
The  truth  is  U.S.  households  are  responsible  for  more  than  one-
third of annual U.S. energy consumption. Of that approximately 60
percent goes into powering our homes and the rest into fueling our
cars  and  SUVs,  though  not  my  SUV.  To  put  it  in  perspective,
American homes consume 2.4 times as much energy as homes built
in Western Europe, 2.4 times as much. A recent survey by the Alli-
ance to Save Energy found that 92 percent of Americans agree that
businesses,  government,  and  consumers  have  an  equal  responsi-
bility  to  reduce  energy  use.  That  seems  fair,  given  that  consumers
use  one-third  of  the  energy.  Unfortunately,  this  attitude  is  not  al-
ways  translated  into  action.  The  truth  is  that  typical  consumers
don’t  have  the  information  to  factor  energy  use  to  purchases  and
behaviors,  and  the  government  and  industry  have  fallen  far  short
in providing or communicating the needed information to the public
in a way that will result in behavior change, and I want to under-
score  the  latter  point.  Merely  giving  information  but  without  the
cognizance  of  how  the  information  will  actually  lead  to  behavior
change just doesn’t do the job.

A  recent  National  Academy  of  Sciences  Report  stated  that  ‘‘a
basic  understanding  of  how  information,  incentives,  and  various
kinds  of  constraints  and  opportunities  in  combination  with  values,
beliefs, and social contexts shape consumer choice in complex, real-
world context would provide an essential knowledge base for under-
standing and anticipating and developing policies for effecting envi-
ronmentally  significant  consumer  behavior.’’  That  again  from  the

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

8

NAS.  While  the  focus  of  the  particular  NAS  report  was  environ-
mental policy, the statement works equally well for policies related
to energy use which has not only an environmental impact but also
economic and frankly national security ramifications.

Our  witnesses  are  working  on  different  aspects  of  this  exact
problem.  Together  they  will  tell  a  story  beginning  with  research
into  what  influences  individuals’  energy-related  behavior  and  end-
ing  with  the  relevance  of  such  research  to  the  development  and
evaluation of effective energy policies.

When the topic of social science comes up, there are always vocal
skeptics. We see them on the Floor of the House, sometimes in this
committee,  and  recently  in  the  Conference  Report  on  the  America
Competes  Act.  Those  who  may  acknowledge  the  intellectual  merit
of the research but have trouble making the connection to areas of
national need and question why the Federal Government should be
supporting social science research in the face of so many competing
demands for those dollars I hope will pay attention to this hearing
today.

Today we will learn how the knowledge generated by research in
the  social  sciences  is  relevant  to  policy-making  for  energy.  But  it
is  no  less  relevant  to  every  other  major  issue  facing  the  country
today  including  health  care,  education,  national  security,  crime,
competitiveness,  foreign  policy,  and  the  environment.  We  won’t
have  hearings  on  all  of  those  topics,  but  I  guarantee  we  will  have
hearings  on  a  few  others  and  see  how  behavioral  and  social
sciences can help understand these issues.

I want to thank all our witnesses for being here today. I look for-
ward very much to your testimony and our discussion, and I would
now recognize the Ranking Member, Dr. Ehlers, for any comments
he may wish to make.

[The prepared statement of Chairman Baird follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CHAIRMAN BRIAN BAIRD

I  now  call  to  order  this  hearing  on  the  contribution  of  the  social  sciences  to  the

energy challenge.

Energy,  in  my  opinion,  ranks  among  our  country’s  top  three  challenges  next  to
health  and  national  security.  Solving  our  nation’s  energy  challenge  will  depend  on
a combination of technological innovation and behavior change. This committee and
this Congress have held countless hearings on the energy technologies of tomorrow.
What we don’t talk about is behavior—and how changes in behavior can start mak-
ing a big dent in our energy challenge today.

The  panel  sitting  before  us  will  give  us  insight  into  how  we  might  achieve  this
goal.  One  witness  will  tell  you  how  a  simple  change  in  a  written  message  to  hotel
guests asking them to reuse their towels could save 39 barrels of oil and 72,000 gal-
lons  of  water  in  a  single  average-size  hotel  in  one  year.  If  you  multiply  that  by  all
of  hotels  in  all  the  cities  in  this  country,  that  adds  up  to  real  energy  savings.  And
that’s just because of a single, easy action on the part of hotel guests.

Imagine if every American decided to turn off their lights when they left a room,
shut down their computers at night, or looked for an EnergyStar label the next time
they  shopped  for  a  major  appliance?  The  truth  is  that  U.S.  households  are  respon-
sible  for  more  than  one-third  of  annual  U.S.  energy  consumption.  Of  that,  approxi-
mately  60  percent  goes  into  powering  our  homes  and  the  rest  into  fueling  our  cars
and  SUVs.  To  put  it  in  perspective,  American  homes  consume  2.4  times  as  much
energy as homes built in Western Europe.

A  recent  survey  by  the  Alliance  to  Save  Energy  found  that  ninety-two  percent  of
Americans agree that business, government, and consumers have an equal responsi-
bility  to  reduce  energy  use.  That  seems  fair,  given  that  consumers  use  one-third  of
the energy. But, unfortunately, this attitude has not translated into action.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

9

I am not blaming the American consumer. The truth is that the typical consumer
doesn’t  have  the  information  he  or  she  needs  to  factor  energy  use  into  purchases
and  behaviors,  and  the  government  and  industry  have  fallen  far  short  in  providing
the  needed  information  to  the  public  in  a  way  that  will  result  in  behavior  changes.
A recent National Academy of Sciences Report stated that ‘‘A basic understanding
of  how  information,  incentives,  and  various  kinds  of  constraints  and  opportunities,
in combination with individuals’ values, beliefs, and social contexts, shape consumer
choice in complex real-world contexts would provide an essential knowledge base for
understanding,  anticipating  and  developing  policies  for  affecting  environmentally
significant consumer behavior.’’

While  the  focus  of  that  particular  NAS  report  was  environmental  policy,  such  a
statement works equally well for policies related to energy use—which has not only
an environmental impact, but also economic and national security ramifications.

Today’s  witnesses  are  working  on  different  aspects  of  that  exact  problem.  To-
gether they will tell a story beginning with research into what influences an individ-
ual’s energy-related behavior and ending with the relevance of such research to the
development and evaluation of effective energy policies.

When the topic of social sciences comes up, there are always vocal skeptics—those
who may acknowledge the intellectual merit of the research, but have trouble mak-
ing  the  connection  to  areas  of  national  need  and  question  why  the  Federal  Govern-
ment should be supporting social science research in the face of so many competing
demands for those dollars.

Today  we  will  learn  how  the  knowledge  generated  by  research  in  the  social
sciences  is  relevant  to  policy-making  for  energy.  But  it  is  no  less  relevant  to  every
other  every  major  issue  facing  the  country  today—including  health,  education,  na-
tional security, crime, competitiveness, foreign policy and the environment.

mony.

I thank all of our witnesses for being here today, and I look forward to your testi-

I  now  recognize  the  Ranking  Member  for  any  comments  he  may  wish  to  make.
Mr.  EHLERS.  I  thank  the  Chairman,  and  I  am  pleased  that  to-
day’s  hearing  will  explore  how  energy-related  policies  are  being
shaped by social science research, and also I might add, by the be-
havior of people which is what we will be studying.

I understand that it is very challenging to determine why people
do  what  they  do  regarding  energy  given  all  the  variables  in  their
lives.  If  Congress  creates  what  looks  like  good  policy  but  which
lacks  an  understanding  of  the  primary  drivers  of  decision-making,
our  policies  will  still  fail.  We  must  account  for  social  factors  when
crafting energy policies, and I will give a few examples in a minute.
Much of the basic research funded by the National Science Foun-
dation examines the fundamental mysteries behind brain cognition
and  human  behavior.  Among  other  things,  NSF  studies  the  causes
and consequences of social and cultural norms. I know many of my
colleagues  share  my  personal  interest  in  developing  policies  to
draw more students into the science and mathematics teaching pro-
fession.  In  that  context,  I  believe  that  it  is  integral  that  the  social
science  research  work,  in  tandem  with  educational  research  to
evaluate  not  only  how  to  best  prepare  teachers  to  teach  but  to  un-
derstand  what  would  draw  them  and  keep  them  in  teaching.  Per-
haps if we continue this series of hearings we could delve into what
incentives  work  best  to  encourage  people  to  enter  teaching  profes-
sions, as well as their willingness to stay in them. I might also add,
Mr.  Chairman,  we  might  also  learn  better  ways  of  attracting  stu-
dents  to  study  these  particular  areas  of  science  and  mathematics
if  we  understood  exactly  what  they  and  their  colleagues  were
thinking  and  also  learn  that  this  ensures  their  future  better  than
most other choices that they might make.

Returning  to  the  topic  at  hand  today,  I  am  particularly  inter-
ested in what influences individuals to make energy-efficiency deci-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

10

sions.  We  all  assume  that  if  people  understood  their  return  on  in-
vestment  from  energy  efficiency  measure,  say  home  improvements
to save on winter heating bills, then they would quickly make those
changes. But I think our witnesses will share that it is much more
complicated. We are not always as rational as we would like to be-
lieve.  Furthermore,  being  well-educated  about  energy  efficiency
does  not  necessarily  translate  into  action.  Consumers  are  a  fickle
bunch,  especially  in  a  society  where  individualism  and  personal
freedoms are highly cherished, and certain unranked desires on the
part  of  the  consumer  may  guide  the  decision  more  than  rational
thought.

Mr. Chairman, I would just like to bring forward something that
happened  to  me.  When  my  wife  and  I  first  got  married  and  first
went into a house of our own instead of a furnished apartment, we
had to get a refrigerator. Not being an expert in what refrigerators
are  good  for,  what  features  are  nice  and  so  forth,  I  told  my  wife,
you  decide  which  features  you  want  and  then  we  will  go  out  to-
gether  and  decide  on  the  best  refrigerator.  She  went  shopping  and
came  back,  and  had  found  two  refrigerators  that  met  her  needs
which  she  liked  very  much.  I  looked  at  them.  One  cost  exactly
twice  as  much  as  the  other.  That  would  make  it  a  simple  choice.
And this is in the days before energy labels. But I proceeded to cal-
culate  the  energy  consumption  of  the  two  refrigerators  and  discov-
ered  much  to  my  amazement  that  if  I  bought  the  more  expensive
one I would have saved money within 10 years compared to buying
the  cheap  one  because  the  cheap  one  used  considerably  more  en-
ergy.

So  we  bought  the  more  expensive  one  contrary  to  all  rational
thought. It lasted 23 years, so we not only saved more than the dif-
ferential  cost,  but  we  actually  saved  enough  to  pay  for  more  than
two refrigerators of the other type.

So  those  are  the  lessons  that  we  should  learn.  We  now  have  the
labels,  but  again  I  don’t  think  the  labels  really  make  the  picture
clearer.  It  would  be  much  better  if  I  could  assign  some  sort  of  age
to the refrigerator and have a notice on the front that says this one
will cost you X amount over so many years, and compared to other
refrigerators that will last a shorter time.

There  are  so  many  things  that  we  can  do  about  this  that  we
should  be  doing,  and  you  have  probably  all  heard  my  I-wish-en-
ergy-were-purple  story.  You  haven’t?  How  did  you  escape?  But  ba-
sically  that  if  energy  were  purple,  people’s  behavior  would  change
because  they  could  see  the  results.  In  the  winter  they  could  see
purple oozing through the walls of their house if they are not well-
insulated  or  purple  rivulets  running  down  the  windows  and  doors,
and  so  they  would  seal  those  up  more  tightly.  And  driving  down
the  highway,  the  Prius  might  be  just  a  little  purple  haze  around
the  car  but  an  SUV  comes  by,  it  is  just  a  purple  cloud.  If  people
could see energy, if it were purple, they would change their behav-
ior very quickly. The question I think Mr. Chairman is how can we
help  them  see  the  consequences  of  their  decisions,  even  though  we
can’t make energy purple? What way can we make this more obvi-
ous to them so that it registers?

Well,  I  thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  for  investigating  this  impor-

tant topic, and I look forward to hearing from our witnesses.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

11

[The prepared statement of Mr. Ehlers follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE VERNON J. EHLERS

I  am  pleased  that  today’s  hearing  will  explore  how  energy-related  policies  are
being  shaped  by  social  science  research.  I  understand  that  it  is  very  challenging  to
determine  why  people  do  what  they  do  regarding  energy,  given  all  the  variables  in
their  lives.  If  Congress  creates  what  looks  like  good  policy,  but  which  lacks  an  un-
derstanding of the primary drivers of decision-making, our policies may still fail. We
must account for social factors when crafting energy policies.

Much of the basic research funded by the National Science Foundation (NSF) ex-
amines  the  fundamental  mysteries  behind  brain  cognition  and  human  behavior.
Among other things, NSF studies the causes and consequences of social and cultural
norms. I know many of my colleagues share my personal interest in developing poli-
cies  to  draw  more  students  into  the  science  and  mathematics  teaching  profession.
In  that  context,  I  believe  that  it  is  integral  that  the  social  science  research  work
in tandem with educational research to evaluate not only how to best prepare teach-
ers  to  teach,  but  to  understand  what  would  draw  them  and  keep  them  in  teaching.
Perhaps  if  we  continue  this  series  of  hearings  we  could  delve  into  what  incentives
work best to encourage people to enter teaching professions as well as their willing-
ness to stay in them.

Returning  to  the  topic  at  hand  today,  I  am  particularly  interested  in  what  influ-
ences  individuals  to  make  energy  efficiency  decisions.  We  all  assume  that  if  people
understood  their  return  on  investment  from  energy  efficiency  measures—say,  home
improvements to save on winter heating bills—then they would quickly make those
changes. But I think our witnesses will share that it is much more complicated. We
are not always as rational as we’d like to believe. Furthermore, being well-educated
about  energy  efficiency  does  not  necessarily  translate  into  action.  Consumers  are  a
fickle bunch, especially in a society where individualism and personal freedoms are
highly-cherished.

I  thank  the  Chairman  for  investigating  this  important  topic  and  I  look  forward

to hearing from our witnesses.

Chairman  BAIRD.  Dr.  Ehlers,  thank  you.  One  of  the  things  that
is  most  pleasant  about  serving  in  Congress  is  you  can  serve  with
people like Dr. Ehlers as your Ranking Member because the exam-
ple he cited illustrates that he has applied this in his life; and how
many other Americans have the technological know-how as a Ph.D.
physicist to make those calculations? And that is the kind of thing
we are going to be talking about today.

So  without  further  ado,  I  just  want  to  thank  my  good  friend,
Jerry McNerney for joining us today, also a Ph.D. engineer, mathe-
matician,  but  applied  it  to  wind  and  solar  energy  for  many  years.
So he knows whereof he speaks as well.

If there are other Members who wish to submit additional open-
ing statements, your statements will be added to the record at this
point.  At  this  point  I  will  introduce  our  witnesses.  Dr.  Robert
Cialdini  is  Regents’  Professor  of  Psychology  and  Marketing  and
W.P.  Carey  Distinguished  Professor  of  Marketing  at  Arizona  State
University.  Dr.  Duane  Wegener  is  a  Professor  of  Psychological
Sciences  at  Purdue  University  and  an  Initiative  Leader  in  the  So-
cial,  Economic,  and  Policy  Aspects  of  Energy  Use  and  Policy  Divi-
sion  of  the  Purdue  Energy  Center.  Apparently  the  Purdue  Energy
gets the concept to have you as part of the faculty. Mr. John ‘‘Skip’’
Laitner  is  Visiting  Fellow  and  Senior  Economist  for  Technology
Policy  at  the  American  Council  for  an  Energy  Efficient  Economy.
Dr. Jerry Ellig is a Senior Research Fellow at the Mercatus Center
at  George  Mason  University  and  an  Adjunct  Professor  at  the
George  Mason  University  School  of  Law.  And  Dr.  Robert  Bordley
is a Technical Fellow in the Vehicle Development Research Labora-
tory  at  General  Motors  Corporation  and  an  Adjunct  Professor  in

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

12

the Industrial and Operations Engineering Department at the Uni-
versity of Michigan no less, with a nod to my dear friend.

As our witnesses know, each testimony is limited to five minutes
each after which the Members of the Committee will have five min-
utes to ask questions.

We  will  start  with  Professor  Cialdini.  Thank  you  all  for  being

here.
STATEMENT  OF  DR.  ROBERT  B.  CIALDINI,  REGENTS’  PRO-
FESSOR OF PSYCHOLOGY AND MARKETING, ARIZONA STATE
UNIVERSITY
Dr.  CIALDINI.  Chairman  Baird,  Ranking  Member  Ehlers,  and
Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  it  is  my  pleasure  to  be  here  today
to  testify  on  the  contribution  of  the  social  sciences  to  the  energy
challenge.  I  believe  that  the  social  and  behavioral  sciences  do  in-
deed  hold  tremendous  potential  to  influence  individual  and  collec-
tive  behaviors  affecting  energy  conservation  providing  that  we  un-
derstand  how  to  craft  the  message.  Here  is  why.  It  is  standard
practice when advocating for action among policy members, such as
yourselves, to emphasize the breadth of a problem; and that makes
sense  because  policy-makers  are  able  to  provide  additional  re-
sources  or  to  enact  regulations  to  address  those  abuses  that  they
seem to see as most prevalent.

However,  a  different  and  even  opposite  logic  applies  when  com-
municating  to  the  public  about  a  problem.  To  understand  that
logic, consider the following incident. Not long ago, a graduate stu-
dent  of  mine  visited  the  Petrified  Forest  National  Park  in  Arizona
with  his  fiance´e,  a  woman  he  described  as  the  single  most  honest
person  he  had  ever  met.  They  quickly  encountered  a  park  sign
warning  visitors  against  stealing  petrified  wood.  It  said,  our  herit-
age is being vandalized by the theft of 14 tons of wood every year.
While  still  reading  the  sign,  he  was  shocked  to  hear  his  fiance´e
whisper, we better get ours now.

What  could  have  spurred  this  otherwise  wholly  law-abiding
young  woman  to  want  to  become  a  thief  and  to  deplete  a  national
treasure in the process? I believe it has to do with the mistake that
Park  Service  officials  made  in  creating  that  sign.  They  tried  to
alert  visitors  to  the  park  of  its  theft  problem  by  telling  them  how
many  other  visitors  were  thieves.  In  so  doing,  they  stimulated  the
behavior they had hoped to suppress by making it appear common-
place,  when  in  fact,  less  than  three  percent  of  the  park’s  millions
of visitors have ever stolen a piece of wood.

Although their claims may be both true and well-intentioned, the
creators  of  this  and  many  other  types  of  public  service  campaigns
have overlooked something basic about the communication process.
Within  the  lament,  look  at  all  the  people  doing  this  undesirable
thing, lurks the powerful and undercutting message, look at all the
people who are doing this undesirable thing. And one of the funda-
mental  lessons  of  human  psychology  is  that  people  follow  the
crowd.  I  am  concerned  that  this  point  is  being  missed  in  our  at-
tempts to communicate the importance of environmental protection
and energy conservation within our communities.

Therefore,  in  our  messaging,  we  need  to  be  diligent  in  making
clear  to  the  public  that  many  unwelcomed  actions  with  regard  to

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

13

the environment are performed by only a small minority of the pop-
ulation.

My  colleagues  and  I  at  Arizona  State  University  have  done  re-
search  indicating  that  such  an  approach  works.  At  the  Petrified
Forest,  for  example,  we  erected  a  pair  of  signs  in  different  areas.
The  first  urged  visitors  not  to  take  wood  and  depicted  a  scene
showing three thieves in action. After passing that sign, visitors be-
came  more  than  twice  as  likely  to  steal.  Our  other  sign  also  urged
visitors not to take wood, but it depicted a lone thief marginalizing
that behavior instead of normalizing it. Those individuals took only
half as many pieces of wood as before.

I believe that this lesson applies to other forms of environmental
offenses  such  as  energy  wastage.  The  secret  is  to  avoid  validating
the  deviant  actions  of  a  small  minority  of  wrongdoers  by  making
them  appear  the  rule  rather  than  the  exception.  Otherwise  we  as-
sure that a few rotten apples will spoil the barrel.

The truth is, we are not a nation of polluters or despoilers or en-
ergy  pigs.  We  are  not.  Consequently,  public  service  messages
should  raise  the  profile  of  the  majority  that  does  act  pro-environ-
mentally because as social science research tells us, that spurs oth-
ers to follow.

To test this idea, we examined resorts’ conservation choices made
in  upscale  hotel  rooms  where  guests  often  encounter  a  sign  asking
them  to  reuse  their  towels.  This  is  the  one  at  the  hotel  I  stayed
in  a  few  blocks  from  here  last  night.  As  anyone  who  travels  fre-
quently  knows,  this  card  may  urge  action  in  various  ways.  Some-
times  it  requests  compliance  for  the  sake  of  the  environment.
Sometimes it does so for the sake of future generations, and some-
times it exhorts guests to cooperate with the hotel in order to save
resources.  What  the  card  never  says  but  is  entitled  to  say  because
it is true is that the majority of guests do recycle their towels when
given the opportunity. We suspected that this omission was costing
the hotels and the environment plenty. Indeed, when as part of our
research  program  we  placed  such  a  sign  in  certain  guest  rooms  in
an  upscale  Phoenix  hotel,  it  increased  towel  reuse  by  34  percent
over the traditionally employed messages.

I  am  going  to  close  by  raising  two  things  that  I  think  are  note-
worthy  about  the  results  of  our  towel  study.  First,  the  message
that  generated  the  most  participation  in  the  hotel’s  program  was
the  one  that  no  hotel  to  our  knowledge  has  ever  employed.  Appar-
ently,  this  highly  effective  appeal  didn’t  emerge  from  a  history  of
trial  and  error  as  a  hotel  best  practice.  Instead,  it  emerged  from
scientifically  based  understanding  of  human  psychology.  This
points  out  the  need  for  us  to  call  on  social  scientific  research  in  a
systematic fashion to help advance sound environmental policy. For
instance,  in  the  case  of  hotel  conservation,  an  average  150-room
hotel would save 72,000 gallons of water a year.

The second notable aspect of the hotel study was that the signifi-
cant  increase  in  program  participation  was  nearly  costless  to  the
hotel,  something  that  government  needs  to  recognize  as  well.  We
don’t need to institute highly, costly fixes, technological fixes, or tax
incentives or regulations. We can do it with the messaging process
costlessly.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

14

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  provide  the  results  of  my
team’s  efforts  to  date.  I  will  look  forward  to  your  questions  and
comments.

[The prepared statement of Dr. Cialdini follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ROBERT B. CIALDINI

Abstract

Social  norms,  which  refer  to  what  most  people  do  (descriptive  social  norms)  and
what most people approve (injunctive social norms), are remarkably powerful in di-
recting  human  action.  Social  science  research  has  uncovered  the  most  successful
ways to incorporate norms into messages designed to produce socially desirable con-
duct.

Studies in several environmental contexts (e.g., home energy conservation, house-
hold recycling, hotel conservation efforts) show that (1) energy users severely under-
estimate the role of social norms in guiding their energy usage, (2) communications
that  employ  social  norm-based  appeals  for  pro-environmental  behavior  are  superior
to those that employ traditional persuasive appeals, and (3) even though these high-
ly effective social norm-based appeals are nearly costless—requiring no large techno-
logical  fixes,  tax  incentives,  or  regulatory  changes—they  are  rarely  (and  sometimes
mistakenly) delivered.

Chairman  Baird,  Ranking  Member  Ehlers,  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  it
is my pleasure to be here today to testify on The Contribution of the Social Sciences
to the Energy Challenge. I believe that the social and behavioral sciences do indeed
hold  tremendous  potential  to  influence  individual  and  collective  behaviors  effecting
energy conservation, providing that we understand how to craft the message.

Here’s why. It is standard practice when advocating for action among policy-mak-
ers  (e.g.,  legislative  or  other  governmental  officials)  to  emphasize  the  breadth  of  a
problem.  And,  that  makes  sense  because  policy-makers  can  be  expected  to  provide
additional  resources  or  regulations  to  address  those  abuses  that  appear  to  them
most  widespread.  However,  a  different—and  even  opposite—logic  may  apply  when
communicating with the public about a problem. To understand that logic, consider
the following incident.

Not  long  ago,  a  graduate  student  of  mine  visited  the  Petrified  Forest  National
Park in Arizona with his fiance´e—a woman he described as the most honest person
he’d ever known, someone who had never taken a paper clip or rubber band without
returning it. They quickly encountered a park sign warning visitors against stealing
petrified  wood,  ‘‘OUR  HERITAGE  IS  BEING  VANDALIZED  BY  THE  THEFT  OF
14  TONS  OF  WOOD  EVERY  YEAR.’’  While  still  reading  the  sign,  he  was  shocked
to hear his fiance´e whisper, ‘‘We’d better get ours now.’’

What could have spurred this wholly law-abiding young woman to want to become
a thief and to deplete a national treasure in the process? I believe it has to do with
a mistake that park officials made when creating that sign. They tried to alert visi-
tors  to  the  park’s  theft  problem  by  telling  them  that  many  other  visitors  were
thieves.  In  so  doing,  they  stimulated  the  behavior  they  had  hoped  to  suppress  by
making it appear commonplace—when, in fact, less than three percent of the park’s
millions of visitors have ever taken a piece of wood.

Park officials are far from alone in this kind of error. Those responsible for devel-
oping  and  enforcing  public  policy  blunder  into  it  all  the  time.  Teenage  suicide  pre-
vention  programs  inform  students  of  the  alarming  number  of  adolescent  suicides
and,  research  shows,  cause  participants  to  become  more  likely  to  see  suicide  as  a
possible  solution  to  their  problems.  When  publicizing  cases  of  school  violence,  news
outlets  assemble  accounts  of  incident  after  incident  and,  in  the  process,  spawn  the
next  one.  During  prominently  announced  crack-downs  on  the  problem,  government
officials  decry  the  frequency  of  tax  evasion  and,  as  demonstrated  by  one  follow-up
study, increase tax cheating the next year (Kahan, 1997). Although their claims may
be both true and well-intentioned, the creators of these information campaigns have
overlooked  something  basic  about  the  communication  process:  Within  the  lament
‘‘Look at all the people who are doing this undesirable thing’’ lurks the powerful and
undercutting message ‘‘Look at all the people who are doing it.’’ And, one of the fun-
damental  lessons  of  human  psychology  is  that  people  follow  the  crowd.  I  am  con-
cerned  that  this  point  is  being  missed  in  our  attempts  to  communicate  the  impor-
tance of environmental protection and energy conservation within our communities.
I  think  there  is  a  better  way  to  proceed.  We  need  be  diligent  in  making  clear  to
the  public  that  many  unwelcome  actions  are  performed  by  a  small  minority  of  the
population. For instance, let’s consider the case of littering. Few citizens litter with

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

15

any  frequency;  most  take  care  to  preserve  the  environment.  The  key  to  an  enlight-
ened  public  policy  approach  to  litter  is  to  deliver  the  message  that  even  one  aban-
doned newspaper can spread to despoil a pristine park or beach, that even one ciga-
rette  butt  flipped  from  a  car  can  ignite  a  devastating  fire,  that  even  one  carelessly
discarded  plastic  container  can  endanger  wildlife,  and,  most  important,  that  even
one  piece  of  litter  can  begin  an  accumulation  that  creates  the  mistaken—but  con-
tagious—impression that we all litter. It’s not even remotely true that we are a na-
tion  of  despoilers,  and  we  shouldn’t  be  misled  into  believing  that  it  is.  Instead,
armed  with  the  knowledge  that,  as  a  citizenry,  we  do  care  about  our  environment,
we should focus on marginalizing the few who don’t care.

Would such an approach work in other environmental arenas? My colleagues and
I  at  Arizona  State  University  have  done  research  indicating  that  it  well  might.  At
the  Petrified  Forest,  we  erected  a  pair  of  signs  in  different  areas.  The  first  urged
visitors not to take wood and depicted a scene showing three thieves in action. After
passing  that  sign,  visitors  became  over  twice  as  likely  to  steal  than  before!  Our
other sign also urged visitors not to take wood, but it depicted a lone thief. Visitors
who  passed  it  became  nearly  half  as  likely  to  steal  than  before  (Cialdini,  2003).  I
believe that this lesson applies to other forms of environmental offenses such as en-
ergy wastage. The secret is to avoid validating the deviant actions of a small minor-
ity of wrongdoers by making them appear the rule rather than the exception. Other-
wise, we assure that a few rotten apples will spoil the barrel.

In  addition,  we  should  be  sure  to  raise  the  profile  of  the  majority  that  does  act
pro-environmentally, because that spurs others to follow suit. For instance, with our
students, my fellow environmental researcher, Wes Schultz of California State Uni-
versity–San  Marcos,  and  I  obtained  support  from  the  William  and  Flora  Hewlett
Foundation to study how descriptive social norms (the perception of what most peo-
ple  do  in  a  situation)  can  influence  energy  conservation  decisions.  Our  survey  of
nearly 2,500 Californians showed that those who thought their neighbors were con-
serving  were  more  likely  to  conserve  themselves.  But,  at  the  same  time,  almost  all
of  the  survey  respondents  underestimated  the  conservation  efforts  of  their  neigh-
bors.  In  a  follow-up  study,  we  placed  door  hangers  on  the  doors  of  San  Diego-area
residents  once  a  week  for  a  month.  The  door  hangers  carried  one  of  four  messages,
informing residents that (1) they could save money by conserving energy, or (2) they
could  save  the  Earth’s  resources  by  conserving  energy,  or  (3)  they  could  be  socially
responsible citizens by conserving energy, or (4) the majority of their neighbors tried
regularly  to  conserve  energy—information  we  had  learned  from  a  prior  survey.  We
also include a control group of residents in the study whose door hanger simply en-
couraged energy conservation but provided no rationale. Even though our prior sur-
vey indicated that residents felt that they would be least influenced by information
regarding their neighbors’ energy usage, this was the only type of door hanger infor-
mation that led to significantly decreased energy consumption, almost two kWh/day
(Nolan,  Schultz,  Cialdini,  Goldstein,  &  Griskevicius,  2007).  This  suggests  a  clear
way to increase conservation activity—by trumpeting the true levels of conservation
that are going unrecognized.

To  investigate  this  idea,  we  examined  resource  conservation  choices  in  upscale
hotel rooms, where guests often encounter a card asking them to reuse their towels.
As  anyone  who  travels  frequently  knows,  this  card  may  urge  the  action  in  various
ways. Sometimes it requests compliance for the sake of the environment; sometimes
it does so for the sake of future generations; and sometimes it exhorts guests to co-
operate  with  the  hotel  in  order  to  save  resources.  What  the  card  never  says,  how-
ever,  is  that  (according  to  data  from  the  Project  Planet  Corporation  that  manufac-
tures the cards) the majority of guests do reuse their towels when given the oppor-
tunity.  We  suspected  that  this  omission  was  costing  the  hotels—and  the  environ-
ment—plenty.

Here’s how we tested our suspicion. With the collaboration of the management of
an upscale hotel in the Phoenix area, we put one of four different cards in its guest
rooms.  One  of  the  cards  stated  ‘‘HELP  SAVE  THE  ENVIRONMENT,’’  which  was
followed by information stressing respect for nature. A different card stated ‘‘HELP
SAVE RESOURCES FOR FUTURE GENERATIONS,’’ which was followed by infor-
mation stressing the importance of saving energy for the future. A third type of card
stated  ‘‘PARTNER  WITH  US  TO  HELP  SAVE  THE  ENVIRONMENT,’’  which  was
followed  by  information  urging  guests  to  cooperate  with  the  hotel  in  preserving  the
environment.  A  final  type  of  card  stated  ‘‘JOIN  YOUR  FELLOW  CITIZENS  IN
HELPING  TO  SAVE  THE  ENVIRONMENT,’’  which  was  followed  by  information
that  the  majority  of  hotel  guests  do  reuse  their  towels  when  asked.  The  outcome?
Compared  to  the  first  three  messages,  the  final  (social  norm)  message  increased
towel reuse by an average of 34 percent (Goldstein, Cialdini, & Griskevicius, 2007).

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

16

Two things are noteworthy about the results of the hotel study. First, the message
that generated the most participation in the hotel’s towel recycling program was the
one  that  no  hotel  (to  our  knowledge)  has  ever  used.  Apparently,  this  simple  but  ef-
fective appeal didn’t emerge from a history of trial and error to become a hotel ‘‘best
practice.’’  Instead,  it  emerged  from  a  scientifically-based  understanding  of  human
psychology. This points out the need to call on social scientific research in a system-
atic  fashion  to  help  advance  sound  environmental  policy.  For  instance,  in  case  of
hotel conservation programs, the average 150-room hotel would save 72,000 gallons
of  water,  39  barrels  of  oil,  and  would  obviate  the  release  480  gallons  of  detergent
into  the  environment  in  the  course  of  a  year  if  guests  complied  with  the  requests.
The  second  notable  aspect  of  the  hotel  study  was  that  the  significant  increase  in
program  participation  was  nearly  costless.  In  most  cases,  for  an  organization  to
boost  effectiveness  by  34  percent,  some  expensive  steps  have  to  be  taken;  typically,
organizational structure, focus, or personnel must be changed. In this instance, how-
ever,  none  of  that  was  necessary.  Rather,  what  was  required  was  a  presentation  of
the facts about the preferred behavior of the majority.
Conclusion

In  sum,  when  communicating  with  the  public,  it  is  important  to  avoid  trying  to
reduce the incidence of a damaging problem by describing it as regrettably frequent.
Such  an  approach,  while  understandable,  runs  counter  to  the  findings  of  social
science regarding the contagiousness of social behavior, even socially harmful behav-
ior.  Moreover,  often,  the  problem  under  consideration  is  not  widespread  at  all.  It
only  comes  to  seem  that  way  by  virtue  of  a  vivid  and  impassioned  presentation  of
its dangers. Instead, it would be better to honestly inform our audience of the envi-
ronmental peril resulting from even a small amount of the undesirable conduct. Fur-
thermore, when most people are behaving responsibly toward the environment, we’d
be  less  than  responsible  ourselves  if  we  failed  to  publicize  that  fact,  as  the  social
science evidence is plain that the information will serve both to validate and stimu-
late the desired action.
References
Cialdini, R.B. (2003). Crafting normative messages to protect the environment. Cur-

rent Directions in Psychological Science, 12, 105–109.

Goldstein,  N.,  Cialdini,  R.B.,  &  Griskevicius,  V.  (2006).  A  room  with  a  viewpoint:
Using norm-based appeals to motivate conservation behaviors in a hotel setting.
Manuscript currently under review.

Kahan, D. (1997). Social influence, social meaning, and deterrence. Virginia Law Re-

view, 83, 349–395.

Nolan, J.M.. Schultz, P.W., Cialdini, R.B., Goldstein, N.J., & Griskevicius, V. (2007).

Normative influence is under-detected. Manuscript currently under review.

BIOGRAPHY OF ROBERT B. CIALDINI

Robert  B.  Cialdini  is  Regents’  Professor  of  Psychology  and  Marketing  at  Arizona
State  University,  where  he  has  also  been  named  W.  P.  Carey  Distinguished  Pro-
fessor  of  Marketing.  He  has  taught  at  Stanford  University  and  Harvard’s  Kennedy
School  of  Government.  He  has  been  elected  President  of  the  Society  of  Personality
and  Social  Psychology.  He  is  the  recipient  of  the  Distinguished  Scientific  Achieve-
ment Award of the Society for Consumer Psychology, the Donald T. Campbell Award
for  Distinguished  Contributions  to  Social  Psychology,  and  the  (inaugural)  Peitho
Award for Distinguished Contributions to the Science of Social Influence.

Professor  Cialdini’s  book  Influence:  Science  and  Practice,  which  was  the  result  of
a three-year program of study into the reasons that people comply with requests in
everyday  settings,  has  sold  over  a  million  copies  while  appearing  in  numerous  edi-
tions and twenty-two languages.

Chairman BAIRD. My guess is that card doesn’t use your effective

message, right?

Dr. CIALDINI. It doesn’t. It says please do this for the sake of the
environment, and then it adds insult to injury by saying, don’t for-
get to recycle every year. Americans waste four trillion documents,
enough to paper the Grand Canyon 300 times. So they do the oppo-
site of what our research suggests.
Chairman BAIRD. Dr. Wegener.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

17

STATEMENT OF DR. DUANE T. WEGENER, PROFESSOR OF PSY-
CHOLOGICAL  SCIENCES;  INITIATIVE  LEADER  FOR  SOCIAL,
ECONOMIC,  AND  POLITICAL  ASPECTS  OF  ENERGY  USE  AND
POLICY,  ENERGY  CENTER  AT  DISCOVERY  PARK,  PURDUE
UNIVERSITY
Dr.  WEGENER.  Chairman  Baird,  Ranking  Member  Ehlers,  and
Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to
testify.

I am here today in part because of the necessary transition from
fossil  fuels  to  new,  sustainable  energy  sources  will  rely  on  more
than  development  of  new  energy  technologies.  A  successful  transi-
tion to new energy sources will be determined to a large extent by
changing in the energy use behaviors of energy consumers.

In my home discipline of social psychology, factors such as social
norms, values, and attitudes have been identified as important de-
terminants  of  behavior.  However,  these  social  factors  are  not  al-
ways  equally  important.  My  research  focuses  on  attitudes,  persua-
sion,  and  the  consequences  of  the  resulting  attitudes  in  terms  of
the persistence of the attitude over time, its ability to resist future
attempts at change, and its ability to influence future thinking and
behavior.

As the Charter for this hearing noted, there are indications that
people hold favorable attitudes toward energy-relevant actions such
as conservation. Yet, in too many circumstances, these attitudes do
not  seem  to  be  having  the  desired  effects  on  behavior.  Why  is  it
that  these  attitudes  are  not  getting  the  job  done  and  what  do  we
know  about  attitudes  and  persuasion  in  help  making  these  atti-
tudes more influential?

The  social  psychology  literature  on  attitudes  has  identified  a
number  of  determinants  of  when  attitudes  influence  behavior  and
when  they  do  not.  Let  me  focus  on  one  area  of  this  research,  the
work  on  attitude  strength.  The  concept  of  attitude  strength  came
from the acknowledgment that not all attitudes are equally capable
of  influencing  behavior.  Many  specific  properties  of  the  attitudes
have  been  identified  that  make  them  relatively  strong.  In  the  per-
suasion  experiments  conducted  in  my  lab,  we  focus  on  the  factors
that  influence  how  much  people  think  about  the  persuasive  mes-
sage. In some circumstances, people engage the message and think
carefully  about  what  it  has  to  say.  In  others,  they  either  lack  the
motivation  or  the  ability  to  think  carefully  about  the  information
in  the  message.  In  both  types  of  situations,  people  can  be  per-
suaded  but  the  changes  in  attitudes  created  by  thinking  carefully
about  the  message  creates  attitudes  that  have  this  property  of
strength.

As  one  example,  in  a  recent  set  of  studies  a  colleague  of  mine,
Kevin  Blankenship,  and  I  took  topics  that  people  were  not  natu-
rally  motivated  to  think  carefully  about,  including  the  topic  of
building  nuclear  power  plants  in  Canada.  And  we  asked  them  to
think  about  whether  that  message  related  to  values  that  we  had
previously  identified  as  either  quite  important  or  relatively  unim-
portant to our participants. When considering whether the message
was  related  to  these  important  values,  message  recipients  thought
much  more  thoroughly  about  the  information  using  a  number  of
different measures of amount of thinking. And just as importantly,

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

18

the  attitudes  formed  through  thinking  were  then  more  capable  of
resisting a later message that opposed people’s attitudes. In the nu-
clear  power  study,  the  later  message  opposed  the  building  of  nu-
clear  power  plants  where  the  initial  message  had  supported  the
building of those plants.

These  thoughtful  attitudes  have  also  been  shown  in  other  re-
search  to  be  more  likely  than  to  guide  later  behaviors,  even  when
the non-thoughtful attitudes were in fact just as favorable as those
thoughtful attitudes.

So  if  people  are  favorable  toward  energy  conservation,  for  exam-
ple,  but  their  opinions  are  not  well-thought  out,  then  these  atti-
tudes  are  unlikely  to  translate  into  energy  conservation  behaviors.
Theory  and  research  and  attitudes  has  also  identified  additional
factors  that  make  attitudes  stronger.  For  example,  attitudes  are
stronger  when  people  hold  them  with  confidence,  and  the  attitude
is  also  strong  if  the  person  views  the  proposal  like  the  building  of
nuclear power plants as mostly good or mostly bad, rather than as
having  a  more  equal  mixture  of  good  and  bad  features  which  we
refer to as ambivalence.

In  each  of  these  cases,  the  attitudes  with  these  properties  are
more likely to have the consequences that I mentioned earlier, per-
sistence,  resistance,  and  impact  on  behavior.  There  is  certainly
much  more  to  learn  about  persuasion  and  about  attitude  strength
including,  for  example,  which  of  the  strength-related  features  is
necessary  or  sufficient  to  produce  the  particular  consequences,  es-
pecially  here  to  produce  the  desired  attitude-consistent  behaviors.
Although I spent most of my time this morning speaking as a re-
searcher who conducts experiments on attitude change, I also work
within  a  multi-disciplinary  group  of  energy  researchers  in  the  En-
ergy  Center  at  Purdue  University.  The  model  in  that  Center  is  to
build connections among social scientists from different disciplines,
psychology, economics, political science, consumer behavior, science
education,  and  others,  and  also  to  connect  those  researchers  with
the  technological  development  teams  and  bioenergy  hydrogen,  et
cetera.  This  integration  of  social  scientists,  natural  scientists,  and
engineers is valuable in moving the issues of economic viability and
technology adoption to the forefront of technology development. We
believe  that  addressing  the  social  obstacles  that  a  new  technology
is likely to face will help to build new technologies that find viable
markets  more  quickly  and  are  therefore  more  successful.  Both  the
basic  research  in  social  science  and  the  integration  of  this  science
with  technology  development  will  be  important  in  smoothing  the
behavioral pathways to a new energy economy. Unfortunately, both
basic  science  and  social  psychology  and  policy  and  behavioral  re-
search on energy per se remains under-funded at the federal level.
To conclude, the best new technology will not help us to address
the energy challenge unless the public adopts them. Therefore, the
coming  energy  transition  from  fossil  fuels  to  new  sustainable
sources  of  energy  will  consist  in  large  part  of  behavioral  changes
will  benefit  from  greater  research  to  understand  these  behavioral
changes  and  to  integrate  this  work  with  technology  development.

Thank you very much.
[The prepared statement of Dr. Wegener follows:]

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

19

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DUANE T. WEGENER

Abstract

The energy challenge is characterized by (a) a great need for development of new
technology,  and  (b)  a  need  for  unprecedented  changes  in  energy-related  behavior.
These behavior changes must occur at many levels, including investors, energy pro-
ducers  (including  those  in  the  supply  chain),  and  individual  consumers.  At  Purdue
University,  I  address  behavior  change  through  basic  research  on  attitudes,  persua-
sion,  and  behavior.  I  also  help  to  lead  an  initiative  in  the  Purdue  Energy  Center
that  focuses  on  social,  economic,  and  political/policy  factors  that  will  influence  the
behavioral  pathways  to  a  new  energy  economy.  By  interacting  directly  with  tech-
nology  development  teams,  my  colleagues  and  I  seek  to  identify  and  influence  the
barriers  that  new  energy  technologies  will  face.  By  integrating  social  science  with
technology  development,  we  believe  that  new  technologies  can  come  on-line  faster
and  more  smoothly.  The  challenge  for  completing  this  work  is  that  current  federal
funding  provides  strong  support  for  technology  pathways  but  provides  insufficient
support for research addressing the behavioral pathways. In the various sections of
my  written  testimony,  I  describe  my  activities  in  the  Purdue  Energy  Center,  the
available  funding  for  our  research,  the  existing  research  on  attitude  formation  and
change (including examples of recent research from my lab on attitudes toward nu-
clear power), and examples of relevant research questions that remain unanswered.

Chairman  Baird,  Ranking  Member  Ehlers,  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,
thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  on  the  Contribution  of  the  Social  Sciences
to  the  Energy  Challenge.  I  believe  that  the  social  sciences  will  play  a  crucial  role
in understanding and facilitating the behavioral pathways to a new, sustainable en-
ergy economy.

I was asked to address four sets of questions. They are listed, along with my writ-
ten  testimony,  in  the  following  sections.  In  order  to  facilitate  the  identification  of
responses  to  specific  questions,  I  have  included  headings  to  correspond  with  each
question in the question set.
1. Please  describe  your  involvement  in  the  Purdue  Energy  Center,  and  in
particular  the  mission  and  goals  of  the  Social,  Economic,  and  Political
Aspects  of  Energy  Use  and  Policy  team  of  the  Center.  How  and  to  what
degree  does  your  team  interact  and  collaborate  with  the  technology
teams at the Center?

Involvement in the Center

I  serve  as  one  of  three  Initiative  Leaders  for  the  area  of  Social,  Economic,  and
Political Aspects of Energy Use and Policy (SEPAE). The other two initiative leaders
are Wallace Tyner (a Professor of Agricultural Economics) and Glenn Parker (a Dis-
tinguished  Professor  of  Political  Science).  Included  in  the  initiative  leader  role,  we
each  also  serve  as  a  member  of  the  Executive  Board  of  the  Energy  Center  (a  deci-
sion-making body that meets quarterly). Our work as initiative leaders is multi-fac-
eted.  Because  a  primary  goal  for  the  Energy  Center  in  general  is  to  build  new
transdisciplinary  research  teams,  we  have  been  working  to  inform  one  another
about  the  research  we  do  in  each  of  our  respective  disciplines.  We  have  also  been
working to build connections to the various technology-development initiatives with-
in  the  Center.  Finally,  as  initiative  leaders,  we  work  to  organize  responses  to  calls
for  research  proposals.  Much  of  the  early  effort  has  been  aimed  at  federal  research
dollars,  but  we  have  also  attempted  to  make  connections  with  State  government,
utilities  that  operate  in  the  state,  and,  to  a  lesser  degree,  with  private  foundations
(more on this in response to Question #2 from the Committee).
The Mission of the SEPAE Group within the Energy Center

The mission of the SEPAE group is directly related to the topic of today’s hearing.
We  seek  to  extend  research  and  theory  from  the  social  sciences  to  the  topics  of  en-
ergy technology, energy use, and policy. In other words, SEPAE faculty work to ad-
dress drivers and obstacles faced by new energy technologies (especially those stud-
ied within the other Energy Center research initiatives). The purpose of the SEPAE
research is to increase the ultimate effectiveness of technology development by per-
forming  simultaneous  analyses  of  economics,  policy  alternatives,  public/political
technology  acceptance,  and  energy-related  decision-making.  Each  of  these  factors
should feed into energy-related behaviors, including investment by companies or in-
dividuals,  use  of  new  energy-related  products,  and  support  for  policy-makers  who
champion particular energy policies.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

20

We  believe  that  these  efforts  are  crucial  in  managing  the  necessary  transition
away  from  previous  technologies  that  are  ultimately  unsustainable  (and,  in  many
forms, polluting) and to the use of new, sustainable energy technologies. The reality
is  that  any  new  energy  technology  is  likely  to  start  with  a  variety  of  competitive
disadvantages.  Potential  long-term  sources  of  clean  energy,  such  as  the  promised
hydrogen  economy,  will  require  new  infrastructure  for  storage,  transportation,  and
fuel delivery. Even energy sources that potentially piggyback on existing infrastruc-
ture  (such  as  generation  of  liquid  fuels  via  clean  coal  technologies  or  biomass)  re-
quire  new  processing  facilities  and  pose  new  logistical  challenges  as  they  seek  to
compete economically with currently dominant energy sources (i.e., fossil fuels).

Every  step  in  the  process  will  depend  on  a  combination  of  social,  economic,  and
political  forces.  Uninformed  (and  perhaps  even  informed)  citizens  may  continue  to
favor  cheap  and  familiar  sources  of  energy.  Suppliers  of  that  energy  may  also  at-
tempt  to  forestall  widespread  adoption  of  alternative  energy  sources.  Yet,  citizens
concerned  about  issues  such  as  security,  environmental  preservation,  and  support
for  local  economic  development  may  be  willing  to  pay  the  premium  necessary  to
fully  develop  new  energy  sources  that  can  ultimately  compete  with  fossil  fuels.  For
many  new  energy  technologies,  new  regulatory  statutes  and  bodies  will  be  nec-
essary,  and  policies  governing  the  economic  risks  for  investors  will  have  direct  ef-
fects on whether private investment occurs and to what extent. As the next genera-
tion  of  energy  sources  comes  online,  customer  acceptance  may  also  determine  the
extent  to  which  policy-makers  and  industry  support  the  widespread  development,
and ultimately the economic feasibility, of the new technologies.

Unfortunately,  in  many  cases,  simply  waiting  for  the  development  of  a  commer-
cially viable product may be too late. For example, some promising technologies are
being developed for use of plants that are genetically modified to increase their effi-
ciency (and environmental friendliness) in production of biofuels. However, no regu-
latory system exists for the commercial use of those plants for production of biofuel.
If  the  technology  progresses  to  the  point  of  becoming  economically  viable,  but  no
regulatory  process  is  put  in  place,  it  could  create  years  worth  of  delays  before  the
new plants can be productively used in the marketplace. Of course, this anticipated
delay  and  the  associated  uncertainty  could  deter  private  investment  in  the  tech-
nology.  And  the  building  of  a  regulatory  system  is  likely  to  depend  on  both  public
and  political  perceptions  of  the  new  technology  (e.g.,  in  terms  of  its  impact  on  the
surrounding community and on the environment more generally).

Research  addressing  the  social,  economic,  and  political  factors  that  influence  de-
velopment  and  adoption  of  new  technologies  will  help  the  technology  researcher  to
create technologies that face fewer obstacles. For example, public or political opposi-
tion to use of a genetically-modified plant in biofuel production might be based pri-
marily  in  the  concern  that  the  modified  gene  will  spread  to  native  species  (see  Goy
&  Duesing,  1996;  Meilan,  2004).  If  so,  then  creation  of  sterile  versions  of  the  plant
might  face  less  public  and  political  opposition.  In  this  type  of  situation,  therefore,
attention  to  social  and  political  factors  might  identify  issues  that  can  be  addressed
in advance by technology developers, and the new technology can avoid an obstacle
that would threaten the economic viability of the technology.

In other settings, identification of obstacles or drivers for adoption might identify
effective  means  of  educating  or  persuading  the  public  or  policy-makers  about  the
benefits  of  the  new  technology.  This  could  ease  the  creation  of  regulatory  systems
friendly to the new technology or could ease the zoning and approval of new plants
using  the  technology.  Therefore,  in  a  variety  of  situations,  the  economic  viability  of
the  new  technology  might  be  enhanced  by  early  attention  to  social,  economic,  and
political/policy matters.
Interaction with Technology Teams

The integration of SEPAE topics with the technology development teams differen-
tiates  Purdue  University’s  Energy  Center  from  many  others  across  the  country.
Ideally,  the  SEPAE  topics  will  eventually  be  pursued  across  each  of  the  other  re-
search  areas  within  the  center  (including  initiatives  in  Clean  Coal,  Solar,  Bio-,
Wind,  Electrochemical,  Power  Electronics,  Hydrogen,  and  Nuclear  areas  of  energy
technology).

These  integrative  efforts  have  yielded  a  number  of  successes  in  the  brief  time
since  the  Energy  Center’s  inception.  For  example,  a  team  of  researchers  inves-
tigating production of biofuels from trees recently received a $1.4 million grant from
the  Feedstock  Genomics  program  at  the  Department  of  Energy  (DOE  Grant  #  DE–
FG02–06ER64301;  through  the  Office  of  Science,  Office  of  Biological  and  Environ-
mental  Research).  In  the  grant  proposal,  the  Principal  Investigators  noted  the  con-
nections  between  SEPAE  research  in  the  Center  and  their  research  on  biofuel  pro-
duction,  and  these  connections  were  noted  as  a  strong  feature  of  the  proposal  in

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

21

panel  reviews  of  the  biofuel  grant.  The  SEPAE  activities  were  not  funded  in  the
DOE grant, but other recent efforts are beginning to produce funding for the SEPAE
activities.

Recently,  a  team  of  SEPAE  researchers  submitted  a  grant  application  to  the  Na-
tional  Science  Foundation  program  on  Human  Social  Dynamics,  and  this  grant  has
been recommended for funding (for $750,000 over three years, beginning in January
2008).  The  grant  addresses  social,  economic,  and  political  aspects  of  U.S.  Ethanol
Policy.  In  particular,  the  research  supported  by  the  grant  will  examine  (a)  the  eco-
nomics  of  the  seven  most  likely  ethanol  policy  options,  (b)  public  and  political  per-
ceptions  of  the  ethanol  policies  (including  comparisons  between  public  perceptions
and  those  of  policy-makers  in  states  that  ban  use  of  genetically-modified  plants  for
biofuel production or not), and (c) the influences of attitudes and values on individ-
uals’ energy-related decision-making.

I am the Principal Investigator for that grant, along with Wallace Tyner (in Agri-
cultural  Economics)  and  Leigh  Raymond  (in  Political  Science)  as  Co-Investigators.
In  addition,  however,  the  research  team  includes  consultants  in  Psychological
Sciences  (Professor  Janice  Kelly),  Biochemistry  (Distinguished  Professor  Clinton
Chapple), Forestry and Natural Resources (Associate Professor Richard Meilan), and
Economics  (Professor  Timothy  Cason).  Therefore,  the  research  team  for  this  project
includes researchers from across the areas of SEPAE, as well as Principal Investiga-
tors (Chapple and Meilan) from the DOE grant on biofuel production mentioned ear-
lier.

As  these  two  grants  would  imply,  our  interactions  thus  far  have  been  closest  be-
tween SEPAE and the BioEnergy initiative. We have also made some initial connec-
tions with the Hydrogen and Clean Coal initiatives, though not to the same extent.
Other  than  these  three  areas,  most  of  the  interaction  among  areas  of  the  Center
has  taken  place  in  the  Executive  Board  meetings,  where  each  initiative  leader  de-
scribes the current efforts for their initiative. It is clear from our initial efforts that
the  creation  of  transdiciplinary  teams  involves  a  good  deal  of  ‘‘start  up’’  costs.  It
takes time and effort, not only in developing potential research questions of common
interest,  but  then  also  attempting  to  find  sources  of  funding  that  would  be  inter-
ested in supporting research on those questions.

Researchers in the energy technology areas are naturally focused on the work re-
quired  to  develop  those  technologies,  and  only  some  express  interest  in  integration
of  SEPAE  topics  with  technology  development.  In  some  cases,  the  researchers  be-
lieve  that  public  acceptance  of  the  new  technology  must  simply  consist  of  making
them aware of the benefits of the technology (whether the benefits be related to cost,
environmental preservation, or security). However, as many of the committee mem-
bers  may  routinely  experience  in  their  role  as  policy-makers,  public  acceptance  is
often influenced by a variety of factors that may, on the face of it, appear less than
rational.  In  the  energy  domain,  many  new  technologies  that  appear  to  have  advan-
tages  over  older  technologies  (e.g.,  in  decreased  pollution),  are  nonetheless  opposed
by nearby residents (the prevalent ‘‘not-in-my-back-yard’’ problem). This is certainly
true  for  nuclear  energy  (Rankin,  Nealy,  &  Melber,  1984;  Rosa  &  Dunlap,  1994).  A
local  example  in  Southern  Indiana  provided  a  similar  situation  when  community
members  opposed  a  new  coal-based  power  plant  using  updated  technology  capable
of  cutting  pollution  to  a  small  fraction  of  that  emitted  by  the  coal-based  plant  to
be  replaced  (despite  the  fact  that  the  new  plant  would  create  more  than  ten  times
the amount of energy of the old plant).

Therefore, it seems crucial to understand the human aspects of energy-related be-
havior and to take those aspects into account in the technology development process.
In order to do this, it may require directed investment on the part of funding agen-
cies  or  energy  centers  to  build  and  maintain  these  transdisciplinary  collaborations.
2. How much support do you and your colleagues in this area get from fed-
eral  funding  agencies?  Have  you  sought  any  support  from  or  partner-
ships with public or private utilities or other non-governmental entities?

Support from Federal Funding Agencies

A  number  of  SEPAE  faculty  have  been  successful  in  recent  competitions  for  fed-
eral  research  support.  However,  this  success  comes  despite  a  relative  lack  of  avail-
able funds for SEPAE research.

There  are  at  least  a  couple  of  standpoints  from  which  to  answer  this  question.

One is from the point of view of energy researchers per se.
For Energy Research

As  noted  earlier,  the  SEPAE  group  has  been  successful  of  late  in  obtaining  fund-
ing from the Human Social Dynamics (HSD) program of the National Science Foun-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

22

dation  (NSF).  However,  this  program  is,  by  no  means,  focused  on  problems  related
to  energy  per  se.  Therefore,  it  is  not  a  surprise  that  relatively  little  of  the  funding
through  this  program  supports  energy-related  research.  Over  the  four  years  of  the
HSD program, a number of the awards support projects focused on influences of cli-
mate change, but very few deal directly with energy or new energy technologies.

In addition to the NSF funding, SEPAE member Wallace Tyner was also success-
ful  in  a  recent  Department  of  Energy  (DOE)  competition  for  research  proposals  in
Ethical,  Legal,  and  Societal  Implications  (ELSI)  of  Research  on  Alternative  Bio-
energy Technologies, Synthetic Genomics, or Nonotechnologies. This grant, set to re-
ceive  $660,000  over  three  years,  seeks  to  ‘‘develop  realistic  assessments  of  the  eco-
nomic and environmental impacts of regional and global policies designed to stimu-
late  bioenergy  production  and  use.’’  Professor  Tyner,  who  led  the  proposal,  was
joined  by  Tom  Hertel,  Distinguished  Professor  of  Agricultural  Economics,  and
Quinlai  Zhuang,  Professor  of  Earth  and  Atmospheric  Sciences  and  Agronomy.  This
was  a  new  program  for  the  DOE,  and  it  funded  proposals  for  a  total  of  $1  million
during  fiscal  year  2007  (approximately  five  total  grants  of  the  size  of  the  Tyner,
Hertel,  &  Zhuang  proposal).  Therefore,  unless  this  program  or  something  like  it  is
expanded quite a lot, the federal funding aimed specifically at social, economic, and
political aspects of energy use or policy seems quite limited.

It  is  also  true  that  none  of  the  current  National  Energy  Laboratories  involve  the
study  of  social,  economic,  or  political/policy  dimensions  of  energy  technology.  Thus,
if Congress sees potential benefits in specifically funding energy-related research ad-
dressing  social,  economic,  and  political/policy  factors,  this  may  require  changes  in
the structure or priorities of federal funding sources. One model would be to set up
a national center (a national lab) for the social-scientific study of energy. If benefits
are  seen  in  the  direct  integration  of  this  research  with  technology  development,  it
would be important for this center to be closely associated with either a technology-
oriented national lab or energy center. Yet another model would be to provide find-
ing  for  competitions  within  existing  funding  structures  (e.g.,  through  the  DOE  or
even  NSF)  that  focus  on  the  social-scientific  influences  on  energy  use,  policy,  and
technology.  Again,  if  benefits  are  seen  in  integration  of  this  research  with  tech-
nology  development,  specific  calls  could  be  made  for  transdisciplinary  work  on  the
topic (within either the current DOE focus on technology development or NSF inter-
disciplinary programs).
For Basic Science

A  second  standpoint  for  answering  this  question  comes  from  my  work  as  a  basic
(laboratory-based)  researcher  on  processes  involved  in  attitude  formation  and
change.  As  discussed  in  more  detail  in  response  to  Question  #3,  basic  research  on
attitudes  and  attitude  change  seeks  to  identify  psychological  processes  that  gener-
alize  across  many  specific  content  domains  (including,  but  by  no  means  limited  to
energy-related  topics).  Because  attitudes  have  potent  influences  on  behavior,  atti-
tude change provides one of the best mechanisms for influencing energy-use behav-
ior  (and  behaviors  in  a  variety  of  other  domains,  such  as  health,  civic  engagement,
environmental preservation, etc.).

In energy and other domains, it would make little sense to fund research on appli-
cations (such as chemical processes involved in making liquid fuels from coal) with-
out continuing to fund basic research (such as the actions of a catalyst on reactions
that  occur  with  controlled  concentrations  of  certain  chemicals).  Yet,  whether  in-
tended or not, this is what has happened at the National Institutes of Health (NIH)
for research on attitudes and attitude change (and for Social Psychology generally—
the discipline in which most psychological research on attitudes occurs).

Indeed, over the years, the National Institute of Mental Health (NIMH) has been
the  single  largest  funding  source  for  basic  research  in  social  psychology  (and  atti-
tude  change).  This  continued  to  be  true  until  a  few  years  ago.  Since  that  time,
NIMH  funding  for  social  psychological  research  has  virtually  dried  up,  because
NIMH has decided that basic research in all areas of social psychology (not only at-
titudes  and  attitude  change)  is  not  sufficiently  related  to  severe  mental  illnesses.
Although NIH continues to fund applied research into specific conditions or diseases
(e.g., cancer, drug abuse), there is concern from the scientific community that fund-
ing for basic (cross-content) research on the relevant behavioral processes is insuffi-
cient.  This  has  occurred  despite  the  fact  that  Congress  has  repeatedly  requested
that NIH increase its support for basic behavioral research.

The  reader  might  wonder  how  this  decrease  in  funding  is  related  to  research  on
energy  per  se.  When  basic  research  is  not  funded,  this  reduces  advances  in  theory
and research relevant to many applied domains. For example, as I describe in more
detail later, my colleagues and I recently conducted research on implications of atti-
tudinal  ambivalence  for  attitude  change.  In  that  research,  we  found  the  same  pat-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

23

tern  of  results  for  a  health-related  topic  (proposed  taxing  of  junk  food)  and  an  en-
ergy-related  topic  (proposed  building  of  nuclear  power  plants).  Thus,  decreases  in
funding  for  basic  research  decreases  knowledge  that  can  benefit  many  (seemingly
unrelated) areas of applied interest.

It is true that NSF continues to fund basic research in social psychology generally
(and attitude change in particular). Unfortunately, because the NSF budget has not
increased,  overall  support  for  basic  research  on  attitudes  and  attitude  change  (and
for  research  on  social  and  cognitive  processes  in  general)  has  markedly  decreased
and remains severely under-funded.
Support from Non-Governmental Entities

In the first two years of the Energy Center, SEPAE efforts at seeking funding for
our  research  have  focused  on  federal  funding  sources  (though,  as  discussed  earlier,
relatively few federal dollars are specifically aimed at the types of research we con-
duct). One reason for this is undoubtedly that most of the researchers gathering as
members of SEPAE have had their previous research supported primarily by federal
dollars.

We  have  made  some  attempts,  and  are  continuing  to  do  so,  in  other  areas,  how-
ever.  Our  few  contacts  with  energy  utilities  thus  far  have  been  channeled  back  to
regulatory  decisions  pending  with  the  Indiana  Utility  Regulatory  Commission.  One
regulatory  settlement  occurred  recently  in  the  area  of  natural  gas  to  support  anal-
ysis  of  a  demand-side  (energy  conservation)  program.  Unfortunately,  the  structure
and  funding  included  in  that  settlement  would  not  support  the  kinds  of  research
that we conduct in the SEPAE group. Although we are certainly open to direct work
with  utilities,  we  have  not  identified  other  opportunities  for  funding  our  research
in this way.

In  other  areas  of  the  Center,  there  are  close  ties  with  Indiana  State  Government
(especially  in  supporting  research  for  how  to  use  Indiana  coal  in  environmentally
responsible ways). However, we have not yet identified a State government funding
mechanism for SEPAE research.

Just  in  the  past  couple  of  weeks,  we  have  also  had  SEPAE  members  (Tyner  and
Wegener)  meeting  with  a  broad  group  of  Purdue  University  researchers  to  discuss
a  proposal  to  a  private  foundation.  This  foundation  is  consulting  with  various  Uni-
versities  on  possible  projects  that  address  agriculture  and  the  environment  (a  Pur-
due  proposal  would  likely  address  the  environmental  impact  of  biofuels,  with  a
heavy emphasis on changing land use behaviors). These foundation connections are
new  for  us  and  may  take  some  time  to  cultivate.  The  exploration  of  new  funding
sources  is  certainly  one  type  of  ‘‘start  up’’  cost  involved  in  the  building  of
transdisciplinary research teams to address important societal problems.
3. What  has  social  science  research  revealed  about  factors  that  influence
how  Americans  form  attitudes  relevant  to  energy  use  and  policy?  How
can this research be used more effectively to inform policy?

Influencing Attitudes

I  have  to  answer  this  question  from  the  standpoint  of  a  social  psychologist,  with-
out claiming to be an expert in all areas of social science relevant to attitude forma-
tion and change. One interesting aspect of the social psychological literature on atti-
tudes  and  persuasion  is  that  it  is  designed  to  be  basic  science,  identifying  general
psychological  properties  that  are  applicable  to  attitudes  about  different  people,  ob-
jects, or policies. Therefore, in most social psychological research on attitude change,
the  same  effects  and  processes  are  shown  to  occur  for  two  or  more  topics.  In  many
cases, these topics are not directly energy-related, but there is little reason to expect
that  the  processes  identified  would  not  also  occur  when  the  attitudes  are  about  en-
ergy use or energy policy.

Research  on  attitudes  and  attitude  change  has  been  a  core  part  of  social  psy-
chology since the 1930s. G. W. Allport (1935) first called attitude social psychology’s
most  indispensable  construct,  but  this  is  arguably  still  true  today.  This  is  because
attitudes  (one’s  overall  evaluations  of  people,  objects,  or  issues)  are  pervasive  and
functional  (see  Maio  &  Olson,  2000b;  Pratkanis,  Breckler,  &  Greenwald,  1989).  For
example,  attitudes  predict  behavior  when  controlling  for  other  psychological  con-
structs,  such  as  values  (Homer  &  Kahle,  1988)  and  subjective  norms  (Ajzen  &
Fishbein,  1970,  2005).  Indeed,  it  is  partly  because  attitudes  are  capable  of  influ-
encing  behaviors  that  researchers  became  interested  in  techniques  used  to  change
attitudes.

It is beyond the scope of the current testimony to provide a comprehensive review
of  the  last  80  years  of  research  and  theory  in  this  area.  Therefore,  I  will  provide
only  a  brief  summary  to  provide  examples  of  common  variables  and  processes  that

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

24

have been studied. The reader can see Petty and Cacioppo (1981/1996) for an acces-
sible (undergraduate level) overview of attitudes and persuasion. Petty and Wegener
(1998) and Wegener and Carlston (2005) provide more recent reviews.

I  divide  my  current  summary  into  sections  on  classes  of  variables  studied,  com-
mon processes in message-based persuasion, and examples of research from my lab
that has addressed attitudes toward nuclear power.
Classes of Variables that Influence Attitudes

Factors  involved  in  message-based  attitude  change  (of  the  type  involved  in  mass
communications,  such  as  advertising)  have  included  characteristics  of  the  source  of
the  message,  characteristics  of  the  message  itself,  characteristics  of  the  recipient  of
the message, and characteristics of the context in which people receive the message
(see Petty & Wegener, 1998). Prevalent source characteristics include the credibility
(expertise  and  trustworthiness),  attractiveness  (likability),  and  power  of  the  source.
Prevalent message characteristics include the position of the message (i.e., relatively
agreeable or disagreeable to the message recipient) and the quality and quantity of
arguments used in the message. Other message features include framing of the mes-
sage (e.g., stating the message in positive terms, such as ‘‘if you stop smoking, you’ll
live  longer,’’  or  negative  terms,  such  as  ‘‘if  you  smoke,  you  will  die  sooner’’)  or  the
order in which opposing messages are encountered. Recipient characteristics include
characteristics  of  the  attitudes  message  recipients  already  hold,  demographic  char-
acteristics,  and  personality  of  the  person  receiving  the  message.  Finally,  context
variables include the level of distraction created by competing activities, the modal-
ity  (e.g.,  written,  audio)  through  which  the  message  is  received,  and  the  uplifting
or depressing setting surrounding the persuasive message (which could also be con-
sidered as creating differences in the mood state of message recipients).
Persuasion Processes

In  addition  to  the  many  individual  variables  that  have  been  studied,  a  variety  of
psychological  processes  have  been  identified  to  determine  when  and  how  the  vari-
ables  influence  attitudes.  Many  of  the  persuasion  processes  can  be  organized  using
the Elaboration Likelihood Model (ELM; Petty & Cacioppo, 1986b; Petty & Wegener,
1999).  The  ELM  organizes  persuasion  processes  according  to  how  much  people  are
thinking  about  (elaborating  on)  the  available  information  about  the  person,  object,
or topic of interest.

High-elaboration  (thoughtful)  processes.  The  message  recipient  is  likely  to  think
more about available information when highly motivated (e.g., because the message
topic  is  important  or  personally  relevant  to  the  recipient)  and  able  to  do  so  (e.g.,
because environmental distractions are minimal; see Petty & Wegener, 1998). When
elaboration  (thinking)  is  high,  message  recipients  are  likely  to  generate  many  eval-
uative thoughts about the information, and these thoughts are responsible for influ-
ences of the available information on attitudes (see Wegener, Downing, Krosnick, &
Petty, 1995). In these types of situations, argument quality is likely to be an impor-
tant determinant of attitude change. If arguments are compelling, attitudes become
more  favorable,  but  if  arguments  are  weak,  then  little  attitude  change  occurs.  In
contrast,  if  motivation  or  ability  to  think  is  lacking,  argument  quality  has  little  ef-
fect on attitudes (e.g., Petty, Cacioppo, & Goldman, 1981).

When  thinking  carefully  about  available  information,  message  recipients  are  also
likely to actively assess the evaluative implications of available information by ‘‘cal-
culating’’  the  likelihood  and  desirability  of  presented  information.  For  example,  a
statement in a message might say that a particular political candidate favors higher
subsidies  for  producers  of  ethanol  that  use  cellulosic  feedstocks  (e.g.,  grasses  or
trees) than for producers that use corn. When thinking carefully about the informa-
tion, message recipients assess the likelihood that the candidate strongly favors the
policy and their own perceived desirability of the policy (and attitudes are calculated
by multiplying likelihood perceptions and desirability perceptions; Fishbein & Ajzen,
1975). Thus, differences in the quality of arguments can be created by changing the
likelihood or desirability components of the statements (Petty & Wegener, 1991).

Low-elaboration  (non-thoughtful)  processes.  As  noted  earlier,  effortful  elaboration
(thinking)  is  less  likely  when  motivation  or  ability  to  think  is  lacking  (e.g.,  because
the attitude issue is not likely to affect the message recipient or the message is en-
countered  when  the  person  must  also  pay  attention  to  competing  activities).  When
this  occurs,  attitudes  can  still  be  formed  or  can  change,  but  by  using  ‘‘short  cut’’
(heuristic) strategies that take less cognitive effort.

For  example,  attitudes  can  be  influenced  by  classical  conditioning,  in  which  posi-
tive or negative stimuli are simply associated with the attitude object. In fact, many
advertisements  use  this  type  of  strategy  by  associating  pleasant  music  or  scenery
with a product, even when the music or scenery is utterly irrelevant to the qualities

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

25

of the product. On a related note, people might also use a ‘‘How do I feel about it?’’
heuristic,  in  which  they  mistake  feelings  created  by  an  unrelated  activity  (such  as
the  weather  outside  or  watching  a  happy  or  sad  movie)  as  being  reactions  to  the
attitude object or issue (see Clore & Schnall, 2005).

Other  relatively  simple  processes  include  familiarity-based  liking  of  objects  that
one  has  seen  often  (even  if  seen  so  briefly  that  one  cannot  report  whether  one  has
previously seen the object or not; Kunst-Wilson & Zajonc, 1980). One reason for this
mere  exposure  effect  may  be  that  ease  in  perceiving  the  object  (because  it  has  been
seen before) is experienced positively (Winkielman & Cacioppo, 2001).

When  heuristics  are  used  to  quickly  and  easily  determine  what  one’s  attitude
should be, source characteristics (‘‘I should agree with people I like’’) that are irrele-
vant  to  the  primary  features  of  the  object  may,  nonetheless,  influence  people’s  atti-
tudes  (see  Petty  &  Wegener,  1998).  The  impact  of  these  peripheral  aspects  of  the
communication  is  likely  to  be  different,  however,  when  thinking  a  lot  about  avail-
able  information.  In  such  circumstances  (when  people  are  paying  close  attention  to
the  qualities  of  information  about  the  object),  the  influence  of  peripheral  aspects  of
the  persuasive  attempt  should  be  minimized  (Petty  &  Cacioppo,  1986b;  Petty  &
Wegener, 1999).

General  ELM  principles.  Therefore,  the  ELM  framework  explains  when  commu-
nicators  would  expect  peripheral  aspects  of  a  communication  to  influence  attitudes
(when motivation or ability to think is low) and when they should not (when motiva-
tion  and  ability  are  high).  This  would  explain  why  some  relatively  peripheral  fea-
tures, like the physical attractiveness of the message source, influences attitudes in
some  situations  (low  motivation  or  ability),  but  not  in  others  (high  motivation  and
ability; Puckett, Petty, Cacioppo, & Fisher, 1983). In contrast, when motivation and
ability  to  think  are  high,  the  quality  of  arguments  provided  in  the  message  should
have  strong  effects  on  recipient  thoughts  and  attitudes.  But  when  motivation  or
ability  is  lacking,  the  quality  of  arguments  should  have  little  effect  (Petty  &
Cacioppo, 1986b).

Persuasion is not so simple as to say that any one variable can only influence per-
suasion  when  people  are  thinking  a  lot  or  a  little,  however.  For  example,  consider
a communication given by an expert source (e.g., a Princeton Professor of Education
advocating a new educational policy; Petty et al., 1981). The expertise of the source
can  be  used  as  a  relatively  simple  ‘‘peripheral  cue’’  when  thinking  is  minimal  (‘‘I
should  agree  with  experts’’).  However,  source  expertise  can  also  influence  attitudes
when people are thinking carefully, if the right conditions exist. For example, if the
available information is somewhat ambiguous (open to interpretation), then, as peo-
ple  think  carefully  about  the  information,  it  may  be  interpreted  more  positively  if
provided  by  an  expert  rather  than  a  non-expert  (Chaiken  &  Maheswaran,  1994).
The idea that the same persuasion variable can influence attitudes for different rea-
sons  as  the  level  of  elaboration  (thinking)  increases  from  low  to  high  levels  is  re-
ferred  to  as  the  variable  serving  ‘‘multiple  roles’’  in  persuasion  (see  Petty  &
Wegener, 1998, 1999).

Perhaps the key reason that researchers pay close attention to the level of think-
ing by research participants is that the level of thinking determines how consequen-
tial  the  resulting  attitude  will  be.  When  attitudes  are  formed  or  changed  in  more
thoughtful  ways,  they  last  longer  over  time,  they  better  resist  future  attempts  at
change, and they serve as stronger guides for future thoughts and behaviors (Petty,
Haugtvedt,  &  Smith,  1995;  Wegener,  Petty,  Smoak,  &  Fabrigar,  2004).  Of  course,
when  seeking  to  influence  the  use  of  energy  by  consumers  or  the  purchase  of  en-
ergy-efficient  products,  it  would  be  important  not  only  to  create  attitudes  favorable
toward those behaviors, but to create attitudes strong enough to influence those be-
haviors.
Examples of Attitudes toward Nuclear Power

Consistent with my basic science orientation, over the years, I and my colleagues
have  used  a  variety  of  message  topics  in  studying  attitude  change.  In  a  number  of
cases,  however,  we  have  used  messages  that  propose  the  building  of  new  nuclear
power  plants.  Let  me  given  some  examples  of  specific  research  questions  that  have
guided portions of this work.

Values  and  information  processing.  For  many  years,  attitudes  researchers  have
associated  ‘‘strong’’  attitudes  (i.e.,  those  that  resist  change  and  influence  behavior)
with attitudes that express or connect directly to one’s cherished values (e.g., Sherif
&  Cantril,  1947;  Maio  &  Olson,  2000a).  For  example,  in  one  early  program  of  re-
search,  Ostrom  and  Brock  (1969)  asked  message  recipients  to  consider  a  message
in  relation  to  values  the  recipients  viewed  as  personally  important  or  unimportant.
After  measuring  attitudes,  Ostrom  and  Brock  presented  an  opposing  message  at-
tempting  to  change  the  newly  formed  attitudes  and  found  that  attitudes  initially

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

26

formed while considering important values were more resistant to change than atti-
tudes formed while considering unimportant values. This result was viewed as con-
sistent with ‘‘value expressive’’ or ‘‘value linked’’ attitudes being stronger if the val-
ues are important to people.

However,  this  ‘‘structural’’  view  of  value  effects  on  attitude  strength  is  not  the
only  possibility.  As  mentioned  earlier,  from  an  ELM  point  of  view,  increases  in
thinking  about  the  issue  can  also  result  in  strong  attitudes  (Wegener  et  al.,  2004).
Therefore,  it  seemed  plausible  that  thinking  about  important  rather  than  unimpor-
tant  values  might  make  the  issue  seem  more  important  or  interesting,  and  this  in-
creased thinking might be responsible for the creation of stronger attitudes. Indeed,
in a series of studies, consideration of important values led to higher levels of infor-
mation  processing  than  consideration  of  unimportant  values,  and  this  amount  of
thinking was responsible for the strength (resistance to change) of the resulting atti-
tudes  (Blankenship  &  Wegener,  in  press).  Measures  designed  to  tap  ‘‘value  expres-
sion’’ showed that the increases in thinking per se did not create attitudes that ‘‘ex-
pressed’’ the values, as assumed by Ostrom and Brock (1969) and Sherif and Cantril
(1947).

One  important  feature  of  the  values  and  processing  work  is  that  consideration  of
important values increases processing of information about topics viewed as utterly
irrelevant  to  message  recipients.  For  example,  a  number  of  the  studies  addressed
proposed  admission  of  an  Eastern-European  country  into  the  European  Union  (a
topic  participants  viewed  as  quite  irrelevant  to  them),  and  one  of  the  studies  pro-
posed  the  building  of  nuclear  power  plants  in  Canada  (another  topic  of  relatively
little relevance to our message recipients).

As  described  in  the  ELM  sections  earlier,  topics  of  low  personal  relevance  typi-
cally  receive  little  thinking,  and  attitudes  produced  (by  mostly  peripheral  means)
are  not  very  consequential.  However,  in  many  domains  (such  as  health,  where  peo-
ple  often  view  consequences  of  negative  health  behaviors  as  unlikely  to  occur  for
them),  practitioners  would  want  people  to  think  about  and  form  consequential  atti-
tudes  on  those  topics.  Asking  people  to  consider  important  values  (or  even  briefly
presenting the values prior to message presentation, Blankenship, 2006) may be one
easy  way  to  get  people  to  think  about  topics  they  would  otherwise  ignore  (often  to
their own peril).

Another  applied  implication  is  that  persuasive  messages  about  non-threatening,
personally irrelevant topics might be useful in creating attitudes that impact percep-
tions  and  behavior  on  more  relevant  topics.  For  example,  people  start  out  as  less
favorable  toward  the  building  of  a  nuclear  power  plant  in  their  community  than
they  are  toward  nuclear  power  in  general  (Rankin,  Nealy,  &  Melber,  1984;  Rosa  &
Dunlap,  1994).  But  messages  about  nuclear  power  in  general  or  in  distant  places
(where less inherent resistance exists) may be viewed by message recipients as irrel-
evant  to  them  and  unworthy  of  their  attention.  A  technique  such  as  consideration
of  important  values  might  prove  helpful.  It  can  use  the  low-relevance  topic,  where
initial  resistance  to  the  message  is  relatively  low,  but  because  the  technique  can
produce high levels of processing, the attitudes produced are then harder to change
and  more  likely  to  guide  later  decisions  and  behavior.  It  may  be,  therefore,  that
thoughtful  persuasion  of  the  benefits  of  nuclear  power  in  Canada  could  be  useful
in lessening the public resistance to widespread development of nuclear power closer
to home.

Message order effects. The ordering of different messages has also been of interest
for many years (e.g., Lund, 1925; Hovland & Mandell, 1957), but results have been
mixed.  Sometimes  the  first  message  encountered  is  more  persuasive  (a  primacy  ef-
fect, e.g., Lund, 1925), and sometimes the second/last message received is more per-
suasive (a recency effect, e.g., Hovland & Mandell, 1957). Summarizing the work to
date, Hovland (1957) speculated that primacy might be most likely when presenting
information on an unfamiliar/novel topic. Although research on message order flour-
ished  in  the  early  1960s,  results  continued  to  be  mixed,  with  a  number  of  results
inconsistent with Hovland’s (1957) contentions (see Lana, 1961; Rosnow & Robinson,
1967). As recently as 1993, a prominent attitudes text (Eagly & Chaiken, 1993) ex-
pressed  pessimism  that  consistent  message  order  effects  would  be  discovered  any-
time soon.

However, consistent predictions could be made using the ELM notion that higher
levels  of  information  processing  should  lead  to  stronger  attitudes  that  are  more  re-
sistant  to  change.  In  a  pair  of  studies  reported  by  Haugtvedt  and  Wegener  (1994),
we showed that high levels of personal relevance consistently lead to primacy effects
(greater  impact  of  the  first  message),  and  low  levels  of  personal  relevance  lead  to
recency  effects  (greater  impact  of  the  second/last  message).  Consistent  with  the
ELM theorizing, greater processing of the first message should create stronger atti-
tudes  prior  to  receiving  the  second  message.  With  stronger  attitudes  (when  proc-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

27

essing  of  the  first  message  is  high  rather  than  low),  the  message  recipient  is  able
to  resist  the  second  message,  resulting  in  primacy.  In  contrast,  when  attitudes  fol-
lowing the first message are weak, the second message is able to exert more persua-
sive impact (for additional discussion, see Haugtvedt & Wegener, 1994).

These effects were found when the two messages favored and opposed the building
of  nuclear  power  plants  (when  high  relevance  conditions  suggested  that  the  plants
be built in the message recipients’ own and nearby states, and low relevance condi-
tions suggested that the plants be built in distant states). Consistent with the basic
science approach of generalizing the effects across different types of topics, the same
effects  were  also  found  using  a  proposal  for  an  educational  policy  (i.e.,  institution
of senior comprehensive exams for graduating seniors, Petty & Cacioppo, 1986a).

Ambivalence  and  processing.  Finally,  a  recent  set  of  research  studies  has  exam-
ined  the  effects  of  attitude  ambivalence  on  information  processing.  Ambivalence  oc-
curs when people realize that there are both positive and negative aspects of an atti-
tude  object  or  policy.  For  example,  people  might  believe  that  nuclear  power  is  good
because  of  the  lack  of  greenhouse  gas  emissions,  but  is  bad  because  of  the  radio-
active waste.

Research on persuasion has shown that people tend to think carefully about infor-
mation on topics about which they are ambivalent (Maio, Bell, & Esses, 1996). One
way  to  understand  this  effect  would  be  to  say  that  people  are  unsure  as  to  what
their attitudes should be when they are ambivalent, and they actively process avail-
able  information  in  an  attempt  to  determine  what  their  attitude  should  be  (see
Chaiken, Liberman, & Eagly, 1989).

However, another prominent feature of ambivalence is that it is uncomfortable for
people to be ambivalent. Because of this, they may be motivated to use information
processing  to  reduce  the  ambivalence.  Note,  however,  that  not  all  information
should  be  equally  capable  of  reducing  ambivalence.  Consider  a  person  who  is  mod-
erately favorable toward nuclear power, for example, because s/he sees more positive
than  negative  features.  This  person  would  be  more  likely  to  overcome  the  ambiva-
lence  by  learning  about  additional  positive  features  (because  the  larger  number  of
positive  features  will  ‘‘dwarf’’  the  negative  features  and  reduce  the  feeling  of  con-
flict). If the person learns about new negative features of nuclear power, this would
only  increase  the  ambivalence  (because  there  would  be  more  negative  perceptions
to counter the positive, and the feeling of conflict would increase).

This suggests that effects of attitude ambivalence should not be a general increase
in  information  processing  (as  suggested  by  past  research).  Instead,  ambivalent  peo-
ple  should  want  to  process  information  that  adds  new  information  supporting  their
existing  position  (because  it  could  help  to  decrease  the  ambivalence).  In  contrast,
people  experiencing  ambivalence  should  want  to  avoid  processing  of  information
that  opposes  their  existing  attitude  (because  the  information  threatens  to  increase
their ambivalence).

Clark,  Wegener,  and  Fabrigar  (under  review)  reported  evidence  consistent  with
the  proposal  in  a  series  of  three  studies  (one  addressing  attitudes  toward  nuclear
power,  and  two  addressing  attitudes  toward  the  taxing  of  junk  food).  When  people
were  relatively  ambivalent  before  they  received  the  persuasive  message,  they  proc-
essed  the  message  to  a  greater  extent  when  the  message  was  relatively  agreeable
(i.e., focusing on features of the proposal that further supported the message recipi-
ents’ views before they received the message). When the message disagreed with the
ambivalent  person’s  pre-message  assessments,  message  recipients  did  not  think
carefully  about  the  information.  In  addition,  ambivalent  participants  perceived  the
agreeable messages as more likely than the disagreeable messages to reduce ambiv-
alence, and these perceptions of potential for ambivalence reduction led to the proc-
essing differences across messages that were relatively agreeable or disagreeable.

However, when participants were relatively unambivalent, they showed a very dif-
ferent  pattern  of  message  processing.  Unambivalent  people  processed  messages
more  when  the  messages  were  disagreeable  rather  than  agreeable.  These  results
were consistent with past research that did not address ambivalence, but likely ex-
amined situations where ambivalence was relatively low. In that past research, dis-
agreeable  messages  were  thought  to  receive  more  scrutiny  because  they  threaten
the  person’s  attitude  or  self  confidence  (e.g.,  Cacioppo  &  Petty,  1979;  Edwards  &
Smith,  1996).  Although  this  may  be  for  people  experiencing  low  levels  of  ambiva-
lence,  it  appears  that  motives  to  reduce  ambivalence  overpower  any  attitude-threat
effects and entirely reverse the traditional effects of message position on amount of
message processing.

When one reorganizes these studies to examine effects of ambivalence on message
processing,  the  Maio  et  al.  (1996)  effects  are  limited  to  the  processing  of  relatively
agreeable  messages.  When  the  person  already  agrees  with  the  point  of  view  in  the
message,  s/he  is  more  likely  to  process  the  message  when  feeling  high  rather  than

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

28

low  levels  of  ambivalence.  In  contrast,  with  disagreeable  messages,  people  experi-
encing  high  levels  of  ambivalence  are  less  likely  to  think  carefully  about  that  mes-
sage than people experiencing little or no ambivalence.

Therefore,  if  applied  researchers  had  assumed  (as  previous  research  had  sug-
gested)  that  ambivalence  would  generally  lead  to  careful  thinking  (and  careful
thinking would lead to strong attitudes, as discussed in the ELM), these researchers
would  have  been  sorely  mistaken.  In  fact,  if  using  a  disagreeable  message  (which
is  the  typical  kind  of  message  when  changes  in  attitudes  are  sought),  the  ambiva-
lent  people  are  significantly  less  likely  to  process  information  carefully  (and,  there-
fore, their attitudes would remain weak and unlikely to guide future behavior).
Using the Research to Inform Policy

I am not sure if informing policy is the primary role of research on attitudes and
attitude change. It is true that the need for policies like government subsidies (e.g.,
to  make  environmentally  friendly  forms  of  energy  more  affordable)  might  be  more
necessary  when  consumers  do  not  strongly  favor  use  of  those  new  technologies.  It
may also be true that government policies influence how much public support a new
energy source receives. For example, it may be that support for use of ethanol may
stem,  in  part,  from  people  wanting  to  support  farmers  and  rural  communities
(which also implies support for subsidies that go to support farmers or ethanol pro-
ducers).

It  seems  to  me,  however,  that  research  on  attitudes  and  attitude  change  may  be
more useful in helping to support and implement government policies pertaining to
energy use. For example, it may be deemed as useful or even necessary for our coun-
try to transition away from use of fossil fuels (which are polluting and come largely
from beyond our borders, producing a security premium for obtaining a steady sup-
ply  of  these  fuels).  But,  as  noted  earlier,  an  effective  transition  from  cheap  fossil
fuels  to  more  costly  (and  perhaps  less  convenient)  new  technologies  will  take  more
than technology development alone.

Public  attitudes,  values,  and  norms  supporting  the  transition  will  go  a  long  way
toward paving the way for new technologies to take hold and become commonplace.
For  example,  our  local  municipality  recently  implemented  a  city  ordinance  restrict-
ing  smoking  in  public  places.  Both  before  and  after  this  policy  decision  was  made,
there  was  a  flurry  of  advertising  supporting  this  decision  prior  to  implementation
of  the  ordinance.  These  efforts  were  clearly  not  intended  to  influence  the  members
of  the  City  Council,  who  had  already  decided  how  they  were  going  to  vote.  The  ad-
vertising was there to prepare the public for the change and to persuade them that
it makes good health sense for employees and patrons. If successful, such efforts in-
crease  the  likelihood  that  the  ordinance  will  receive  little  opposition  in  the  future,
and the restrictions will become an accepted norm.

If  Federal,  State,  or  local  government  views  particular  energy  sources  or  tech-
nologies  as  economically  or  politically  desirable,  these  entities  (or  policy-makers
within  them)  may  want  to  persuade  the  public  that  these  energy  sources  or  tech-
nologies  are  desirable.  Indeed,  such  persuasion  may  be  necessary  for  the  public  to
accept  use  of  the  new  technologies  in  their  communities.  The  relevance  of  these
ideas becomes apparent when considering that, in many places around the country,
our  energy-producing  infrastructure  is  aging  and  new  power  plants  will  be  nec-
essary.  Yet,  the  process  of  building  a  new  plant  is  often  held  up,  in  part,  by  com-
pany  officials  trying  (unsuccessfully)  to  convince  local  residents  that  the  plant  will
not create negative consequences for their community.

Part  of  this  likely  stems  from  incomplete  understanding  of  the  principles  studied
in  attitudes  and  persuasion.  For  example,  utility  officials  presenting  information
about the environmental impact of their proposed plants are not likely to be viewed
as  credible  communicators.  They  have  a  clear  self-interest,  and  might  often  be
viewed  as  untrustworthy.  In  many  of  these  instances,  a  better  grasp  of  persuasion
principles  might  suggest  use  of  an  independent  third-party  communicator  who  can
provide  information  without  being  perceived  as  having  ulterior  motives.  Assuming
that  strong  (persuasive)  arguments  are  available  (e.g.,  new  power  plants  can  often
produce  many  times  the  power  of  old  plants  with  far  less  pollution  than  the  old,
smaller  plants),  this  information  may  be  processed  in  a  more  objective  manner  if
presented by a trusted and expert source.

It  is  also  true  that  initial  concerns  may  not  be  the  same  as  long-term  concerns.
For  example,  although  people  oppose  the  building  of  a  nuclear  power  plant  more
when  it  is  proposed  to  be  near  rather  than  far  away  from  them,  the  same  is  not
true for opposition of plants that are already built. That is, people are not more neg-
ative  toward  nuclear  power  (or  oil  development)  when  they  live  near  to  it  rather
than far away (Smith, 2002). Similarly, people who live near a nuclear power plant
tend  to  become  more  favorable  toward  it  over  time—a  long-term  adaptation  effect

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

29

(van  der  Pligt,  Eiser,  &  Spears,  1986,  1987).  Therefore,  for  energy  sources  that
promise  long-term  benefits  (and  that  operate  in  safe,  and  environmentally  friendly
ways),  it  may  be  that  the  primary  public  perception  obstacles  are  incurred  early  in
the process—when obtaining zoning and permits to build the plant.

Stepping outside my own area of attitudes and persuasion research, I should also
mention  that  other  work  in  the  SEPAE  area  of  the  Purdue  Energy  Center  is  very
explicitly  aimed  at  assessing  policy  alternatives  per  se.  For  example,  Dr.  Tyner’s
economic  analyses  specifically  address  the  influences  of  policy  alternatives  on
whether  the  technology  is  likely  to  draw  private  investment  or  not.  Perhaps  other
panel  members  will  also  address  the  links  between  other  social  science  areas  and
policy.
4. What  basic  social  psychology  research  questions  relevant  to  the  energy
challenge  remain  unanswered?  Do  social  scientists  have  all  of  the  tools
they  need  to  answer  these  questions  and  adequate  resources  to  pursue
promising  research  directions?  Are  there  of  yet  undeveloped  or  under-
developed  technologies  or  methodologies  that  would  help  advance  this
research?

Unanswered Questions

In  over  80  years  of  empirical  social  psychology  research,  much  has  been  learned
about  how  people  form  and  change  their  attitudes.  But  for  virtually  every  variable
in the persuasion setting, and for each process that has been identified, there exists
additional  questions  that  have  not  yet  been  examined.  Let  me  provide  examples  of
three  types  of  research  questions  that  seem  worth  pursuing—one  dealing  with  spe-
cific  predictors  of  attitude  strength,  a  second  dealing  with  weak  attitudes  influ-
encing later information processing in ways that make them stronger over time, and
a  third  addressing  the  specific  cognitive  mechanisms  that  connect  attitudes  and
other  psychological  variables  to  behavior.  By  focusing  on  attitude  strength  and  be-
havior, I do not mean to imply that we know everything about attitude change. We
certainly  do  not.  However,  because  the  ultimate  goal  of  most  attempts  at  attitude
change is to change behavior, a focus on behavior in future research seems as likely
as  any  other  focus.  I  want  to  be  clear,  however,  that  I  write  this  section  with  the
caveat  in  mind  that  every  year  seems  to  produce  new  questions  that  simply  were
not in the collective consciousness of researchers, sometimes even months before.
Necessary and Sufficient Strength-Related Features of Attitudes

I  have  mentioned  at  various  points  in  this  testimony  that  the  goal  of  persuasion
is  not  simply  to  produce  positive  attitudes  toward  one’s  desired  product  or  policy.
The  goal  is  to  produce  a  favorable  attitude  that  is  also  strong  enough  to  last  over
time, to resist future attempts at change, and to guide future thinking and behavior
(Petty  &  Krosnick,  1995).  This  basic  idea  has  been  in  the  literature  for  some  time,
but  which  properties  of  the  attitude  are  sufficient  or  necessary  for  the  attitude  to
produce these desired consequences? Many properties have been studied (e.g., acces-
sibility,  ambivalence,  certainty,  direct  experience,  knowledge,  elaboration;  Wegener
et al., 1995). However, these properties of attitudes have often been studied in isola-
tion, so the relative contribution of each attitudinal property remains unclear. Also,
many  of  the  attitudinal  properties  are  only  weakly  or  moderately  correlated  with
each  other,  so  there  is  not  a  single  unified  ‘‘strength’’  property  of  attitudes
(Krosnick, Boninger, Chuang, Berent, & Carnot, 1993).

This  leaves  open  the  real  possibility  that  the  contribution  of  different  strength-
related attitudinal properties might differ across the types of attitude consequences
of interest. For example, consider a context in which the attitude object is relatively
novel  (as  many  new  energy  technologies  would  be)  and  the  primary  question  is
whether one’s attitude will persist long enough to guide future behavior. In this sit-
uation,  it  may  be  that  relatively  ‘‘passive’’  attitude  properties  such  as  accessibility
in memory or certainty might be especially important (it turns out that accessibility
and  certainty  are  empirically  linked,  in  that  both  can  be  increased  by  simple  re-
peated expression of one’s attitude; Holland, Verplanken, & van Knippenberg, 2003).
On  the  other  hand,  when  the  attitude  is  controversial  and  the  person  is  likely  to
encounter many diverging opinions, the ability of the attitude to resist change may
be the key. In such settings, the most important strength-related properties of atti-
tudes may be more ‘‘active’’ qualities that give the person greater ability to counter-
argue  ‘‘attacking’’  messages.  If  so,  then  attitudes  based  on  large  amounts  of  knowl-
edge  or  on  high  levels  of  elaboration  might  be  the  attitudes  best  able  to  hold  fast
in  the  face  of  the  diverging  opinions.  These  questions  have  simply  not  been  ad-
dressed in existing attitude strength research.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Initially Weak Attitudes Becoming Stronger Over Time

30

Another  interesting  set  of  research  questions  may  address  the  possible  impact  of
initially  weak  attitudes.  In  existing  attitude  strength  research,  the  weak  attitudes
are  simply  treated  as  relatively  non-consequential  (i.e.,  unlikely  to  last  over  time,
influence  behaviors,  etc.).  However,  there  may  be  at  least  some  ‘‘weak’’  qualities  of
attitudes  that  create  the  potential  for  the  attitudes  to  ‘‘snowball’’  into  becoming
strong. For example, as described earlier, recent research in our lab shows that am-
bivalence  and  message  position  combine  to  influence  information  processing  (Clark
et  al.,  under  review).  That  is,  ambivalent  people  think  carefully  about  information
that  agrees  with  their  pre-message  attitudes  but  avoid  thinking  about  information
that disagrees with their pre-message attitudes.

In our initial studies, participants were given the persuasive message rather than
choosing  to  view  it  on  their  own.  However,  these  results  from  our  initial  research
would  also  have  direct  implications  for  what  ambivalent  and  unambivalent  people
would choose to receive if given the choice. A result parallel to our information proc-
essing studies would be for people experiencing ambivalence to be more likely to ex-
pose  themselves  to  agreeable  rather  than  disagreeable  information.  People  experi-
encing  little  ambivalence  may  be  more  balanced  in  their  choices  or  might  even  ex-
pose themselves to more disagreeable rather than agreeable information.

But  notice  what  the  effects  of  this  exposure  are  likely  to  be.  When  ambivalent
people expose themselves to agreeable information, this should make them less am-
bivalent  and  should,  therefore,  make  their  attitude  stronger.  In  contrast,  exposure
to  balanced  or  more  disagreeable  information  would  make  people’s  attitudes  more
ambivalent  and,  therefore,  weaker.  One  interesting  aspect  of  this  possible  pattern
of  results  is  that  exposure  to  attitude-consistent  information  is  one  of  the  results
that  has  been  discussed  in  past  research  as  indicative  of  attitude  strength  (i.e.,  as
‘‘impact on thoughts and behavior’’). Because of this, past researchers have expected
(and  some  have  recently  found;  Brannon,  Tagler,  &  Eagly,  2007)  that  people  with
stronger  attitudes  are  more  likely  to  seek  attitude-consistent  rather  than  attitude-
inconsistent  attitudes.  These  effects  are  rather  small  in  magnitude,  however,  and
we  suspect  (but  have  not  yet  tested)  that  this  overall  pattern  masks  the  effects  of
some specific types of weak attitudes (especially those that are ambivalent).

More  generally,  it  would  change  the  attitude  strength  literature  in  important
ways if specific forms of ‘‘weak’’ attitudes actually create stronger preferences for at-
titude-consistent information or create stronger influences on other types of thinking
and behavior.
More Specific Mechanisms to Connect Attitudes and Behavior

In many respects, the study of attitude change is predicated on the ability of atti-
tudes  to  influence  future  behavior.  Indeed,  much  research  over  the  years  has  stud-
ied when attitudes predict future behavior and when they do not (and other psycho-
logical constructs, such as norms, influence behavior instead; see Ajzen & Fishbein,
2005). This emphasis seems justified, both for the study of attitudes in general, and
for studies of attitudes in relation to energy.

There  are  a  number  of  respects  in  which  we  can  increase  our  understanding  of
exactly how attitudes or other psychological constructs influence behaviors, however.
For instance, much research on attitude-behavior consistency speaks of ‘‘prediction’’
of  behavior,  but  there  is  an  important  distinction  to  be  made  between  prediction  of
behavior  and  influence  on  behavior  (Fabrigar,  MacDonald,  &  Wegener,  2005).  For
example, consider a person who forms a positive attitude toward hybrid automobiles
after  riding  in  a  friend’s  hybrid  automobile.  Suppose  that  this  person  goes  to  buy
a new car a few months later, but the person does not buy a hybrid car.

This  could  happen  for  many  reasons,  but  consider  two  distinct  explanations  for
this lack of attitude-behavior consistency that have not been systematically differen-
tiated in the attitudes literature to date. One possibility is that the person’s positive
attitude  toward  hybrid  cars  persisted  unchanged  right  up  until  the  purchase  deci-
sion,  but  the  attitude  did  not  prove  strong  enough  to  guide  the  behavior  when  the
purchase  was  made.  However,  there  is  another  possibility—one  that  produces  the
same  lack  of  attitude-behavior  consistency  (at  least  when  using  the  initial  positive
attitude  to  predict  the  later  behavior).  That  is,  the  person  may  use  his  or  her  cur-
rent  attitude  when  deciding  to  purchase  a  new  automobile,  but  the  attitude  may
have  changed  in  the  months  since  the  original  positive  attitude  was  formed.  This
latter situation is not really a case of attitude-behavior inconsistency at all, but the
change  in  attitude  means  that  the  earlier  positive  attitude  did  not  carry  through
to guide the purchase behavior.

In fact, the social psychology program at Purdue University will be holding a con-
ference  during  May  of  2008  with  the  explicit  theme  of  motivating  work  to  develop
more complete theory connecting psychological antecedents with behavior.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

31

We Cannot Forget about Applied Energy Research

The  question  posed  to  me  by  the  Committee  was  framed  in  terms  of  basic  social
psychology research, and I am entirely comfortable with that, because I am first and
foremost  a  basic  scientist.  I  should  also  note,  however,  that  technology-focused  re-
searchers do not always appreciate the fact that we are working to identify general-
izable  persuasion  principles  that  operate  across  topic  domains.  Quite  naturally,
practitioners  focusing  on  a  particular  topic  will  view  our  research  as  more  relevant
and  informative  to  them  if  it  deals  specifically  with  their  domain  of  interest  (be  it
a specific form of energy, a particular health condition, or some other specific topic).
Because of this, there may be benefits of applied research that addresses psycho-
logical  processes  that  have  been  identified  in  unrelated  domains  but  would  have
clear relevance to influencing attitudes related to energy. At a minimum, if it is im-
portant to direct attention in the energy domain toward the psychological principles
we discover, it may be helpful to fund some portion of the basic research (e.g., that
funded  through  NSF)  in  ways  that  explicitly  incorporate  energy-related  topics.
Doing  so  would  ensure  that  energy  researchers  and  practitioners  identify  the  per-
suasion (and other social psychology) principles discovered as relevant to the energy
domain.

Even  in  areas  where  the  basic  research  has  not  used  energy-related  topics,  tele-
phone  surveys  and  other  tools  for  attitude  measurement  can  be  used  to  determine
the  current  attitudes,  beliefs,  and  knowledge  that  people  hold  about  energy  topics.
When  the  characteristics  of  current  attitudes  are  documented,  for  example,  this
would tell energy researchers which basic persuasion principles are relevant to atti-
tudes  in  that  energy  domain.  For  example,  if  surveys  show  high  levels  of  ambiva-
lence  for  people’s  attitudes  toward  clean  coal  technologies,  this  would  suggest  that
the  research  on  attitude  ambivalence  described  earlier  (e.g.,  Clark  et  al.,  under  re-
view) is quite relevant.
Tools and Resources

One  of  the  benefits  of  social  science  research  in  general,  and  social  psychological
research in particular, is that it is very efficient from a cost standpoint. With some
sub-disciplines  excepted  (such  as  social,  affective,  or  cognitive  neuroscience,  which
use Functional Magnetic Resonance Imaging, fMRI, techniques), most research lab-
oratories  can  be  constructed  with  $100,000  or  less.  Once  a  lab  is  established,  the
primary costs are those of personnel (i.e., faculty time, graduate students, post-doc-
toral  fellows,  research  assistants)  and  research  participants  (especially  if  recruiting
research participants from the surrounding community).

Because  of  this  efficiency,  it  seems  likely  that  one  might  often  gain  more  ‘‘bang
for the buck’’ from research on behavior change than on higher-cost funding of new
(as  yet  untried,  and  often  economically  unfeasible)  energy-production  technologies.
This is not an argument to reduce funding to develop new technologies. But the re-
search  on  basic  persuasion  principles  will  be  relevant  across  many  such  tech-
nologies,  and  the  transition  away  from  fossil  fuels  will  absolutely  require  changes
in behavior that involve energy conservation (using current technologies) as well as
adoption  of  new  energy  sources,  policies,  and  products.  More  generally,  this  transi-
tion  will  require  policies  to  encourage  investment,  persuasion  of  potential  con-
sumers,  changing  norms  to  encourage  adoption,  and  other  social,  economic,  or  gov-
ernmental interventions to facilitate shifts in energy use.

Unfortunately,  despite  the  relative  efficiency  of  social  science  research,  there  is
much less federal funding available to fund this research (at least within social psy-
chology)  than  there  used  to  be.  As  I  described  earlier,  this  is  largely  a  function  of
the shift in funding priorities for the National Institute of Mental Health. This shift
may  have  made  sense  for  that  institute  if  its  primary  mission  is,  indeed,  severe
mental illness. However, this shift in priorities has left a sizable gap in funding for
basic  science  whose  results  and  theory  cut  across  many  basic  and  applied  dis-
ciplines.  It  is  extremely  important  to  find  a  new  home  for  federal  funding  of  basic
research  in  social  psychology  in  general  and  of  research  in  attitude  change  in  par-
ticular.
New Technologies or Methods

Most  social  psychological  research  uses  existing  computer  technology  in  creative
and  useful  ways.  Therefore,  many  of  the  new  research  methods  come  from  the  cre-
ativity  of  researchers,  rather  than  the  development  of  new  research  technology  per
se.  This  is  not  true  of  all  social  psychology  research,  however.  As  I  mentioned  ear-
lier,  my  colleagues  in  social,  cognitive,  or  affective  neuroscience  use  a  variety  of
techniques  that  I  do  not  (including  fMRI  and  other  versions  of  brain  imaging  or
scanning).

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

32

There  are  also  a  variety  of  new  ‘‘implicit’’  measures  of  attitudes  that  have  been
developed  recently  to  tap  into  attitudes  and  perceptions  that  people  are  reluctant
to  share  or  of  which  people  might  not  even  be  aware.  These  typically  use  existing
computer  technology,  but  they  represent  some  very  interesting  methods  that  are
just  beginning  to  pay  big  theoretical  dividends.  For  example,  implicit  measures  of
attitudes  have  been  shown  to  improve  prediction  of  behavior  in  some  contexts  and
for some behaviors, even when traditional direct measures of attitudes are also used
(see  Ajzen  &  Fishbein,  2005;  Fazio  &  Olson,  2003).  There  are  many  unexplored
questions using these techniques.

The  long-term  impact  of  these  methods  for  theories  of  attitudes  and  attitude
change  are  still  unclear.  It  is  also  important  to  note,  however,  that  there  is  still
much  to  learn  using  more  ‘‘conventional’’  methods  to  ask  people  about  their  atti-
tudes  and  thereby  examine  how  factors  in  a  persuasive  message  or  in  the  environ-
ment influence the attitude.

Finally,  it  is  also  important  to  note  that  social  psychologists’  focus  on  cognitive
and  motivational  processes  requires  sophisticated  statistical  techniques  and  re-
search  methods  (see  Reis  &  Judd,  2000;  Sansone,  Morf,  &  Panter,  2004).  These  de-
velopments  help  to  build  stronger  evidence  in  tests  of  psychological  theories,  and
parallel  analyses  then  receive  use  in  related  academic  and  applied  disciplines  (for
a recent example advance in this area, see Muller, Judd, & Yzerbyt, 2005).
References
Ajzen,  I.,  &  Fishbein,  M.  (1970).  The  prediction  of  behavior  from  attitudinal  and

normative variables. Journal of Experimental Social Psychology, 6, 466–487.

Ajzen,  I.,  &  Fishbein,  M.  (2005).  The  influence  of  attitudes  on  behavior.  In  D.
Albarracin,  B.T.  Johnson,  &  M.P.  Zanna  (Eds.),  The  handbook  of  attitudes  (pp.
173–221). Mahwah, NJ: Erlbaum.

Allport,  G.W.  (1935).  Attitudes.  In  C.  Murchison  (Ed.),  Handbook  of  social  psy-

chology (pp. 798–884). Worcester, MA: Clark University Press.

Blankenship,  K.L.  (2006).  Opening  the  mind  before  it  closes:  Considering  a  message
in light of important values increases message processing and later resistance to
change.  Unpublished  doctoral  dissertation,  Purdue  University,  West  Lafayette,
IN.

Blankenship, K.L., & Wegener, D.T. (in press). Opening the mind to close it: Consid-
ering  a  message  in  light  of  important  values  increases  message  processing  and
later resistance to change. Journal of Personality and Social Psychology.

Brannon,  L.A.,  Tagler,  M.J.,  &  Eagly,  A.H.  (2007).  The  moderating  role  of  attitude
strength  in  selective  exposure  to  information.  Journal  of  Experimental  Social
Psychology, 43, 611–617.

Chaiken,  S.,  &  Maheswaran,  D.  (1994).  Heuristic  processing  can  bias  systematic
processing:  Effects  of  source  credibility,  argument  ambiguity,  and  task  impor-
tance  on  attitude  judgment.  Journal  of  Personality  and  Social  Psychology,  66,
460–473.

Clark,  J.K.,  Wegener,  D.T.,  &  Fabrigar,  L.R.  (under  review).  Attitudinal  ambiva-
lence  and  message-based  persuasion:  Motivated  processing  of  proattitudinal  in-
formation  and  avoidance  of  counterattitudinal  information.  Unpublished  manu-
script, Indiana University, Bloomington, IN.

Clore  G.L.,  &  Schnall,  S.  (2005).  The  influence  of  affect  on  attitude.  In  D.
Albarracin, B. Johnson, & M. Zanna (Eds.), The handbook of attitudes (pp. 437–
492). Mahwah, NJ: Erlbaum.

Eagly,  A.H.,  &  Chaiken,  S.  (1993).  The  psychology  of  attitudes.  Forth  Worth,  TX:

Harcourt, Brace, Jovanovich.

Fabrigar,  L.R.,  MacDonald,  T.,  &  Wegener,  D.T.  (2005).  The  structure  of  attitudes.
In D. Albarracin, B. Johnson, & M. Zanna (Eds.), The handbook of attitudes (pp.
79–124). Mahwah, NJ: Erlbaum.

Fazio,  R.H.,  &  Olson,  M.A.  (2003).  Implicit  measures  in  social  cognition  research:

Their meaning and use. Annual Review of Psychology, 54, 297–327.

Fishbein,  M.,  &  Ajzen,  I.  (1975).  Belief,  attitude,  intention,  and  behavior:  An  intro-

duction to theory and research. Reading, MA: Addison-Wesley.

Goy,  P.A.,  &  Duesing,  J.H.  (1996).  Assessing  the  environmental  impact  of  gene

transfer to wild relatives. Bio/Technology, 14, 39–40.

Haugtvedt,  C.P.,  &  Wegener,  D.T.  (1994).  Message  order  effects  in  persuasion:  An

attitude strength perspective. Journal of Consumer Research, 21, 205–218.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

33

Holland,  R.W.,  Verplanken,  B.,  &  van  Knippenberg,  A.  (2003).  From  repetition  to
conviction: Attitude accessibility as a determinant of attitude certainty. Journal
of Experimental Social Psychology, 39, p. 594–601.

Homer, P.M., & Kahle, L.R. (1988). A structural equation test of the value-attitude-
behavior  hierarchy.  Journal  of  Personality  and  Social  Psychology,  54,  638–646.
Hovland, C.I. (1957) (Ed.). The order of presentation in persuasion. New Haven, CT:

Yale University Press.

Hovland,  C.I.,  &  Mandell,  W.  (1957).  Is  there  a  ‘law  of  primacy’  in  persuasion?  In
C.I.  Hovland  (Ed.),  The  order  of  presentation  in  persuasion  (pp.  1–22).  New
Haven, CT: Yale University Press.

Krosnick,  J.A.,  Boninger,  D.S.,  Chuang,  Y.C.,  Berent,  M.K.,  &  Carnot,  C.G.  (1993).
Attitude strength: One construct or many related constructs? Journal of Person-
ality and Social Psychology, 65, 1132–1151.

Kunst-Wilson,  W.R.,  &  Zajonc,  R.B.  (1980).  Affective  discrimination  of  stimuli  that

cannot be recognized. Science, 207, 557–558.

Lana,  R.E.  (1961).  Familiarity  and  the  order  of  presentation  of  persuasive  commu-

nications. Journal of Abnormal and Social Psychology, 62, 573–577.

Lund,  F.H.  (1925).  The  psychology  of  belief:  IV.  The  law  of  primacy  in  persuasion.

Journal of Abnormal and Social Psychology, 20, 183–191.

Maio,  G.R.,  Bell,  D.W.,  &  Esses,  V.M.  (1996).  Ambivalence  and  persuasion:  The
processing of messages about immigrant groups. Journal of Experimental Social
Psychology, 32, 513–536.

Maio,  G.R.,  &  Olson,  J.M.  (2000a).  What  is  a  ‘‘value-expressive’’  attitude?  In  G.R.
Maio  &  J.M.  Olson  (Eds.),  Why  we  evaluate:  Functions  of  attitudes  (pp.  249–
270). Mahwah, NJ: Lawrence Erlbaum Inc.

Maio,  G.R.,  &  Olson,  J.M.  (2000b)  (Eds).  Why  we  evaluate:  Functions  of  attitudes.

Mahwah, NJ: Lawrence Erlbaum Inc.

Meilan,  R.  (2004).  Molecular  Biology  of  Forest  Trees.  Pages  229–236  in:  Encyclo-

pedia of Forest Sciences. Academic Press, Oxford, U.K.

Muller,  D.,  Judd,  C.M.,  &  Yzerbyt,  V.Y.  (2005).  When  moderation  is  mediated  and
mediation is moderated. Journal of Personality and Social Psychology, 89, 852–
863.

Ostrom, T.M., & Brock, T.C. (1969). Cognitive bonding to central values and resist-
ance to a communication advocating change in policy orientation. Journal of Ex-
perimental Research in Personality, 4, 42–50.

Petty, R.E., & Cacioppo, J.T. (1981/1996). Attitudes and persuasion: Classic and con-

temporary approaches. Boulder, CO: Westview Press.

Petty,  R.E.,  &  Cacioppo,  J.T.  (1986a).  Communication  and  persuasion:  Central  and

peripheral routes to persuasion. New York: Springer-Verlag.

Petty,  R.E.,  &  Cacioppo,  J.T.  (1986b).  The  Elaboration  Likelihood  Model  of  persua-
sion. In L. Berkowitz (Ed.), Advances in experimental social psychology (Vol. 19,
pp. 123–205). New York: Academic Press.

Petty, R.E., Cacioppo, J.T., & Goldman, R. (1981). Personal involvement as a deter-
minant  of  argument-based  persuasion.  Journal  of  Personality  and  Social  Psy-
chology, 41, 847–855.

Petty,  R.E.,  Haugtvedt,  C.P.,  &  Smith,  S.M.  (1995).  Elaboration  as  a  determinant
of  attitude  strength.  In  R.E.  Petty  &  J.A.  Krosnick  (Eds.),  Attitude  strength:
Antecedents  and  consequences  (pp.  93–130).  Mahwah,  NJ:  Lawrence  Erlbaum
Associates, Inc.

Petty, R.E., & Krosnick J.A. (1995). Attitude strength: Antecedents and consequences.

Mahwah, NJ: Erlbaum.

Petty,  R.E.  &  Wegener,  D.T.  (1991).  Thought  systems,  argument  quality,  and  per-
suasion. In R.S. Wyer & T.K. Srull (Eds.) Advances in social cognition (Vol. IV,
pp. 147–162). Hillsdale, NJ: Erlbaum.

Petty,  R.E.,  &  Wegener,  D.T.  (1998).  Attitude  change:  Multiple  roles  for  persuasion
variables.  In  D.  Gilbert,  S.  Fiske,  &  G.  Lindzey  (Eds.),  The  handbook  of  social
psychology (4th ed., pp. 323–390). New York: McGraw-Hill.

Petty, R.E., & Wegener, D.T. (1999). The Elaboration Likelihood Model: Current sta-
tus  and  controversies.  In  S.  Chaiken  &  Y.  Trope  (Eds.),  Dual  process  theories
in social psychology (pp. 41–72). New York: Guilford Press.

Pratkanis,  A.R.,  Breckler,  S.J.,  &  Greenwald,  A.G.  (Eds.)  (1989).  Attitude  structure

and function. Hillsdale, NJ: Erlbaum.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

34

Puckett, J.M., Petty, R.E., Cacioppo, J.T., & Fisher, D.L. (1983). The relative impact
of age and attractiveness stereotypes on persuasion. Journal of Gerontology, 38,
340–343.

Rankin, W.L., Nealy, S., & Melber, B. (1984). Overview of national attitudes toward
nuclear  energy:  A  longitudinal  analysis.  In  W.  Freudenburg  &  E.  Rosa  (Eds.),
Public reaction to nuclear power (pp. 41–67). Boulder, CO: Westview.

Reis, H.T., & Judd, C.M. (2000) (Eds.). Handbook of Research Methods in Social and

Personality Psychology. Cambridge, UK: Cambridge Press.

Rosa, E., & Dunlap, R. (1994). Nuclear power: Three decades of public opinion. Pub-

lic Opinion Quarterly, 58, 295–325.

Rosnow, R., & Robinson, E. (1967). Experiments in persuasion. New York: Academic

Press.

Sansone, C., Morf, C.C., & Panter, A.T., (2004) (Eds.). The SAGE handbook of meth-

ods in social psychology. Thousand Oaks: Sage.

Sherif, M., & Cantril, H. (1947). The psychology of ego-involvements: Social attitudes

and identifications. New York, Wiley.

Smith,  E.  (2002).  Energy,  the  environment,  and  public  opinion.  Lanham,  MD:

Rowman & Littlefield.

Van  der  Pligt,  J.,  Eiser,  R.,  &  Spears,  R.  (1986).  Attitudes  toward  nuclear  energy:

Familiarity and salience. Environment and Behavior, 18, 75–93.

Van  der  Pligt,  J.,  Eiser,  R.,  &  Spears,  R.  (1987).  Nuclear  waste:  Facts,  fears,  and

attitudes. Journal of Applied Social Psychology, 17, 453–470.

Wegener,  D.T.,  &  Carlston,  D.E.  (2005).  Cognitive  processes  in  attitude  formation
and  change.  In  D.  Albarracin,  B.  Johnson,  &  M.  Zanna  (Eds.),  The  handbook
of attitudes (pp. 493–542). Mahwah, NJ: Erlbaum.

Wegener,  D.T.,  Downing,  J.,  Krosnick,  J.A.,  &  Petty,  R.E.  (1995).  Strength-related
properties of attitudes: Measures, manipulations, and future directions. In R.E.
Petty and J.A. Krosnick (Eds.), Attitude strength: Antecedents and consequences
(pp. 455–487). Mahwah, NJ: Erlbaum.

Wegener,  D.T.,  Petty,  R.E.,  Smoak,  N.D.,  &  Fabrigar,  L.R.  (2004).  Multiple  routes
to resisting attitude change. In E.S. Knowles & J.A. Linn (Eds.), Resistance and
persuasion (pp. 13-38). Mahwah, NJ: Erlbaum.

Winkielman,  P.,  &  Cacioppo,  J.T.  (2001).  Mind  at  ease  puts  a  smile  on  the  face:
Psychophysiological  evidence  that  processing  facilitation  elicits  positive  affect.
Journal of Personality and Social Psychology, 81, 989–1000.

BIOGRAPHY FOR DUANE T. WEGENER

Dr.  Wegener  received  his  Ph.D.  in  Social  Psychology  from  Ohio  State  University
in  1994.  After  serving  as  an  Assistant  Professor  of  Psychology  at  Yale  University
for  three  years,  he  joined  Purdue  University  in  1997  as  an  Associate  Professor  and
was  promoted  to  Professor  in  2003.  Dr.  Wegener  serves  as  one  of  three  Initiative
Leaders  for  the  Social,  Economic,  and  Political  Aspects  of  Energy  Use  and  Policy,
a  research  initiative  within  the  Energy  Center  at  Discovery  Park—an  interdiscipli-
nary research hub at Purdue University.

Dr.  Wegener’s  research  focuses  on  attitudes  and  persuasion,  especially  influences
on  the  amount  and  nature  of  information  processing  and  the  consequences  of  the
resulting attitudes for later thinking and behavior. Dr. Wegener has been PI or Co-
PI on grants in social psychology (National Science Foundation), health (focusing on
processing  of  health  communications;  Canadian  Institute  for  Health  Research),  and
energy  (focusing  on  energy-related  attitudes  and  decision-making;  National  Science
Foundation—Human Social Dynamics Program).

In  2001,  he  received  the  American  Psychological  Association  (APA)  Early  Career
Award  for  distinguished  contributions  to  the  science  of  social  psychology.  Dr.
Wegener’s research has resulted in over 50 publications in journal articles and book
chapters.  He  is  currently  a  Section  Co-Editor  for  the  Social  and  Personality  Psy-
chology  Compass,  and  he  served  as  Associate  Editor  for  Basic  and  Applied  Social
Psychology  and  the  Personality  and  Social  Psychology  Bulletin.  He  has  also  served
as  an  editorial  board  member  for  the  Journal  of  Personality  and  Social  Psychology,
the  Journal  of  Experimental  Social  Psychology,  and  Personality  and  Social  Psy-
chology Bulletin, and as an ad hoc reviewer for over 30 academic journals.

Chairman BAIRD. Thank you, Dr. Wegener.
Dr. Laitner.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

35

STATEMENT OF MR. JOHN ‘‘SKIP’’ LAITNER, VISITING FELLOW
AND  SENIOR  ECONOMIST,  AMERICAN  COUNCIL  FOR  AN  EN-
ERGY EFFICIENT ECONOMY
Mr.  LAITNER.  Good  morning,  Chairman  Baird,  Ranking  Member
Ehlers,  Members  and  staff  of  the  Subcommittee.  I  recently  joined
the  American  Council  for  an  Energy  Efficient  Economy  as  their
Senior  Economist  for  Technology  Policy.  However,  I  am  now  cele-
brating  37  years  in  the  energy  policy  arena,  and  in  those  nearly  4
decades  of  effort,  there  have  certainly  been  some  disappointments
along the way. At the same time, however, I have never been more
confident  in  telling  this  subcommittee  that  the  United  States  has
never been better positioned to move onto a path of sustainable en-
ergy  production  and  consumption,  one  that  promotes  both  produc-
tivity  and  economic  prosperity  if  we  choose  to  do  it.  But  it  is  not
really  just  about  technology  or  economics,  rather  it  is  about  the
human element, the innovative spirit, and with apologies to my col-
leagues  from  the  south,  about  our  vaunted  Yankee  ingenuity.  In
that  sense,  a  productive  and  prosperous  energy  policy  equally  de-
pends on a better understanding of the human dimension. What is
it  that  might  be  done  to  motivate  that  ingenuity  and  what  might
be done to translate it into productive action.

Let  me  give  you  a  very  concrete  example.  Some  years  ago  a  col-
league  of  mine  had  a  really  good  idea  for  a  new  technology  but  in
fact  it  wasn’t  really  a  new  technology,  it  was  seeing  a  different
blend  of  technologies,  a  new  design,  a  rearrangement  of  existing
ones, a new configuration that if implemented would save manufac-
turers  a  good  bit  of  money.  Suffice  it  to  say  that  if  my  estimates
are correct, by 2025, the annual savings from this new energy effi-
cient technology would rival the anticipated output from the Alaska
National Wildlife Refuge. It is potentially very big.

So here is where the social science comes in. First, what is it that
really motivated him to develop a prototype of this technology? Sec-
ond,  what  gave  him  the  inspiration  to  see  a  new  way  of  doing
things?  Third,  critically,  why  can’t  he  get  it  to  the  market?  He
seems to hold onto it, always wanted to make just one more refine-
ment.  He  doesn’t  seem  to  know  how  to  really  close  the  deal,  and
given  the  Chairman’s  background,  I  think  he  might  have  some  in-
teresting insights into that kind of behavior. But fourth, how many
more  are  out  there  just  like  him?  I  suspect  a  lot.  And  how  many
more could there be if we encouraged a greater entrepreneurial en-
thusiasm? Again, I suspect a lot. Fifth and finally, what can we do
to motivate a greater level of innovating seeing entrepreneurial ac-
tion?  This  is  all  from  the  production  side.  There  are  similar  ques-
tions from the perspective of the consumer. What is it that encour-
ages  early  and  then  accelerated  adoption  of  new  technologies?  We
have  heard  a  bit  of  that  already.  What  does  this  tell  us  about  the
energy policy signal beyond the price signal?

Mr. Chairman, I submit the energy problem is not purely a tech-
nology  problem.  While  there  is  already  a  good  bit  of  science  in-
volved to be sure and there is clearly a need for more research and
disciplines  like  material  science  and  advanced  electronics,  more
generally  in  biology,  chemistry,  and  physics,  fundamentally  I  be-
lieve  it  is  equally  a  problem  with  the  human  dimension.  Yes,  we

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

36

are  seriously  under-funding  our  R&D  efforts  and  especially  for  en-
ergy efficiency but it is even worse for the social sciences.

Members  of  the  Subcommittee  may  be  interested  in  at  least  one
set  of  energy-related  statistics  to  help  frame  these  last  thoughts.
Based on the 2007 edition of British Petroleum’s Energy Statistical
Review,  it  appears  the  U.S.  enjoys  what  is  referred  to  as  proven
fossil  fuel  reserves  of  around  130  billions  of  oil  equivalent.  That  is
good. At our current rate of consumption, that is roughly a 52-year
resource. The bad news is about 90 percent of that resource is coal.
But  the  good  news  is  in  the  spirit  of  Leonardo  daVinci’s  motto,
sapere  vedere,  Tuscan  dog  Latin  meaning  to  know  how  to  see,  we
may also see something more on the order of 900 billion tons of en-
ergy-efficiency  reserves  over  the  next  century.  As  it  turns  out,  we
may  use  about  two-thirds  of  this  large  efficiency  resource  in  our
normal  pattern  of  growth.  However,  that  would  still  mean  an  en-
ergy  consumption  of  about  three  and  one-half  times  greater  than
we  are  using  today  by  the  end  of  the  century.  That  is  huge.  De-
pending  on  how  much  of  that  energy  comes  from  renewables  or
other clean energy resources, that may not be good enough. So the
question then becomes, how do we unlock that remaining one-third
of  the  efficiency  resource  so  that  we  might  keep  our  total  energy
use  to  say  less  than  50  percent  growth  compared  to  today’s  use  of
energy and still maintain a robust economy? How exactly do we get
at  it?  At  a  minimum,  the  answer  is  at  least  one  part  accelerated
R&D  and  one  part  new  insights  from  the  social  sciences,  an  ex-
panded  investment  in  our  understanding  of  the  human  dimension.
In  answering  this  question  at  least  in  part,  let  me  finally  turn
to an analogy drawn from baseball. Pitcher Nolan Ryan was some-
thing of a hero of mine. He won I think 324 games over his career
which included a stint with President Bush’s own former team, the
Texas  Rangers.  But  how  many  games  would  Nolan  Ryan,  the  so-
called  Ryan  Express,  how  many  would  he  have  won  had  he  taken
the field without his catcher or without his infield? In a very simi-
lar  way,  if  we  are  to  design  and  implement  an  energy  policy  that
sustains  our  economy  in  a  highly  prosperous  way,  we  should  be
funding and fielding a complete team effort. Yes, we need improved
energy  efficiency  standards  and  smarter  incentives.  Yes,  we  need
more  research  and  development,  but  yes,  we  also  need  to  support
more  research  and  more  funding  for  that  research  in  the  field  of
social sciences.

I  thank  you  for  this  opportunity  to  speak.  I  would  be  happy  to

take questions.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Laitner follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JOHN A. ‘‘SKIP’’ LAITNER

Summary

This testimony responds to an invitation from the Subcommittee on Research and
Science  Education  to  help  members  explore  the  relevance  of  the  social,  behavioral
and  economic  sciences  in  shaping  a  more  productive  pattern  of  energy  use  and  a
more  balanced  set  of  energy  policies.  Any  useful  policy  assessment  clearly  must  in-
clude  some  form  of  economic  analysis.  Prices  and  incomes  do  matter  in  the  evalua-
tion of public policy, but they are not all that matter. Technological innovation and
market  dynamics  are  among  those  things  that  influence  our  demand  for  energy-re-
lated  goods  and  services.  Social  norms  and  structures  also  play  a  role.  These  all,
in  turn,  are  shaped  by  culture,  beliefs,  values,  preferences,  habits,  and  the  avail-
ability of alternatives.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

37

For  the  most  part,  current  economic  policy  models  fail  to  adequately  capture  the
ways  in  which  individual  energy  consumption  patterns  change  in  response  to  both
economic and noneconomic policies and programs. Therefore, policies based on these
models  have  consistently  overlooked  the  energy  savings  that  can  be  achieved
through  the  accelerated  adoption  of  energy-efficient  technologies,  changing  social
preferences,  and  more  energy-aware  behaviors.  As  such,  these  models  have  tended
to  underestimate  the  energy  savings  that  can  be  achieved  while  generally  overesti-
mating  the  costs  of  achieving  increased  levels  of  energy  efficiency.  The  inaccuracy
of these models has large and important implications for both energy policy and cli-
mate  change  mitigation  policy.  There  is  good  news  in  all  of  this  but,  as  we  shall
see, there is work ahead.

Given  this  circumstance,  and  based  on  the  available  evidence,  the  American
Council  for  an  Energy-Efficient  Economy  (ACEEE)  believes  three  distinct  rec-
ommendations  are  in  order.  First,  and  after  further  review,  the  Subcommittee
should  issue  a  set  of  findings  that  confirms  our  testimony.  We  think  it  will  send
a positive signal to the economics and social science communities that there is clear
room  for  improvement.  Second,  support  the  development  and  funding  of  a  National
Energy Efficiency Data Center (NEEDC), which would be a national nonprofit orga-
nization  whose  purpose  will  be  to  collect,  organize,  disseminate  and  archive  energy
efficiency  and  social  science  statistics,  particularly  those  related  to  public  policies
and programs. Finally, more research and greater research funding will provide the
means  to  expand  our  knowledge  and  understanding  of  how  human  behavior  and
choice can increase energy efficiency, reduce our energy dependency, and reduce our
impact on the global climate while still maintaining a robust economy.
Introduction

My name is John A. ‘‘Skip’’ Laitner and I am the Senior Economist for Technology
Policy  for  the  American  Council  for  an  Energy-Efficient  Economy  (ACEEE),  a  non-
profit organization dedicated to increasing energy efficiency as a means of promoting
both economic prosperity and environmental protection. I am here today at the invi-
tation  of  this  subcommittee  to  explore  the  relevance  of  the  social,  behavioral  and
economic sciences to energy use and policy. I thank you for the opportunity to testify
today.  Working  with  me  in  the  preparation  of  this  testimony  and  also  here  today
is my ACEEE colleague, Karen Ehrhardt-Martinez. She holds a professional degree
in sociology and works with me on a variety of economic and technology issues.

Any useful policy assessment must include some form of economic analysis. Prices
and  incomes  do  matter  in  the  evaluation  of  public  policy,  but  they  are  not  all  that
matter. Indeed, the great English economist Joan Robinson wrote in 1947 that ‘‘eco-
nomics  science  has  not  solved  its  first  problem—namely  what  determines  the  price
of  a  commodity?’’ 1 That  remains  true  today,  now  60  years  later.  But  I  might  add,
neither has economics determined exactly what magnitude of income is sufficient to
satisfy either individual or household demands.

Among those things that influence our demand for goods, services, and amenities,
and  that  also  impact  things  like  technological  innovation,  market  dynamics,  and
personal  choice  are  social  norms  and  structures.  These,  in  turn,  are  shaped  by  cul-
ture,  beliefs,  values,  habits,  alternatives,  and  basic  human  and  social  needs.  In
short, there is compelling evidence that an accurate economic analysis (of either en-
ergy use or the environmental impacts associated with the production and consump-
tion of energy) requires a broader understanding of human behavior and choices. It
also requires an understanding of the ways in which they are shaped by the institu-
tional and social frameworks of our society. Recent studies of climate change policy
have also stressed the importance of human choice and human behavior for the de-
velopment  of  effective  policies  that  reduce  emissions  and  mitigate  climate  change.2
However, current economic models fail to adequately capture the ways in which in-
dividual energy consumption changes in response to economic and noneconomic poli-
cies  and  programs.3 Therefore,  policies  based  on  these  models  have  consistently

1 Robinson,  Joan.  1947.  An  Essay  on  Marxian  Economics.  London,  England:  MacMillan,  page

79.

2 Brewer, Garry D. and Paul C. Stern, Eds. 2005. Decision-Making for the Environment: Social
and  Behavior  Science  Research  Priorities.  Committee  on  the  Human  Dimensions  of  Global
Change,  National  Research  Council,  Washington,  DC:  National  Academies  Press;  and  also  see,
Stern,  Paul  C.,  Oran  R.  Young;  and  Daniel  Druckman,  Eds.  1991.  Global  Environmental
Change: Understanding the Human Dimensions. Committee on the Human Dimensions of Glob-
al Change, National Research Council, Washington, DC: National Academies Press.

3 Laitner, John A. ‘‘Skip’’, Stephen J. DeCanio, and Irene Peters. 2000. ‘‘Incorporating Behav-
ioral,  Social,  and  Organizational  Phenomena  in  the  Assessment  of  Climate  Change  Mitigation
Options.’’ in E. Jochem, J. Sathaye and D. Bouille, Society, Behavior, and Climate Change Miti-
Continued

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

38

overlooked  the  energy  savings  that  can  be  achieved  through  changing  social  pref-
erences  and  the  accelerated  adoption  of  energy-efficient  technologies  and  more  en-
ergy-aware  behaviors.  As  such,  these  models  have  tended  to  underestimate  the  en-
ergy  savings  that  can  be  achieved  while  generally  overestimating  the  costs  of
achieving  increased  levels  of  energy  efficiency.  The  inaccuracy  of  these  models  has
large  and  important  implications  for  both  energy  policy  and  climate  change  mitiga-
tion  policy.  In  my  testimony  here  today,  I  will  expand  on  these  notions  a  bit  more
as I try to answer three questions that this subcommittee has posed for me:

1. How predictive is a purely economic approach to evaluating the impact of en-
ergy  policy  on  individual  and  communal  behavior?  What  other  factors  need
to be considered to match economic theory to empirical data? To what extent
are  such  data  even  available?  That  is,  to  what  extent  are  relevant  energy
policies being evaluated for effectiveness?

2. To  what  extent  are  policies  to  influence  individual  and  community  energy
use  being  shaped  by  what  has  been  learned  from  research  in  the  social
sciences,  including  economics?  Are  you  aware  of  particular  sectors  of  indus-
try  or  government  that  make  more  of  an  effort  to  incorporate  the  results  of
such research into the design and evaluation of policy?

3. Please describe the purpose and scope of the first-ever Behavior, Energy and
Climate  Change  Conference  being  organized  by  ACEEE.  What  do  you  hope
to  achieve  through  this  conference?  How  much  interest  have  you  seen  from
industry,  government  officials,  and  others  in  a  position  to  influence  policy?
In responding as fully as I can to each of questions, let me divide up my testimony
into  five  parts.  The  first  section  following  this  introduction  provides  an  energy  and
economic  context  that  I  hope  will  be  helpful  in  responding  to  the  Subcommittee’s
request.  The  next  three  sections  will  deal  specifically  with  each  of  the  questions
posed. The last section will provide recommendations and conclusions.
Energy Consumption in Context

As one of the richest and more technologically advanced regions of the world, the
United States has expanded its economic output by three-fold since 1970. Per capita
incomes  are  also  twice  as  large  today  compared  to  incomes  in  1970.  Notably,  how-
ever, the demand for energy and power resources grew by less than 50 percent dur-
ing  the  same  period.4 This  decoupling  of  economic  growth  and  energy  consumption
is  a  function  of  increased  energy  productivity:  in  effect,  the  ability  to  do  more  with
less  consumption.  In  today’s  testimony  I  would  like  to  accomplish  three  specific
tasks  as  I  try  to  answer  your  questions.  First,  I  would  like  to  note  how  this  decou-
pling  has  been  achieved;  second,  reaffirm  the  compelling  evidence  that  suggests
greater energy productivity gains can be achieved—that there is, indeed, significant
room  for  improvement;  and  third,  suggest  that  social  science  research  can  provide
policy-makers with a more satisfying set of insights that can help our nation to cap-
ture  those  greater  energy  productivities  while  maintaining  our  economic  prosperity
and  enhancing  overall  environmental  quality.  There  is  good  news  in  all  of  this  but,
as we shall see, there is work ahead.
The Success of Energy Efficiency to Date

The  Members  of  this  subcommittee  may  be  surprised  to  learn  how  big  of  a  role
that energy efficiency has already played supporting the growth of our economy over
time.  Figure  1,  below,  provides  the  historical  context  of  efficiency  gains  estimated
through  2007  as  they  might  compare  to  the  development  of  new  energy  supplies
since  1970.  In  effect,  Figure  1  compares  the  projected  level  of  energy  consumption
in 2007 to that which might have been necessary had the economy continued to rely
on 1970 technologies and market structure.5

gation. Dordrecht, The Netherlands: Kluwer Academic Press, pages 1–64. See also Laitner, John
A. ‘‘Skip’’, Stephen J. DeCanio, Jonathan G. Koomey, and Alan H. Sanstad, ‘‘Room for Improve-
ment:  Increasing  the  Value  of  Energy  Modeling  for  Policy  Analysis.’’  Utilities  Policy,  2003,  11,
87–94. Finally, see also, Worrell, Ernst, Stephan Ramesohl, and Gale Boyd. 2003. ‘‘Towards In-
creased  Policy  Relevance  in  Energy  Modeling,’’  ACEEE  2003  Summer  Study  on  Energy  Effi-
ciency in Industry. Washington, DC: American Council for an Energy-Efficient Economy.

4 These and other specific energy-related data cited in the testimony are the author’s calcula-
tions  as  they  are  drawn  from  the  Energy  Information  Administration’s  Annual  Energy  Review
2006,  Report  No.  DOE/EIA–0384(2006),  Washington,  DC:  U.S.  Department  of  Energy,  June
2007;  and  Energy  Information  Administration’s  Short-Term  Energy  Outlook—August  2007,
Washington, DC: U.S. Department of Energy.

5 Strictly speaking, the term energy efficiency as used here today can be more broadly defined
as a reduction in energy intensity; that is, a reduction in the number of Btus needed to support
a  dollar  of  economic  activity.  This  change  results  from  two  key  drivers.  This  first  is  a  change

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

39

In  1970  Americans  consumed  an  estimated  68  quadrillion  Btus  (quads)  for  all
uses  of  energy—whether  heating  and  cooling  our  homes,  schools,  and  businesses;
powering  our  many  industrial  processes;  or  transporting  both  people  and  freight  to
the  various  places  they  needed  to  go.  If  we  converted  all  forms  of  energy  consumed
in  1970  to  an  equivalent  gallon  of  gasoline  per  capita,  it  turns  out  that  the  U.S.
economy  required  about  2,670  gallons  of  gasoline  equivalent  for  each  man,  woman,
and  child  living  in  the  U.S.  at  that  time.  Had  the  United  States  continued  to  rely
on  1970  market  structure  and  technologies  to  maintain  its  economic  growth  we
would today be consuming an estimated 210 quads of energy. That would have been
about  5,550  gallons  of  gasoline  per  person  equivalent.  But  in  fact,  the  consumption
estimated  for  2007  appears  to  be  only  slightly  more  than  100  quads  of  energy  (in
rounded  numbers).  Again  on  a  per  capita  equivalent,  this  means  that  the  United
States economy requires about 2,660 gallons of gasoline per resident.

In  examining  these  numbers  more  closely,  several  insights  might  pop  into  mind.
First, energy efficiency has allowed us to decrease the per capita energy use, at least
somewhat,  compared  to  what  we  used  in  1970  while  still  enjoying  an  expanded  set
of goods and services. Second, instead of doubling our energy use with the expanded
economy, in effect, the gains in energy efficiency have allowed us to reduce total en-
ergy  use  by  the  equivalent  of  110  quadrillion  Btus  in  2007.  As  such,  energy  effi-
ciency  has  ‘‘fueled’’  roughly  77  percent  of  the  new  growth  demands  in  the  United
States since 1970. The new energy resources, on the other hand, have provided less
than one-third of the demands (or about 32 Quads as shown in the figure).
Technology Drivers Behind Our Energy Efficiency Gains

Among  the  reasons  for  the  increased  energy  productivity  during  the  past  35–40
years  has  been  the  emergence  and  widespread  adoption  of  advanced  technologies,
including  substantial  improvements  in  standard  consumer  products,  new  high-tech
electronics,  improvements  in  fuel  economy,  and  the  emergence  of  a  variety  of  infor-
mation  and  communication  technologies  (ICT).  A  refrigerator  in  1970,  for  example,
would  have  consumed  on  average  1,600  to  1,800  kilowatt-hours  (kWh)  of  electricity

in  market  structure  as  we  move  away  from  energy  intensive  industries  as  a  source  of  income
to  higher  value-added  services.  The  second  is  what  we  typically  think  of  as  energy  efficiency—
more  efficient  lighting  and  consumer  products,  greater  fuel  economy  in  our  vehicles,  and  more
efficient  power  plants  and  industrial  processes.  The  United  States  has  benefited  from  both  eco-
nomic  drivers;  and  both  were  made  possible  by  a  combination  of  behaviors,  innovations,  and
choices  of  technology.  From  a  macroeconomic  perspective  the  evidence  suggests  that  anything
we  can  do  that  positively  reduces  energy  use  while  maintaining  incomes  and  economic  pros-
perity  can  be  termed  ‘‘energy  efficiency.’’  It  is  in  that  larger  sense  that  I  use  the  term  here
today.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

40

per  year.  Today,  new  refrigerators  might  require  only  450  to  600  kWh—even  as
their  volume  has  doubled  in  size.  In  1970  cogeneration  units  that  might  have
achieved  efficiencies  on  the  order  of  50  to  60  percent.  This  was  still  more  favorable
than  the  32  percent  system  efficiencies  of  our  electricity  grid  back  then,  a  level  of
inefficiency  that  persists  still  today.6 Yet,  cogeneration  was  seldom  part  of  a  com-
pany’s  long-term  energy  plans.  Their  more  productive  cousins—what  today  we  call
combined  heat  and  power  (CHP)  plants  that  can  achieve  overall  efficiencies  of  90
percent and beyond—are becoming a critical resource in the strategic plans of many
energy-intensive industries. In 1970 I was driving a used 1957 Chevy that may have
gotten  all  of  20–21  miles  per  gallon—if  that.  Today  I  own  a  Toyota  Prius  that  per-
haps  averages  45  miles  per  gallon.  And  today  I  do  more  online  banking  and  shop-
ping,  and  businesses  now  conduct  more  of  their  transactions  electronically—espe-
cially  in  the  last  two  decades.  These  and  many  other  advanced  technologies  have
added up to a significant increase in overall energy productivity.
The Social Drivers Behind Our Energy Efficiency Gains

The  impressive  gains  in  energy  efficiency  since  1970  are  the  result  of  numerous
innovations and choices made by both businesses and consumers. But what are the
drivers behind these innovations in efficiency? What spurs people to choose energy-
efficient  technologies  and  behaviors?  And  how  much  variation  is  there  in  the  deci-
sion-making process?

Among  the  drivers  of  innovation  and  efficiency  is  the  increasing  level  of  concern
about rising energy prices. However, while energy prices comprise an important mo-
tivating  factor,  innovation  and  efficiency  have  also  been  driven  by  concerns  about
environmental  degradation,  global  climate  change,  international  energy  security,
and  even  the  lack  of  adequate  energy  and  water  supplies  within  developing  coun-
tries.

In  other  words,  it  is  a  varied  backdrop  of  concerns  that  has  motivated  action  by
individuals,  households  and  companies  that  are  interested  in  solving  problems.  In
addition to their concerns over energy and the environment, individuals and groups
also regularly contend with concerns over earning a decent income, as well as devel-
oping  a  highly  profitable  enterprise.  But  the  complexity  of  the  process  doesn’t  end
there. A thorough understanding of motivating factors is further complicated by the
diversity of interests, backgrounds, skills, and personalities held by would-be agents
of change. In fact, these individuals and organizations bring with them both shared
and  divergent  sets  of  interests,  backgrounds  and  skills,  creating  a  kaleidoscope  of
shifting  concerns  and  behavioral  outcomes.  In  other  words,  there  is  a  wide  range
of  corporate,  group,  and  individual  characteristics  that  shape  one’s  propensity  to-
ward  energy-saving  or  energy-efficient  behaviors  and  those  characteristics  often
change  over  time;  yet  none  of  these  attributes  or  concerns  are  adequately  captured
in the energy prices signals and changes in incomes that economic models typically
rely on to evaluate the impacts of energy programs or policies. Moreover, by relying
on  energy  prices  as  the  primary  driver  of  behavioral  change,  economic  models  fail
to  measure  and  incorporate  the  impact  of  other  important  elements  such  as  con-
sumer information pertaining to the availability of more energy-efficient products on
the  market,  the  variety  of  ways  of  shipping  a  product  while  generating  net  energy
savings, or traveling to new places for work or leisure in ways that use less energy.
In  short,  energy  choices  are  not  simply  a  function  of  energy  prices  but  involve  a
more  complex  mix  of  motivating  factors  that  vary  across  individuals  and  organiza-
tions and that shape their propensity to act.

The good news is that studies by ACEEE and others have repeatedly shown that
the United States can cost-effectively reduce energy use 25 percent or more over the
next  15–20  years  in  ways  that  increase  overall  productivity.7 Moreover,  given  the
right  choices  and  investments  in  the  many  cost-effective  but  underutilized  energy-
efficient technologies, these gains in energy productivity could provide much needed

6 Perhaps  also  of  interest  to  the  Subcommittee:  what  we  waste  just  in  the  production  of  elec-
tricity  is  more  energy  than  Japan  uses  to  power  its  entire  economy.  We  already  have  the  tech-
nology  to  substantially  reduce  that  level  of  waste,  however.  It  appears  that  the  real  problem
may  lie  more  in  understanding  how  to  encourage  the  adoption  of  technologies  like  combined
heat  and  power  or  other  waste-to-energy  technologies.  Hence,  the  problem  may  lie  more  in  the
dimension of social sciences than in improving our technology.

7 Nadel,  Steven.  R.  Neal  Elliott,  and  Therese  Langer.  2005.  A  Choice  of  Two  Paths:  Energy
Savings  from  Pending  Federal  Energy  Legislation.  Washington,  DC:  American  Council  for  an
Energy-Efficiency  Economy.  See  also,  McKinsey  Global  Institute,  2007,  Curbing  the  Global  En-
ergy  Demand  Growth:  The  Energy  Productivity  Opportunity,  San  Francisco,  CA,  McKinsey  &
Company. Finally, see also, ‘‘Closing the Efficiency Gap: Strategic Plan for Energy Efficiency Im-
provement in the G8 Countries,’’ 2007, Washington, DC, United Nations Foundation.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

41

slack in the now overly stressed energy supply markets.8 This, in turn, could lessen
energy  price  volatilities,  and  minimize  greenhouse  gas  emissions—all  in  ways  that
save additional money for businesses and consumers. While this information is read-
ily available, it has not been included in most of the economic models used to evalu-
ate  energy  policies.  As  a  result,  policies  based  on  these  models  have  consistently
overlooked  the  cost-effective  energy  savings  that  can  be  achieved  through  changing
social  preferences  and  the  accelerated  adoption  of  energy-efficient  technologies  and
behaviors.
Economic Models, Social Preferences and Energy Policy

The  Subcommittee  has  asked:  how  predictive  is  a  purely  economic  approach  to
evaluating the impact of energy policy? To answer this question it might be helpful
to  first  put  this  into  context.  For  that  purpose,  let  me  take  you  back  to  2003  when
both  the  U.S.  Environmental  Protection  Agency  (EPA)  and  the  U.S.  Department  of
Energy’s Energy Information Administration (EIA) received a Congressional request
to evaluate a proposed climate policy that would reduce energy-related carbon diox-
ide  emissions  by  about  one-third  compared  to  levels  forecasted  for  the  year  2025.
The  resulting  EIA  modeling  analysis,  using  its  National  Energy  Modeling  System
(NEMS), suggested that if the policy were adopted there would be a negative impact
on  investment  and  household  consumption,  and  that  energy  prices  would  rise  sig-
nificantly  compared  to  the  reference  case.9 Conversely,  the  EPA  relied  on  the  Ar-
gonne  National  Laboratory’s  AMIGA  Modeling  System  and  found  the  impacts  to  be
somewhat  more  positive;  indeed,  the  analysis  (which  unfortunately  was  never  pub-
licly  released)  showed  that  there  could  be  small  but  positive  increases  to  both  in-
vestment and consumption over time.10

Three  key  differences  perhaps  explain  this  sharp  contrast  in  modeling  results.
First,  the  AMIGA  modeling  system  tends  to  use  a  more  dynamic  characterization
of  technology  cost  and  performance  over  time.  This  means  that  as  price  signals  in-
crease  (for  example,  through  a  cap  and  trade  mechanism)  and  as  non-price  policies
are  implemented  (by  expanding  voluntary  initiatives  such  as  the  ENERGY  STAR
programs,  for  example,  or  by  increasing  performance-based  standards  such  as  the
Energy Efficiency Resource Standard and appropriating additional funds for energy-
related R&D efforts), the AMIGA modeling system tends to show a greater improve-
ment  in  technology  performance  that  reduces  the  costs  and  generates  a  higher  en-
ergy bill savings. Second, the model tracks the substitution of productive capital as
it  displaces  less  energy-efficient  technologies  over  time.  It  then  translates  this  into
a  more  appropriate  GDP  accounting  framework  than  the  NEMS  model  is  able  to
do.11 Finally,  AMIGA  allows  consumer  and  business  preferences  to  shift  over  time
in  response  to  various  programs.  For  example,  consumers  today  might  purchase  a
new  appliance  only  if  it  pays  for  itself  in  three  years.  However,  an  expanded  set
of voluntary programs might encourage the adoption of technologies that might pay
for  themselves  in,  say,  four  or  five  years.  That  greater  willingness  to  adopt  tech-
nologies would mean a greater level of net energy savings for the economy.12

There  are  two  critical  points  to  be  made  in  answering  the  Subcommittee’s  ques-
tion in this regard. First, since the EIA report was the only analysis that was pub-
licly released, the persistent storyline of negative economic impacts tended to erode
public and Congressional support for any meaningful action on either energy or cli-
mate  policy  in  the  United  States.  Therefore,  the  most  direct  effect  of  poorly  devel-

8 Elliott,  R.  Neal.  2006.  America’s  Energy  Straightjacket.  Washington,  DC:  American  Council

for an Energy-Efficient Economy.

9 Energy  Information  Administration,  2003,  Analysis  of  S.  139,  the  Climate  Stewardship  Act

of 2003, Washington, DC, U.S. Department of Energy.

10 U.S. Environmental Protection Agency, 2003, ‘‘Preliminary Analysis of the Climate Steward-
ship  Act,’’  Unpublished  results,  May  23.  The  witness  has  direct  knowledge  of  this  modeling  re-
sult  as  he  was  the  EPA  project  officer  that  undertook  this  analysis  in  cooperation  with  the  Ar-
gonne National Laboratory’s AMIGA modeler, Donald A. Hanson.

11 In  fact,  AMIGA  generally  follows  the  accounting  framework  of  the  Bureau  of  Economic
Analysis  (BEA)  as  it  estimates  quarterly  GDP  for  the  United  States.  As  BEA  tracks  changes
in  GDP  for  any  given  period  of  time,  it  accounts  for  total  household  consumption,  total  invest-
ment, overall government spending, and total net imports. AMIGA follows this same accounting
procedure. Hence, if there are programs and policies that stimulate increases in more productive
investment  in  the  economy  that  saves  money  for  households  and  businesses,  and  reduces  im-
ports of oil and natural gas, AMIGA would show those programs and policies to provide net ben-
efits to the U.S. economy.

12 Perhaps of interest to the Subcommittee, there is more information on this topic as a result
of a November 2006 national workshop that ACEEE convened to explore a number of these crit-
ical  insights.  The  workshop  title  was  ‘‘Energy  and  Economic  Policy  Models:  A  Re-examination
of Some Fundamental Issues.’’ For a full list of participants and access to the papers presented
there, see: http://www.aceee.org/conf/06modeling/.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

42

oped  economic  modeling  exercises  on  behavior  has  been  to  limit  the  range  of  per-
ceived  opportunities  for  action  and  therefore  to  limit  action  itself.  In  other  words,
the publication of a set of modeling runs that relied on an inappropriate character-
ization  of  energy  productivity  benefits  has  limited  the  public  sense  of  opportunity
to  act.  Second,  the  exclusion  of  appropriate  social  variables  and  technology  charac-
terizations  from  these  models  also  tends  to  make  these  options  invisible  during  de-
bates  of  possible  remedies  and  solutions.  In  other  words,  poorly  specified  models
have  also  tended  to  limit  policy  options  to  a  narrow  set  of  potential  solutions  pre-
dominantly focused on increasing energy supply as opposed to policies that could in-
crease efficiency using social and behavioral science and existing technologies. Inte-
grating these important social and technological measures into economic models can
provide us with a more satisfying and thorough review of energy and climate policy
options, thereby significantly broadening the options from which to choose.

Currently,  the  primary  method  for  integrating  behavior  into  economic  models  is
through  what  economist  call  ‘‘elasticities.’’  When  derived  from  time  series  data  for
prices  and  incomes  as  they  compare  to  changes  in  energy  use  over  time,  these  val-
ues  provide  economists  with  a  measure  of  how  energy  use  responds  to  changes  in
prices  and  incomes.  As  an  example,  economists  may  determine  that  a  10  percent
increase  in  price  has  in  the  past  resulted  in  a  one  percent  decrease  in  the  demand
for energy. In that case we say that the energy price elasticity is -10 percent (some-
times  expressed  as  -0.1).  On  the  other  hand,  if  we  determine  that  a  10  percent  in-
crease in income has in the past resulted in a three percent increase in the demand
for  energy,  here  we  would  say  that  the  energy  income  elasticity  is  +30  percent  (or
expressed as +0.3).

These  and  other  forms  of  elasticities  are  used  directly  or  indirectly  in  economic
models  to  estimate  future  energy  consumption  based  on  different  policy  scenarios
that inevitably result in increased energy prices whether induced by fuel taxes, cap
and  trade  systems,  or  otherwise.  In  short,  the  elasticity  is  a  constant  that  is  used
by  economists  to  estimate  the  level  of  energy  consumption  at  a  variety  of  different
energy prices or to estimate the cost of inducing specified amounts of energy/carbon
savings. Unfortunately, this method fails to account for non-economic programs and
policies  and  changing  preferences  among  consumers  and  the  important  impact  that
they  can  have  on  elasticities  and  consumption  patterns.  In  other  words,  elasticities
and preferences are not fixed. They change over time. Figure 2 on the following page
highlights this point.

The  data  in  Figure  2  provide  annual  estimates  for  what  economists  call  long-run
elasticities over the period 1970 through preliminary estimates for 2007. As opposed
to monthly or quarterly changes, the so-called long-run in this case covers the year
to year changes in total U.S. energy consumption given changing prices and per cap-
ita incomes. The intent is not to suggest that these are actual estimates to be used
in economic policy models; the data are much too aggregate in hat regard. But they
are highly useful for our purposes here today. The intent behind Figure 2 is to high-
light  the  point  that  these  values  change  over  time;  they  are  not  at  all  constant  as
most economic models assume them to be.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

43

Using  one  approach  a  modeler  might  determine  that  the  income  elasticity  over
this period of time might be 0.60. But, in fact, the value changes annually. In 1970
the  income  elasticity  appears  to  be  on  the  order  of  0.50,  generally  rising  over  time.
By  2007  it  approaches  a  value  of  0.70.  On  the  other  hand,  the  price  elasticity  (in
absolute  terms  meaning  that  we’ve  dropped  the  negative  sign)  might  be  estimated
as  0.20  over  the  period  of  analysis  shown  in  Figure  2.  However,  there  is  a  signifi-
cantly different pattern of annual changes in price elasticities than is shown for in-
come  elasticities.  First  the  pattern  is  much  more  volatile.  It  starts  at  about  0.16
(again  as  an  absolute  value).  It  then  bumps  up  and  dips  before  reaching  a  peak  of
about  0.31  in  1982.  It  then  slides  back  down  to  0.17  in  the  year  2000.  The  pattern
finally closes at a significantly higher 0.24 by the end of the period.

Given  the  set  of  data  highlighted  in  Figure  2,  three  points  quickly  emerge.  First,
we’ve  clearly  confirmed  that  elasticities  are  not  at  all  constant.  Any  analysis  that
makes  that  assumption  may  generate  biased  results.  Second,  the  data  show  policy-
makers  that,  yes,  these  changes  are  occurring  but  they  provide  little  insight  into
what drives these changes; more critically, they provide little insight as to what mix
of  programs  and  policies  might  provide  a  more  reasoned  or  balanced  response  to
concerns  about  energy  and  climate  change  issues.  Finally,  most  economic  models
start with the presumption that prices are the critical determinant of behavior. But
the  data  in  Figure  2  suggest  that,  for  the  United  States  over  this  time  horizon,  in-
come  levels  are  a  greater  determinant  of  energy  use  than  are  energy  prices.  This
seems to suggest that policy-makers may want to explore income-based policy initia-
tives as a complement to the price signal. In other words they might want to evalu-
ate  the  extent  to  which  incentives  may  induce  a  more  appropriate  public  response,
or they might want to explore policies that encourage innovations that increase en-
ergy productivity and generate savings for the economy.13

The social sciences can and should contribute in at least three ways:

1. Recognizing and Understanding Changes in Elasticities
2. Documenting  and  Modeling  Socially-Induced  Changes  in  Energy  Consump-

tion

3. Documenting  and  Modeling  the  Variation  in  Energy  Consumption  Patterns

across Social Groups/ Segments

1. Recognizing and Understanding Changes in Elasticities

13 In  fact,  one  recent  journal  article  provided  evidence  that  a  combination  of  programs  and
policies  that  complemented  a  mild  price  signal  actually  generated  a  more  cost-effective  result
than a policy that depended on price signals alone to drive changes in total energy consumption.
Hanson,  Donald  A.  and  John  A.  ‘‘Skip’’  Laitner.  2004.  ‘‘An  Integrated  Analysis  of  Policies  That
Increase  Investments  in  Advanced  Energy-Efficient/Low-Carbon  Technologies.’’  Energy  Econom-
ics,  26(4),  739–55.  See  especially  the  discussion  surrounding  price  and  non-pricing  policies  as
highlighted by the results in Table 4 of that article.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

44

As  we’ve  just  highlighted,  most  economic  models  now  portray  elasticities  as
fixed.  However,  both  Figure  2  and  other  research  on  elasticities  shows  that
these values change significantly over time. The available evidence suggests
that  such  changes  are  the  result  of  changing  social  structures,  preferences,
values, social norms, feedback, commitment, etc. Moreover, complex systems
and  patterns  typically  arise  out  of  a  multiplicity  of  relatively  simple  inter-
actions that cannot be explained by the use of constant elasticities. But the
time  series  data  necessary  to  support  these  kinds  of  assessments  are  gen-
erally not available to draw precise conclusions.

2. Documenting  and  Modeling  Socially-Induced  Changes  in  Energy

Consumption
People respond to more than just energy prices. There is a large body of re-
search  and  literature  that  shows  that  people  may  reduce  their  energy  con-
sumption  by  as  much  as  one-third  in  response  to  non-financial  incentives,
disincentives, and other programs. Two examples highlight this point. First,
in  a  recent  study  of  hotel  guest  behaviors,  Robert  Cialdini  (also  a  witness
at  this  hearing)  sought  to  increase  the  number  of  guests  that  were  willing
to reuse their towels instead of having them laundered on a daily basis. The
study  left  cards  in  each  hotel  room  asking  guests  to  reuse  their  towels  and
noted  that  75  percent  of  people  staying  in  the  hotel  had,  at  some  point  in
their  stay,  reused  their  towels.  By  emphasizing  the  behavior  as  normative,
Cialdini  was  able  to  lift  reuse  rates  from  35  percent  to  58  percent,  saving
both water and energy.14
In  another  study,  Schultz  and  his  colleagues  used  a  social  norms  approach
to  help  homeowners  to  conserve  energy.  The  study  involved  delivering  no-
tices to household doorsteps, telling homeowners how their energy consump-
tion  compared  to  the  neighborhood  average.  Homeowners  who  were  con-
suming  more  electricity  than  their  neighbors  reduced  their  consumption.15
3. Documenting  and  Modeling  the  Variation  in  Energy  Consumption

Patterns across Social Groups/Segments
Understanding  variations  in  energy  consumption  patterns  across  social
groups  and  segments  is  critical  to  creating  effective  policies  and  under-
standing  the  effect  of  social  dynamics  on  energy  consumption  and  carbon
emissions.  For  example,  the  use  of  price  elasticities  of  demand  that  are
based on the average consumer fail to take into account the effect of income
inequality on demand and fail to capture the ways in which price elasticities
vary across different segments of the population over time.
People  are  social  animals.  We  act  in  accordance  to  the  norms  and  values  of
the groups to which we belong. Therefore, understanding behavioral change
requires  an  understanding  of  the  ways  in  which  membership  in  particular
demographic  groups  shape  and  constrain  individuals’  conscious  and  sub-
conscious decisions regarding energy consumption. A variety of demographic
characteristics  can  offer  important  insights  into  energy  consumption  behav-
ior,  including  those  linked  to  age,  education,  income,  household  status,  reli-
gion, gender, ethnicity, occupation, political affiliation, etc.
For example, recent studies on the relationship between gasoline prices and
consumption  levels  indicate  that  elasticities  associated  with  transportation
fuel costs have been declining.16 These studies create the perception that in-
creasing  gasoline  prices  have  little  impact  on  consumption.17 However,  a
study of the same relationship across different income categories is likely to
reveal  a  curvilinear  relationship  such  that  both  lower  and  higher  income
groups experience low price elasticities, while middle income groups display
higher  price  elasticities.  Low  income  groups  that  have  limited  discretionary
income have already reduced their consumption to the minimum and there-

14 Cialdini, R.B. 2005. ‘‘Basic Social Influence Is Underestimated.’’ Psychological Inquiry 16(4):

158–161.

15 Schultz  P.W.,  J.M.  Nolan,  R.B.  Cialdini,  N.J.  Goldstein,  and  V.  Griskevicius.  2007.  ‘‘The
Constructive,  Destructive,  and  Reconstructive  Power  of  Social  Norms.’’  Psychological  Science
(May).

16 Hughes, Jonathan E., Christopher R. Knittel, and Daniel Sperling. 2006. Evidence of a Shift
in  the  Short-Run  Price  Elasticity  of  Gasoline  Demand,  Center  for  the  Study  of  Energy  Markets
(CSEM) Working Paper 159. Berkeley, CA: California Energy Institute, University of California.
September.

17 For  a  thorough  review  of  the  literature  on  elasticities,  see  Dahl,  Carol.  2006.  Survey  of
Econometric  Energy  Demand  Elasticities  Progress  Report,  Golden,  CO:  Division  of  Economics
and Business, Colorado School of Mines, August.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

45

fore  cannot  respond  to  price  signals  by  reducing  their  consumption  further,
while high income groups that have large amounts of discretionary spending
are  better  able  to  absorb  the  price  increases  without  changing  consumption
patterns. It is the middle income groups that are most likely to change their
consumption in response to increasing prices of gasoline.

The Role of Social Science Research on Energy Policy

When  applied  correctly,  both  non-economic  and  economic  social  science  research
can  provide  critical  insights  into  the  most  effective,  viable,  and  sustainable  energy
policies.  When  correctly  specified,  economic  models  can  provide  policy-makers  with
a range of policy scenarios and likely outcomes. When used in conjunction with eco-
nomic  insights,  non-economic  social  science  research  can  help  by:  (1)  ensuring  the
development of appropriate technologies, (2) increasing the adoption of existing tech-
nologies,  (3)  improving  the  effectiveness  of  economic  policies  and  forecasts,  and  (4)
identifying  non-economic  mechanisms  for  catalyzing  the  types  of  social  change  re-
quired to reduce carbon dioxide emissions and moderate climate change.

Since  the  1980s,  funding  for  non-economic  social  science  research  on  energy  con-
sumption  has  declined  dramatically.  More  funding  is  clearly  needed  in  order  to  ex-
pand  our  understanding  of  the  social  dynamics  of  energy  consumption,  energy  con-
servation,  and  energy  efficiency.  By  expanding  this  knowledge  base,  we  could  sig-
nificantly  improve  our  capacity  to  reduce  energy  consumption  via  mechanisms  that
are currently less well understood.

Past  research  on  non-economic  mechanisms,  performed  primarily  in  the  1970’s
and 1980’s, is being currently being applied in some programs. At the national level,
the ENERGY STAR program is using research on information dissemination and la-
beling  to  improve  its  information  campaigns.  It  is  also  using  research  on  the  effec-
tiveness  of  social  marketing  strategies  in  its  design  of  campaigns  to  increase  the
adoption of energy-efficient technologies. A variety of electric utilities have also used
social  science  research  to  inform  demand-side  management  programs  to  effectively
reduce energy consumption and reduce peak load demand.
The Behavior, Energy and Climate Change Conference

Finally,  the  Subcommittee  has  asked  about  the  upcoming  Behavior,  Energy  and
Climate  Change  (BECC)  Conference—scheduled  for  November  of  this  year  in  Sac-
ramento,  CA.  We  certainly  invite  your  participation  in  some  capacity.  This  event
has  been  organized  in  response  to  the  needs  of  policy-makers  to  better  understand
the  energy  behavior  and  energy-related  choices  made  by  consumers  at  all  levels,
whether residential, commercial, industrial, governmental, or nonprofit. The routine
activities  of  these  energy  users  are  the  key  drivers  of  greenhouse  gas  emissions.
Therefore, efforts to reduce climate impacts necessitate a clear understanding of the
social  and  behavioral  factors  that  shape  choices  to  conserve  energy  or  to  purchase
more efficient appliances, buildings and vehicles.

Conference  planning  began  early  in  2007,  when  the  California  Institute  for  En-
ergy  and  Environment  (CIEE),  under  the  auspices  of  the  University  of  California
System’s  Office  of  the  President,  brought  together  a  small  planning  group  to  begin
to think about how to engage policy-makers and researchers in a dialogue about the
importance  of  behavioral  research  in  accelerating  the  pace  and  impacts  of  new  cli-
mate  policies  in  California  (and  California’s  partner  states  and  provinces).  Subse-
quent  discussions  led  to  a  Behavior,  Energy  and  Climate  Change  Summit  meeting
in Sacramento in May of this year. At the BECC summit, policy staff of state legis-
lature, energy and environmental agencies, private and public utilities, academic re-
searchers,  and  private  sector  representatives  (50  in  all)  met  to  discuss  common  in-
terests,  concerns  and  information  needs  in  this  area.  There  was  broad  agreement
regarding the importance of behavior and choice in understanding and affecting cli-
mate change, and a willingness to continue the conversation and to engage a larger
group in finding ways to improve policy, enhance program impacts, and increase the
quantity of scientific research needed to support these efforts.

An  important  outcome  of  the  summit  is  the  upcoming  Behavior,  Energy  and  Cli-
mate Change Conference to be held November 7–9, 2007 in Sacramento, California.
CIEE  has  partnered  with  the  American  Council  for  an  Energy-Efficient  Economy
(ACEEE)  and  Stanford  University’s  Precourt  Institute  for  Energy  Efficiency  (PIEE)
in sponsoring this meeting, which has now gained national attention and participa-
tion  from  across  the  United  States  and  Canada.  (ACEEE  has  consistently  provided
a venue to report behavior research related to energy use for 25 years at its biennial

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

46

on 

Summer  Study  on  Energy  Efficiency  in  Buildings.18 PIEE  is  a  newly  funded  insti-
tute.  It  has  behavior  research  as  one  of  six  focal  areas  and  is  compiling  a  database
of the literature.)

The  BECC  conference  program  includes  more  than  60  speakers  and  will  cover  a
broad range of topics. But a common theme is linking knowledge—whether from sci-
entific literatures, ongoing academic research, energy evaluation, or program experi-
ence—to policy development and implementation. The hoped-for results will include
increased  awareness,  new  collaborations  between  researchers  and  decision-makers
in  industry  and  government,  a  more  effective  mix  of  policies  (voluntary  and  regu-
latory),  greater  support  for  behavior-focused  research,  and  an  acceleration  of  the
rate  and  impacts  of  efforts  to  reduce  climate  change  in  California  and  elsewhere.
More  of  the  conference  details,  including  the  preliminary  program  agenda  can  be
found 
site  at  http://www.aceee.org/conf/07becc/
07beccindex.htm.  The  final  conference  agenda,  the  full  set  of  presentations,  and  a
conference  summary  document  will  also  be  available  on  the  web  site  following  the
conclusion of the conference.

the  ACEEE  Web 

In  addition  to  the  conference,  the  initial  discussions  also  identified  the  need  to
compile the diverse and dispersed literature on behavior, energy and climate change
to  facilitate  research  and  encourage  collaborations  among  policy-makers,  academic
researchers  and  others.  The  Precourt  Institute  at  Stanford  is  undertaking  this
project  and  has  recently  developed  a  searchable  bibliographic  database  of  relevant
literature  as  well  as  lists  of  foundational  readings  and  other  resources.  The  initial
set of references will be available on their Web site on September 25 at http://piee-
behavior.stanford.edu. The database will expand over time as other researchers con-
tribute  additional  literature  and  information,  and  professional  profiles  of  research-
ers involved in the area will also be added.
Conclusions and Recommendations

Based  on  more  than  25  years  of  research  on  the  role  of  energy  efficiency  in  our
economy,  ACEEE  believes  the  evidence  indicates  a  generally  less-than-satisfying
performance  of  economic  models  as  they  have  been  used  to  assess  a  variety  of  en-
ergy  and  climate-related  energy  policies.  By  definition,  national  energy  policy  deci-
sions,  based  on  erroneous  or  incomplete  information,  will  lead  to  sub-optimal  eco-
nomic and environmental outcomes. The good news in all of this is that, despite the
generally pessimistic outcomes published by many of the conventional models, there
has  been  a  resurgence  of  interest  in  how  economics  and  the  social  sciences  can  in-
form policy, increase energy efficiency, and reduce energy consumption. One indica-
tion  of  this  renewed  interest  is  the  planned  Behavior,  Energy  and  Climate  Change
Conference to be held November 7–9, 2007 in Sacramento, California.

On the other hand, renewed interest does not guarantee real results. Any real ad-
vancements in the capacity of the economics and social science communities to con-
tribute to more meaningful policy insights will require targeted support from policy-
makers  to  overcome  the  current  lack  of  research  funding  as  well  as  the  paucity  of
existing data.

Given  current  circumstances,  and  based  on  the  available  evidence  regarding  the
contribution  of  social  sciences  to  energy  policy,  ACEEE  believes  three  distinct  rec-
ommendations  are  in  order.  First,  and  after  further  review  by  this  subcommittee,
we  believe  it  appropriate  for  the  Subcommittee  to  issue  a  set  of  findings  that  con-
firms  our  testimony.  We  think  it  will  send  a  positive  signal  to  the  economics  and
social science communities—that there is clear room for improvement. Second, sup-
port  the  development  and  funding  of  National  Energy  Efficiency  Data  Center
(NEEDC),  a  national  nonprofit  organization  whose  purpose  will  be  to  collect,  orga-
nize, disseminate and archive energy efficiency and social science statistics, particu-
larly those related to public policies and programs.19

Finally, and more critically, more research and greater research funding are need-
ed in order to expand our knowledge and understanding of how human behavior and
choice can increase energy efficiency, reduce our energy dependency, and reduce our
impact on the global climate.

Energy consumption is an integral part of our daily lives. Individuals, households,
businesses, industries, and organizations consume energy in work and in leisure, 24/

18 For  those  interested  in  learning  more  about  this  highly  regarded  event,  the  2008  Summer
Study  will  be  convened  next  August  in  Asilomar,  CA.  See,  http://www.aceee.org/conf/08ss/
08ssindex.htm.

19 For  more  details  on  this  proposal,  see:  Horowitz,  Marvin  J.  2006.  ‘‘It’s  Time  for  a  National
Energy  Efficiency  Data  Center,’’  Arlington,  VA:  Demand  Research;  as  presented  to  the  ACEEE
workshop,  ‘‘Energy  and  Economic  Policy  Models:  A  Re-examination  of  Some  Fundamental
Issues, Washington, DC. The Horowitz paper and others from this workshop can be downloaded
from http://www.aceee.org/conf/06modeling/.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

47

7.  Energy  heats  and  cools  our  homes;  harvests,  processes  and  cooks  our  food;  pro-
vides us with transportation; powers our computers; and powers our industrial ma-
chinery.

Energy consumption is rooted in human behavior. What is less widely recognized
is that the solutions to energy shortfalls are also rooted in human behavior. Instead,
the first and most common response is to look to technology to provide the answers.
And,  when  available  technologies  aren’t  adopted,  we  look  to  the  field  of  economics
to  explain  why  not.  Unfortunately  this  approach  is  unable  to  adequately  identify
and  address  the  behavioral  roots  of  our  energy  problems  that  extend  beyond  the
realm of economics. Effective solutions must draw on a broader understanding of so-
cial systems and human behavior.20

The  need  for  a  better  understanding  of  human  behavior  and  choice  has  been  re-
peatedly  noted  by  the  National  Research  Council’s  Panel  on  Human  Dimensions  of
Global  Change,  emphasizing  the  need  for  behavioral  research  for  effective  policies
that  reduce  emissions  and  mitigate  climate  change.21 Most  recently,  the  National
Academies  reported  that  behavioral  science  has  been  significantly  under-supported
in  the  U.S.  Climate  Change  Science  Program.22 In  fact,  most  of  the  social  science
work in this area has either been undertaken by lone academic investigators or sup-
ported  by  progressive  State  government  and  utility  companies,  particularly  in  Cali-
fornia,  the  Pacific  Northwest,  and  parts  of  the  upper  Midwest  and  New  England.
The  resulting  academic  social  science  literature  is  scattered  across  the  disciplines
of  sociology,  psychology,  anthropology,  and  economics.  It  is  not  coherent  or  well-or-
ganized.  And  it  is  difficult  for  policy-makers  and  researchers  to  access—although
there have been several efforts to bring these literatures together in comprehensive
reviews.23 The  non-scientific  literatures  are  mainly  from  energy  program  evalua-
tions  and  market  studies.  They  are  of  uneven  quality.  Although  some  of  this  work
can  be  found  in  public  databases,24 much  is  a  ‘‘gray  literature’’  that  is  not  known
to policy-makers and, in fact, not readily accessible.

More research and greater research funding will provide the means to expand our
knowledge  and  understanding  of  how  human  behavior  and  choice  can  increase  en-
ergy efficiency, reduce our energy dependency, and reduce our impact on the global
climate while still maintaining a robust economy.

This  concludes  my  testimony.  On  behalf  of  my  colleague,  Karen  Ehrhardt-Mar-
tinez,  and  my  other  associates  at  ACEEE,  we  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to
present  these  views.  I  will  be  happy  to  respond  to  further  questions  and,  of  course,
to  provide  any  additional  material  the  Subcommittee  believes  will  be  helpful  in  ex-
amining this critical topic.

20 In  my  own  work  these  past  several  decades,  and  although  I  am  an  economist,  I’ve  come
to see technology as something much different than what is characterized in the various energy
and  economic  policy  models.  This  difference  in  the  characterization  of  technology  may  further
illustrate the critical role of the social sciences in shaping a more robust energy policy. In short,
technology is not simply an economic characterization of machines and devices, or some stylized
production  function  that  is  coded  within  an  economic  model.  Rather,  I’ve  come  to  view  ‘‘tech-
nology’’ as the cumulative human knowledge embedded in our nation’s artifacts, equipment, and
structures  as  they  are  designed  to  deliver  some  useful  or  desired  social  outcome.  A  second  part
of  that  characterization  is  that  technology  is  the  set  of  norms,  rules  and  criteria  by  which  we
choose to deploy that knowledge.

21 Brewer,  Garry  D.  and  Paul  C.  Stern,  Eds.  2005.  Decision-Making  for  the  Environment:  So-
cial and Behavioral Science Research Priorities. Committee on the Human Dimensions of Global
Change, National Research Council. Washington DC: National Academies Press. See also, Stern,
Paul  C.,  Oran  R.  Young,  and  Daniel  Druckman,  Eds.  1991.  Global  Environmental  Change:  Un-
derstanding  the  Human  Dimensions.  Committee  on  the  Human  Dimensions  of  Global  Change,
National Research Council. Washington DC: National Academies Press. Finally, see Stern, Paul
C. and Elliot Aronson, Eds. 1984. Energy Use: The Human Dimension. New York: Freeman.

22 Committee on Strategic Advice on the U.S. Climate Change Science Program. 2007. Evalu-
ating  Progress  of  the  U.S.  Climate  Change  Science  Program:  Methods  and  Preliminary  Results.
Washington DC: National Academies Press.

23 For  example:  Schipper,  Lee,  Sarita  Bartlett,  Dianne  Hawk,  and  Ed  Vine.  1989.  ‘‘Linking
Lifestyles  to  Energy  Use:  A  Matter  of  Time?’’  Annual  Review  of  Energy.  14,  273–318.  See  also,
Lutzenhiser, Loren. 1993. ‘‘Social and Behavioral Aspects of Energy Use,’’ Annual Review of En-
ergy and the Environment. 18, 247–89. Finally, see Wilson, Charlie and Hadi Dowlatabadi. 2007.
‘‘Models  of  Decision  Making  and  Residential  Energy  Use.’’  Annual  Review  of  Environment  and
Resources. 32, 2.1–2.35.

24 California  Measurement  Advisory  Council  searchable  database.  http://www.calmac.org/
search.asp.  See  also,  Consortium  for  Energy  Efficiency,  Market  Assessment  and  Program  Eval-
uation Clearinghouse searchable database http://www.cee1.org/search/search.php

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

48

BIOGRAPHY FOR JOHN ‘‘SKIP’’ LAITNER

John  ‘‘Skip’’  Laitner  is  the  Senior  Economist  for  Technology  Policy  for  the  Amer-
ican  Council  for  an  Energy-Efficient  Economy  (ACEEE).  He  previously  served  al-
most  10  years  in  a  similar  capacity  for  the  U.S.  Environmental  Protection  Agency
(EPA),  but  chose  to  leave  the  federal  service  in  June  2006  to  focus  his  research  on
developing  a  more  robust  analytical  characterization  of  energy  efficiency  resources
and  behavioral  response  within  energy  and  climate  policy  analyses  and  within  eco-
nomic policy models. In 1998 Skip was awarded EPA’s Gold Medal for his work with
a  team  of  other  EPA  economists  to  evaluate  the  impact  of  different  strategies  that
might  assist  in  the  implementation  of  greenhouse  gas  emissions  reduction  policies.
In  2004  his  paper,  ‘‘How  Far  Energy  Efficiency?’’  catalyzed  new  research  into  the
proper  characterization  of  efficiency  as  a  long-term  resource.  Author  of  more  than
150 reports, journal articles, and book chapters, Skip has more than 35 years of in-
volvement in the environmental and energy policy arenas. He’s been invited to pro-
vide technical seminars in diverse places as Australia, Canada, China, France, Ger-
many,  Korea,  South  Africa,  and  Spain.  He  has  a  Master’s  degree  in  Resource  Eco-
nomics from Antioch University in Yellow Springs, Ohio.
Chairman BAIRD. Thank you, Mr. Laitner.
Dr. Ellig.

STATEMENT  OF  DR.  JERRY  ELLIG,  SENIOR  RESEARCH  FEL-

LOW, MERCATUS CENTER AT GEORGE MASON UNIVERSITY
Dr.  ELLIG.  Chairman  Baird,  Ranking  Member  Ehlers,  Members
of the Subcommittee, I would like to thank you for the opportunity
to testify today.

The  Subcommittee  asked  in  its  invitation,  asked  me  to  address
three  questions,  and  it  is  hard  not  to  address  those  without  first
saying a little bit about what I think economics is, what it can do,
what it can’t do. Since I am an economist, that is what I was asked
about.

On  the  Social  Sciences  Building  at  the  University  of  Chicago  is
an  inscription  from  Lord  Kelvin  that  says  if  you  cannot  measure,
your knowledge is meager and unsatisfactory. There is an oral tra-
dition  that  the  late,  great  economist  Frank  Knight  passed  down
through  some  of  his  students  that  the  late,  great  economist  Frank
Knight  looked  at  that  inscription  and  said  something  to  the  effect
of, yes, and after you have expressed it in numbers your knowledge
is also of a meager and unsatisfactory sort.

The  point  is  I  think  that  the  most  important  thing  that  econom-
ics  contributes  is  an  understanding  of  principles  that  help  explain
human  behavior,  not  numbers,  not  predictions,  not  even  picking
the stocks in the stock market, although those are some things that
economists  do,  but  rather  understanding  some  fundamental  prin-
ciples,  and  that  is,  you  know,  the  basis  from  which  I  am  talking
today.

The  first  question—I  will  paraphrase  the  questions  to  save
time—essentially  asked  how  predictive  is  a  purely  economic  ap-
proach and what factors other than price signals do we need to look
at to understand human behavior.

There  is  a  syllogism  that  we  use  at  the  Mercatus  Center  when
we are teaching Congressional staff how to analyze policy, when we
are  teaching  students  at  GMU  how  to  analyze  policy.  It  goes  like
this. It is actually very similar to something that Mr. Baird quoted
in  his  opening  statement,  that  institutions  in  a  society  create  in-
centives  and  knowledge  flows  but  then  guide  human  interactions
that create outcomes. And we tell folks, if you understand that, you
can  understand  the  effects  of  policy.  Now,  it  is  a  very  broad  state-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

49

ment, and it should be obvious from that statement that just doing
economics  doesn’t  answer  all  the  questions  we  need  to  answer  in
order to fully understand that. Institutions may be formal like laws
and regulations or they may be informal and more evolved like cul-
ture  and  values  and  social  norms.  And  there  is  an  awful  law  that
economists  certainly  don’t  understand  about  where  institutions
come from, how they evolve, how they change, which things are du-
rable,  which  things  are  not  durable.  They  create  incentives  and
knowledge  flows.  Incentives  may  be  financial  or  they  may  be  any-
thing  else  that  motivates  people  to  act.  So  I  define  incentives  very
broadly even though typically economists say incentives and people
think, oh, they are assuming people only care about money. Incen-
tive is really an understanding about human behavior, whatever it
is  that  motivates  folks  to  act.  If  you  make  it  easier  for  folks  to  do
something,  they  will  probably  do  more  of  it.  If  you  make  it  harder
for  folks  to  do  something,  they  will  probably  do  less  of  it.  That  is
a more general paraphrase of the economist lesson about prices.

Knowledge  flows.  Knowledge  is  not  necessarily  information  that
can be chopped up into bits and transported. It is often tacit which
means  individuals  need  to  be  able  to  act  on  knowledge  that  only
they  have,  and  different  institutions  enable  individuals  to  use
knowledge  differently.  And  finally,  outcomes.  Public  policy,  we
want  to  influence  outcomes.  The  problem  is  the  main  thing  that
public policy directly effects is institutions, so we have to track how
the  institutional  change  works  through  knowledge  and  incentive
flows to create outcomes.

Now,  why  did  I  go  on  for  a  long  time  about  this?  Because  it
should  be  fairly  obvious  from  that  description  that  we  need  a  lot
more than economics to understand that. So, you know, do we need
all social sciences? You get a big amen from me out of that.

Second  question  essentially  asks  about  whether  social  science  is
having an effect on policy? I sure hope so, and I think we can prob-
ably  all  cite  some  very  good  examples,  but  I  have  to  mention  that
in  talking  to  folks  in  federal  agencies,  talking  with  Congressional
staff and others in this town, I also frequently hear comments like
I understand what you are saying about good public policy but you
have  to  realize  we  do  stuff  for  other  reasons  than  what  you  are
talking  about.  And  if  Congress  were  to  more  clearly  signal  that  it
is actually interested in knowing about the actual results of policies
that  are  enacted,  putting  clauses  in  appropriations  for  example
that  say  this  is  the  outcome  we  are  trying  to  accomplish  and  this
is  how  much  of  it  we  expect  for  this  appropriation,  I  think  that
would send a positive signal that would help motivate federal agen-
cies to make greater use of research in both the social and the nat-
ural sciences.

Final  question  asked  about  what  kind  of  tools  and  methods  are
most appropriate for understanding energy-related issues. My short
answer,  all  of  them.  My  concern,  if  I  were  overseeing  federal  re-
search  funding  of  social  sciences  or  on  a  subcommittee  that  over-
sees the agency that oversees research funding, one of the most im-
portant questions I would ask is, is the way we do this encouraging
disciplines  to  use  and  look  at  a  variety  of  different  methods  or  is
it encouraging kind of a tunnel vision in which each discipline says
one  method  is  the  only  right  way  to  do  it?  I  know  economists  who

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

50

are  very  closed-minded  who  say  that  econometrics  and  statistics  is
the  only  way  to  get  empirical  knowledge.  I  have  heard  somebody
who  is  an  expert  on  program  evaluation  argue  that  only  random-
ized  field  studies  can  generate  useful,  empirical  knowledge.  It
seems to me we shouldn’t be throwing out any information.

In conclusion, you would get a yes out of me if you ask, are social
sciences important? The only reason I think that we care about en-
ergy  is  because  of  what  energy  allows  people  to  do,  and  so  if  the
focus  really  is  people,  then  we  need  social  sciences  to  understand
how energy policy affects people.

[The prepared statement of Dr. Ellig follows:]

Mr. Chairman and Distinguished Members:

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JERRY ELLIG1

Thank you for the opportunity to appear here today and testify on ‘‘The Contribu-
tion  of  the  Social  Sciences  to  the  Energy  Challenge.’’  I  am  a  senior  research  fellow
at  the  Mercatus  Center,  a  research,  education,  and  outreach  organization  affiliated
with  George  Mason  University  and  located  a  short  Metro  ride  away  on  the  Arling-
ton, Virginia campus. The Mercatus Center’s mission is to bridge academics and pol-
icy: we conduct interdisciplinary research in the social sciences that integrates prac-
tice and theory. Toward that end, we have a variety of policy-relevant research pro-
grams  and  also  operate  the  largest  economics-based  professional  development  pro-
gram for congressional staff, called Capitol Hill Campus.

My  own  research  focuses  primarily  on  the  causes  and  consequences  of  regula-
tion—primarily ‘‘economic’’ regulation, including economic regulation of energy. I am
not  a  model-builder,  but  I’m  a  big  consumer  of  others’  theoretical  and  statistical
models. There’s a perception in this town that the main thing economists supply to
the  policy  process  is  numbers.  When  two  economists  disagree  on  the  numbers,  that
gives  rise  to  jokes  with  punch  lines  like,  ‘‘You  could  lay  all  the  economists  in  the
world  end-to-end  and  never  reach  a  conclusion.’’  In  my  view,  the  most  important
thing economists can supply to decision-makers is not numbers, but understanding.
Reasonable researchers may sometimes hold differing views about the size of the ef-
fects of various policies, but there’s a lot more agreement among economists on basic
underlying principles that help explain human behavior in a predictable way: people
try to do the best they can with what they’ve got, consumers buy less of something
if  the  price  goes  up,  price  controls  imposed  on  competitive  markets  tend  to  create
shortages,  monopoly  harms  consumers,  trade  makes  both  parties  better  off,  indi-
vidual  decisions  can  make  society  worse  off  if  there  are  significant  ‘‘externalities,’’
and so forth.

I  doubt  you  will  get  much  disagreement  from  this  panel  on  whether  the  social
sciences have a role in energy policy. Energy enables people to do things they could
not  otherwise  do,  or  could  only  do  at  very  great  cost  and  inconvenience.  Energy  al-
lows  us  to  maintain  and  improve  our  quality  of  life.  In  other  words,  energy  should
be the servant, not the master; energy is a means of enhancing human welfare, not
an  end  in  itself.  Since  the  social  sciences  study  how  people  interact,  the  social
sciences  are  necessary  if  we  want  to  understand  the  effects  of  energy,  and  energy
policy, on people.

We  should  keep  in  mind  both  the  contributions  and  the  limits  of  the  social
sciences; they are necessary but not sufficient to make policy choices. Effective deci-
sion-making  requires  two  things:  knowledge  of  the  consequences  of  alternative
courses  of  action  and  value  judgments  that  allow  the  decision-maker  to  determine
which  consequences  are  the  most  desirable.  Like  any  of  the  sciences,  the  social
sciences are tools for understanding causation—what is and what would likely hap-
pen as a result of various policy initiatives. To decide what should be done, decision-
makers  must  combine  the  results  of  the  analysis  with  value  judgments  that  reflect
their  assessment  of  what  is  worth  doing.  No  analytical  model,  no  matter  how  com-
plex, can automatically crank out the ‘‘right’’ policy decision.

But  just  as  analysis  is  not  a  substitute  for  judgment,  values  are  not  a  substitute
for  understanding  reality.  Values  determine  what  outcomes  decision-makers  would
want  to  pursue,  but  values  alone  do  not  provide  the  cause-and-effect  analysis  nec-
essary  to  determine  how  those  outcomes  can  be  accomplished  most  effectively.  At

1 The  views  expressed  in  this  testimony  are  solely  my  own  and  are  not  official  positions  of

the Mercatus Center or of George Mason University.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

51

least as important as how options can be accomplished most effectively is the anal-
ysis of unintended consequences. Without the firm grounding in reality provided by
social science, decision-makers are flying blind. The social sciences, and science gen-
erally, are crucial to policy because reality isn’t optional.

The  Subcommittee’s  invitation  to  testify  posed  three  questions;  I’ll  take  each  in

turn.
1. How  predictive  is  a  purely  economic  approach  to  evaluating  the  impact  of  energy
policy  on  individual  and  communal  behavior?  What  factors  other  than  price  sig-
nals need to be considered when developing and applying economic models to en-
ergy-related behaviors?
Let  me  start  with  the  second  question  first.  Real  policy  problems  do  not  respect
disciplinary  boundaries.  For  this  reason,  it’s  most  useful  to  think  of  different  social
sciences  as  complementary  sets  of  tools  for  understanding  reality,  rather  than  dif-
ferent  ways  of  understanding  that  are  in  opposition  to  each  other.  In  other  words,
we  don’t  need  to  decide  whether  an  ‘‘economic’’  or  ‘‘psychological’’  or  ‘‘sociological’’
approach is the right one. Properly understood, each is a different piece of the puz-
zle.  All  of  these  examine  these  questions  from  a  different  perspective  and  provide
valuable insight.

Let  me  put  it  another  way,  using  a  simple  syllogism  that  we  frequently  employ
when  analyzing  the  effects  of  policy  in  the  economic  education  programs  the
Mercatus  Center  runs  for  congressional  staff:  Institutions  generate  both  incentives
and knowledge flows that shape human interaction, and human interaction leads to
outcomes.  That’s  just  one  sentence,  but  it  requires  many  social  sciences  to  under-
stand all the implications. Let me explain.

Institutions are the established ways of doing things. They may be formal and ex-
plicitly enforced, such as laws and regulations, or they may be informal, such as cul-
ture,  ethics  and  social  norms.  Institutions  define  the  ‘‘rules  of  the  game’’—what  is
considered permissible and impermissible behavior. They also shape the way people
perceive and interpret what’s going on around them.

Incentives  are  whatever  motivate  people  to  act.  They  may  be  monetary  or  non-
monetary.  Cash,  fame,  a  desire  to  ‘‘do  the  right  thing,’’  a  desire  to  ‘‘go  along  with
the crowd,’’ or the prospect of a pleasant afterlife are all incentives.

Knowledge can be objective information that can be written down and transferred.
But a great deal of knowledge is highly dispersed. Much relevant knowledge is tacit;
as  physical  chemist  and  philosopher  of  science  Michael  Polanyi  put  it,  ‘‘We  know
more  than  we  can  tell.’’ 2 Public  policy  can  have  a  significant  effect  on  the  extent
to which people utilize and act on dispersed and tacit knowledge.

Outcomes  are  the  things  we  actually  observe  people  doing  and  the  consequences
of  those  actions.  Outcomes  can  be  the  intended  effects  of  a  policy,  or  they  may  be
unintended  consequences.  The  policy-making  process  should  identify  desired  out-
comes,  identify  ways  of  measuring  the  policy’s  effect  on  those  outcomes,  and  also
identify and analyze potential unintended consequences. Indeed, in the Government
Performance and Results Act, Congress required federal agencies to do this for their
most  important  strategic  goals.  Agencies  are  supposed  to  articulate  the  major  out-
comes  they  are  trying  to  achieve,  measure  whether  they  have  achieved  them,  and
match outcomes with information on resources and costs.

Returning to my one-sentence syllogism, we can start with the fact that, although
public policy ultimately seeks to influence outcomes, it can only directly alter insti-
tutions.  The  fact  that  a  policy  is  intended  to  achieve  a  particular  outcome  does  not
guarantee  that  the  policy  will  achieve  the  outcome.  Policy  can  only  alter  institu-
tions—mostly the formal institutions, such as laws and regulations. The problem is,
behavior  does  not  necessarily  change  exactly  as  policy-makers  intend;  many  other
factors come into play. The behavior of people changes as the incentives and knowl-
edge  flows  change.  To  understand  the  effects  of  a  policy,  decision-makers  need  to
understand  how  the  policy  change  alters  knowledge  flows  and  incentives,  and  how
those in turn affect both producer and consumer behavior—all the subjects of social
science research.

What’s  the  role  of  economics  in  this  big  picture?  Most  contemporary  economics
textbooks define economics as the study of how people satisfy unlimited wants with
limited resources. ‘‘Unlimited wants’’ are the things that people value, for whatever
reason. ‘‘Limited resources’’ simply means that neither individuals nor our entire so-
ciety  have  enough  resources  to  get  everything  we  can  imagine  we  want.  Whenever
people try to do the best they can with what they’ve got, economics helps us under-
stand the decisions they make.

2 Michael Polanyi, The Tacit Dimension (1974), p. 4.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

52

Now  let  me  turn  to  the  first  question:  ‘‘How  predictive  is  a  purely  economic  ap-
proach to evaluating the impact of energy policy on individual and communal behav-
ior?  Predicting  what  decisions  people  will  make  requires  that  we  know  something
about  what  specific  wants  people  have,  what  their  priorities  are,  what  possibilities
they  perceive,  and  what  resources  they  believe  they  have  or  can  get.  This  is  where
other  social  sciences  enter  the  picture.  Psychology,  sociology,  anthropology,  neuro-
science,  sociobiology,  and  numerous  other  social  sciences  help  us  understand  what
people want, why they have the wants they have, how and what opportunities they
perceive, what wants and methods they regard as ‘‘proper’’ and ‘‘improper,’’ how val-
ues and wants change, which opportunities for innovation will get noticed and acted
upon,  and  numerous  other  questions  that  must  be  answered  to  predict  how  people
will react to particular policies.

Here are a few of the many questions that economics either cannot answer or can-

not answer by itself:

• How  do  particular  formal  and  informal  institutions  emerge  and  change  over
time?  This  includes  laws,  culture,  ethics,  norms,  and  other  social  influences
that guide behavior.

• Why  do  many  individuals  follow  group  norms,  and  why  do  some  decline  to

do so?

ior?

• What factors count as incentives for individuals in particular situations?
• How  does  the  way  people  receive  and  process  information  affect  their  behav-

• How  do  institutions,  incentives  and  knowledge  flows  alter  the  ‘‘mental  mod-

els,’’ heuristics, and ‘‘rules of thumb’’ that guide individual decisions?

I hope it’s clear from this brief description that the relationship between econom-

ics and other social sciences should be one of complementarity, not conflict.

These comments on the role of economics and other social sciences are somewhat
esoteric. A few concrete examples from energy policy might help make my meaning
clearer.

One  of  the  most  basic  insights  of  economics  is  that  price  controls  tend  to  create
shortages  when  the  controlled  price  is  below  the  price  that  would  otherwise  occur
in the market. In the 1970s, the U.S. imposed an extensive system of price controls
on  oil  and  gasoline.  Gas  lines  resulted,  because  there  was  no  incentive  to  conserve,
and  no  signal  that  people  could  use  to  figure  out  how  much  to  conserve.  We  had
a similar experience in the 1970s with natural gas price controls.3

In  recent  years,  oil  and  gasoline  prices  have  been  relatively  unregulated.  When
this is the case, prices send signals to consumers and producers about the true state
of  the  world,  and  those  prices  change  quickly  with  changing  situations.  Regulation
of  prices  will  always  distort  these  signals  although  governments  have  tried  this
throughout history. Rent controls (held artificially low) have caused shortages in the
supply of rental housing, and minimum prices on airline tickets increased consumer
costs  and  caused  people  to  take  fewer  flights  than  they  would  otherwise.  Today,
changes in crude oil prices caused by events anywhere in the world translate quick-
ly into changes in retail gasoline prices. Nobody likes paying $2.50 or $3.00 per gal-
lon for gasoline, but the rising price of gasoline in recent years has given consumers
a message and an incentive: stay away from the pumps unless gasoline is worth at
least this much to you. So we don’t have gas lines, and nobody has to sleep in their
cars  to  get  a  good  place  in  line  even  when  the  price  of  oil  hits  $80  per  barrel,  as
it did last week.

Oil  and  natural  gas  provide  textbook  examples  of  how  economic  principles  can
provide valuable insight on the fundamental causes of controversial policy problems.
This isn’t just a figure of speech; the examples really are used in textbooks to illus-
trate  the  effects  of  price  controls.4 Note  that  social  science  examines  not  just  con-
sumer  behavior,  but  producer  behavior  as  well.  Prices  send  strong  signals  to  moti-
vate the appropriate behavior to match supply and demand.

3 In  their  classic  study  of  natural  gas  price  controls,  Stephen  Breyer  and  Paul  MacAvoy  con-
cluded  that  natural  gas  regulation’s  ‘‘major  objective—benefiting  the  household  consumer—was
not achieved. . .regulation denied consumers gas reserves for which they would have been will-
ing to pay.’’ The that regulation imposed on households outweighed any benefits households re-
ceived  as  price  controls  redistributed  wealth  from  gas  producers  to  consumers.  See  Stephen
Breyer  and  Paul  MacAvoy,  Energy  Regulation  by  the  Federal  Power  Commission  (Brookings,
1974), pp. 86–87.

4 See, e.g., W. Kip Viscusi, John M. Vernon, and Joseph E. Harrington, Jr., Economics of Regu-

lation and Antitrust (Lexington, MA: D.C. Heath, 1992), Ch. 18.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

53

I  don’t  think  any  new  discoveries  in  the  analysis  of  human  behavior  have  under-
mined  this  explanation  of  why  we  had  gas  lines  in  the  1970s  but  don’t  have  them
today,  or  why  we  had  natural  gas  service  curtailments  in  the  1970s  but  don’t  have
them today. Price controls encouraged us to waste gasoline and imposed tremendous
human costs in the 1970s; decontrolled prices penalize that kind of waste now. Ditto
for  natural  gas.  And  I  doubt  that  advances  in  research  on  human  behavior  would
give  us  reason  to  think  that  the  effects  of  price  controls  on  consumer  and  producer
behavior would be qualitatively different in the future.

Maybe  the  size  of  the  effect  would  be  different:  if  there’s  more  of  a  conservation
ethic now and we reinstituted price controls, maybe people wouldn’t waste as much
gasoline  as  they  did  in  the  1970s.  And  if  we  had  gas  lines  again,  a  better  under-
standing of what drives individual decisions could also aid in crafting effective pub-
lic-service  messages  to  discourage  people  from  going  to  the  gas  station  just  to  top
off  their  tanks.  But  I  doubt  any  change  in  values  or  behavioral  factors  would  lead
people  to  consume  less  gasoline  as  a  result  of  price  controls  that  drove  down  the
price.

I didn’t mention price controls just because I wanted to discuss the 1970s; distor-
tions due to price controls still exist in some energy markets today. Retail price reg-
ulation of electricity is a good contemporary example. Most American consumers pay
the same price for electricity regardless of the time of day they choose to use it. This
increases  electricity  demand  at  peak  times,  and  it  may  increase  overall  demand  as
well.  My  own  household  is  a  good  example  of  this.  The  previous  owner  installed  a
washing machine and dishwasher that can be programmed to start on a time delay,
so  they  can  run  in  the  middle  of  the  night.  But  the  power  company’s  pricing  tells
us  it  doesn’t  really  matter  when  we  run  the  appliances.  The  resulting  increase  in
peak  power  demand  artificially  increases  resource  use,  electricity  prices,  and  envi-
ronmental  costs—if  only  because  more  peak-load  power  plants  must  be  built.  Dy-
namic pricing that promotes conservation or shifting of use to off-peak times would
be  a  ‘‘win-win’’  for  consumers  and  the  environment.  It  would  reduce  the  likelihood
of  peak-load  price  spikes  in  the  bulk  power  market  while  making  some  new  power
plant  construction  unnecessary.  Pilot  programs  demonstrate  that  consumers—even
residential  consumers—will  respond  to  the  price  signals  provided  by  dynamic  pric-
ing.5

Thus  far,  you  probably  think  it  sounds  like  I’m  saying  that  economists  already
know what’s important to know for energy policy, and we can’t learn anything from
other  social  sciences.  Nothing  could  be  further  from  the  truth.  I  don’t  think  other
social  sciences’  research  on  human  behavior  overturns  any  fundamental  economic
laws  if  we  really  understand  what  economics  has  to  offer.  But  I  do  think  this  re-
search can supply critical information that can help us understand how established
practices,  habits,  and  routines  change;  how  policy  affects  behavior  in  situations
where  many  people  are  motivated  by  factors  other  than  price;  or  how  institutional
and behavioral factors affect the size of individuals’ response to policy changes.

Dynamic electricity pricing, for example, is not being adopted very rapidly. In her
survey of dynamic pricing issues and pilot programs, Northwestern University econ-
omist Lynne Kiesling notes a variety of barriers. Some are formal institutions, such
as  the  rate  structures  traditionally  adopted  by  state  regulators.  But  she  also  notes
that inertia stems from what might be called cultural barriers:

The most important, yet also the most intangible and difficult to change, obsta-
cle to dynamic pricing and enabling technologies is the set of incentives for iner-
tia.  The  primary  stakeholders  in  the  industry—utilities,  regulators,  and  cus-
tomers—all  have  status  quo  bias.. . .  Customer  inertia  is  deep  because  they
have not had to think about their consumption of electricity and the price they
pay for it. . ..6

The marketing of ‘‘green’’ electric power presents another interesting and inform-
ative  example.  Where  they  have  the  freedom  to  do  so,  many  consumers  choose  to
purchase  green  power  even  though  it  costs  more.  Clearly,  something  other  than
price  is  important  to  these  consumers.  If  a  goal  of  public  policy  is  to  induce  people
to buy more green power, then it’s important to know what factors motivate people
to  buy  it  even  though  it’s  more  expensive—and  it’s  equally  important  to  know  how
a change in any factor, including but not limited to price, would change the amount
of  green  power  people  decide  to  purchase.  Do  people  buy  green  power  because  they
want  to  contribute  to  measurable  improvements  in  environmental  quality?  Or  be-

5 Lynne Kiesling, ‘‘Retail Electricity Deregulation: Prospects and Challenges for Dynamic Pric-
ing  and  Enabling  Technologies’’  (May  4,  2007),  http://www.law.northwestern.edu/searlecenter/
papers/Kiesling¥Annual¥Rev¥Final.pdf.

6 Kiesling, p. 37.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

54

cause  they  want  to  reduce  carbon  emissions?  Or  because  it’s  the  ‘‘in’’  thing  to  do
and  they  want  to  be  with  the  crowd?  Or  because  they  want  to  make  a  statement
about  their  own  values  regardless  of  what  everyone  else  is  doing?  The  answers  to
these  questions  probably  imply  very  different  public  policy  and  marketing  strate-
gies, and behavioral science can help answer these questions.

People  also  make  tradeoffs.  If  policy  alters  the  desirability  of  green  power  along
several  different  dimensions  in  opposite  directions,  then  the  amount  purchased
might  go  up  or  down.  Knowing  how  important  the  different  dimensions  are  would
help us identify whether a particular set of policies would ultimately increase or de-
crease  sales  of  green  power.  Market  research  informed  by  psychology  can  help  us
find out which other attributes of green power matter to consumers, and what kinds
of tradeoffs consumers are willing to make.

In short, I don’t think new research on human behavior allows us to discard what
we  know  from  economic  analysis.  The  real  contribution  of  this  research  is  that  it
helps us understand behavior in situations where people’s motivations, perceptions,
and limitations were previously not very well understood.
2. To  what  extent  are  policies  to  influence  individual  and  community  energy  use
being  shaped  by  what  has  been  learned  from  research  in  the  social  sciences,  in-
cluding economics?
This  is  a  huge  question,  to  which  there  is  no  simple  answer.  I  certainly  hope  we
as  a  nation  have  learned  something  from  the  experiment  with  price  controls  in  the
1970s. On a smaller scale, there are certainly examples of situations where research
in  economics  or  other  social  sciences  is  being  used  either  to  design  policies  or  test
their  actual  effects.  One  of  the  most  ambitious  pilot  programs  testing  consumer  ac-
ceptance  of  dynamic  electricity  pricing,  for  example,  is  the  Olympic  Peninsula
GridWise Demonstration Project, led by the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory.7
Federal policy seeks to encourages dynamic pricing and other forms of ‘‘demand re-
sponse’’ that reduce electricity use at peak times.8

However, I’ve also seen cause for concern. When teaching in Mercatus Center pro-
grams for congressional staff, time and again I hear feedback to the effect of, ‘‘I un-
derstand what you’re saying about what’s good public policy, but you have to realize
we do things for other reasons on the Hill.’’ One of my favorite examples was legisla-
tion enacted in 2003 which gave the Federal Trade Commission a 180-day deadline
to enact a regulation requiring optometrists to furnish patients with a copy of their
contact  lens  prescriptions,  but  a  365-day  deadline  to  perform  a  study  that  would
help  determine  whether  the  regulation  was  necessary!  (I  mention  his  not  because
I  think  this  was  a  bad  regulation,  but  because  the  process  just  seems  backward.)
When researchers at the Mercatus Center talk with federal agencies about the im-
portance  of  measuring  their  outcomes  and  assessing  how  much  of  the  outcome  was
caused by the policies they implement, we get the distinct impression that many ca-
reer  agency  managers  doubt  whether  Congress  really  wants  to  know  about  actual
policy outcomes. In at least one case, an agency manager told me he does not believe
Congress  wants  the  agency  to  identify  clear  outcomes,  because  if  specific  outcomes
were identified, that would erode support for the policy!

Thus,  actual  practice  sometimes  seems  to  contradict  the  congressional  intent
clearly  stated  in  the  Government  Performance  and  Results  Act.9 Discovering  why
this  happens  would  be  an  interesting  project  for  an  interdisciplinary  team  of  social
scientists.

It  would  be  helpful  if  lawmakers  signaled  their  willingness  to  make  use  of  social
science  research—both  prospectively  when  considering  legislation  and  appropria-
tions,  and  retrospectively  when  conducting  oversight.  If  every  piece  of  authorizing
legislation  contained  a  clause  stating  what  specific  outcome  or  outcomes  Congress
expects  the  legislation  to  achieve,  that  would  send  a  clear  message  that  retrospec-
tive  policy  evaluation  really  matters.  Another  clear  message  would  be  a  clause  in

7 Kiesling, p. 29.
8 See,  e.g.,  Federal  Energy  Regulatory  Commission,  Assessment  of  Demand  Response  &  Ad-
vanced  Metering,  Staff  Report  (Sept.  2007),  http://www.ferc.gov/legal/staff-reports/09-07-de-
mand-response.pdf.

9 Section  3  of  GPRA  requires  agencies  to  produce  strategic  plans  that  state  their  missions,
goals,  and  objectives,  ‘‘including  outcome-related  goals  and  objectives,’’  and  identify  program
evaluations used to reevaluate goals and objectives. A program evaluation is defined as ‘‘an as-
sessment,  through  objective  measurement  and  systematic  analysis,  of  the  manner  and  extent
to which federal programs achieve intended objectives. Section 4(b) requires agencies to produce
annual  performance  plans  identifying  measures  that  will  be  used  to  assess  ‘‘the  relevant  out-
puts,  service  levels,  and  outcomes  of  each  program  activity’’  and  resources  required  to  produce
those  results.  Annual  performance  reports  must  compare  actual  program  performance  with  the
goals in the performance plan.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

55

each appropriation indicating how much of the outcome Congress expects the agency
to achieve with the appropriation. If some policies were explicitly enacted as experi-
ments, perhaps with sunset clauses and with an authorization and appropriation for
independent program evaluation, that would help as well. As it is, even when agen-
cies  want  to  do  program  evaluation,  it’s  often  regarded  as  a  distraction,  a  burden,
or  something  they  just  don’t  have  the  time  and  resources  to  do.  Building  program
evaluation into legislation could help raise its priority.
3. What  tools  and  methodologies  are  most  appropriate  for  evaluating  the  effective-
ness of policies to incentivize consumer behavior with respect to energy use? What
kinds of basic research questions underlie the development of such tools and meth-
odologies?
A  variety  of  tools  and  methodologies  have  been  developed  to  evaluate  the  effects
of  policy  on  behavior:  econometrics  and  other  statistical  techniques,  surveys,  field
interviews,  randomized  field  trials,  laboratory  experiments,  archival  history,  and
others. One type of laboratory experiment that consumer researchers frequently use
is  one  that  is  the  social  science  equivalent  of  a  clinical  trial,  where  consumers  are
given  ‘‘conditions’’  that  would  either  contain  a  stimulus  (something  that  you  want
to  evaluate  to  see  if  it  changes  behavior)  and  a  control,  without  the  stimulus.  By
varying pairs of stimuli and controls, social scientists can uncover which policies are
likely  to  cause  consumers  to  change  their  behavior.  Practitioners  of  each  technique
can always point to aspects that could use further development.

But  it’s  important  that  research  in  each  discipline  avoid  becoming  wedded  to  a
particular methodology as the only path to truth. I know of economists, for example,
who  feel  that  manipulation  of  large  data  sets  is  the  only  ‘‘scientific’’  way  to  do  em-
pirical  research.  I’ve  heard  experts  in  program  evaluation  argue  that  randomized
field  trials  are  the  only  accurate  way  to  gauge  the  effects  of  policy.  No  doubt  we
could  find  some  social  scientists  with  similar  tunnel-vision  in  regard  to  other  re-
search methodologies. Federal research grants can either promote or discourage this
kind of tunnel-vision, depending on what kinds of criteria are used to select research
for  funding.  I  don’t  have  a  specific  complaint  or  solution  in  this  regard,  but  just
raise this as an issue that should be considered.
Conclusion

Policy  changes  at  best  affect  some  of  the  knowledge  flows  and  incentives  people
face. Social science research bridges the gap between policy and actual outcomes by
examining how knowledge flows and incentives change human behavior. Without so-
cial  science,  achieving  the  desired  outcome  is  really  a  shot  in  the  dark.  Good  social
science  doesn’t  guarantee  that  a  policy  will  succeed,  but  it  greatly  raises  the  odds.

BIOGRAPHY FOR JERRY ELLIG

Jerry  Ellig  is  a  senior  research  fellow  at  the  Mercatus  Center  at  George  Mason
University and an Adjunct Professor at the George Mason University School of Law.
Between  August  2001  and  August  2003,  he  served  as  Deputy  Director  and  Acting
Director of the Office of Policy Planning at the Federal Trade Commission. Dr. Ellig
has also served as a senior economist for the Joint Economic Committee of the U.S.
Congress  and  as  an  Assistant  Professor  of  Economics  at  George  Mason  University.
Dr. Ellig has published numerous articles on government regulation and business
management  in  both  scholarly  and  popular  periodicals,  including  the  Journal  of
Regulatory  Economics,  Journal  of  Politics,  Federal  Communications  Law  Journal,
Managerial  and  Decision  Economics,  Business  &  Politics,  Antitrust  Bulletin,  Con-
temporary  Policy  Issues,  Competitive  Intelligence  Review,  Journal  of  Private  Enter-
prise,  Texas  Review  of  Law  &  Politics,  Wall  Street  Journal,  New  York  Times,  Bar-
ron’s, and the Washington Post. His co-authored/edited books include Dynamic Com-
petition  and  Public  Policy  (Cambridge,  2001),  Economic  Deregulation  and  Customer
Choice (Center for Market Processes, 1997, with Robert W. Crandall), New Horizons
in  Natural  Gas  Deregulation  (Praeger,  1996,  with  Joseph  Kalt)  and  Municipal  En-
trepreneurship  and  Energy  Policy  (Gordon  &  Breach,  1994,  with  Alison  E.  Wood-
ward and Tom R. Burns). He is co-author of the Mercatus Center’s annual Perform-
ance  Report  Scorecard,  which  evaluates  the  quality  of  annual  performance  reports
produced by federal agencies.

Dr. Ellig received his Ph.D. and M.A. in economics from George Mason University
in Fairfax, VA, and his B.A. in economics from Xavier University in Cincinnati, OH.

Chairman BAIRD. Dr. Bordley.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

56

STATEMENT  OF  DR.  ROBERT  F.  BORDLEY,  TECHNICAL  FEL-
LOW,  VEHICLE  DEVELOPMENT  RESEARCH  LABORATORY,
GENERAL MOTORS CORPORATION
Dr.  BORDLEY.  Chairman  Baird,  Dr.  Ehlers,  Dr.  McNerney,  and
all the Members of this committee and staffers, I am truly honored
to  be  able  to  present  in  this  forum  and  also  visit  my  parents  in
Maryland.

I  was  asked  three  questions.  The  first  question  is  about  describ-
ing  the  type  of  market  research  I  have  done  at  General  Motors.
The first question I have looked at is estimating the change in——
As you can see, I am not technologically fully equipped to handle

the sophistication of this committee meeting, but bear with me.

The  second  area  I  was  focused  on  is  grouping  products  into  seg-
ments. You know, there is an awful lot of products out there, small,
mid-sized, large. The key question is, how do people perceive them?
How do they group products together in their own minds? Do they
group small products together, do they group mid-sized products to-
gether? Do they group environmentally efficient products together?
How do they actually group products together? And we want to try
to look at the way customers group them. So that is one issue. That
involved  a  lot  of  psychological  work  on  how  individuals  decide
which items are similar.

We  have  also  done  a  lot  of—or  I  have  also  done  a  lot  of  work
about  grouping  customers  into  segments.  For  example,  lower-in-
come  people  with  large  families,  people  who  want  some  style  but
are  price-sensitive,  people  who  want  a  vehicle  that  convey  status.
You know, this draws mainly on the socioeconomic literature about
the  different  social  classes  in  America,  their  needs  for  a  vehicle,  if
they  have  large  families,  if  they  need  to  tow,  as  well  as  whether
they  view  the  vehicle  as  merely  a  means  of  transportation,  an  ex-
pression  of  personality  or  status,  or  something  they  want  to  enjoy.
People  are  different.  They  have  different  needs  during  their  life-
style depending upon where they live, and that is important to un-
derstand.

Modeling  demand  for  products  as  a  function  of  all  the  attributes
of the product, performance, comfort, appearance, price. Now again,
this  draws  mainly  on  the  economic  and  statistical  literature.  Mod-
eling  the  decision  process  by  which  customers  first  become  aware
of a product, like how much can advertising affect their awareness
of  a  product?  And  this  work  draws  heavily  on  psychology.  If  you
are not aware of a product, then you can’t consider buying it.

The second stage is how they come to seriously consider the prod-
uct. Given the hundreds of products available, what are the simple
criteria  people  use  for  winnowing  down  the  set  of  choices  down  to
a  manageable  set  of  choices?  Do  they  screen  out  vehicles  with  a
poor image for quality, a poor image for environmental-friendliness.
How  do  they  screen  them  down  to  their  choice  set?  This  draws  on
the  psychological  and  sociological  literature  on  how  products  ac-
quire an image and reputation.

How  do  they  come  to  shop  for  a  vehicle?  Do  people  visit  a  lot  of
car  dealers  or  a  few?  How  much  does  the  increased  availability  of
information on the internet affect the shopping process? This is an
economic/psychological question.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

57

How  did  they  come  to  buy  the  product?  What  kind  of  products
should a dealer have on their lot to maximize the chances of having
what  the  customer  needs?  What  kinds  of  financial  offers  are  more
attractive  in  sealing  the  deal?  How  should  dealers  determine  how
best  to  approach  each  customer  since  some  customers  are  very  de-
tail-minded  and  others  are  more  holistically  oriented.  Some  of
these  questions  draw  on  economics,  others  draw  on  areas  of  psy-
chology that are still being researched.

Modeling the impact of advisor recommendations on the products
customers  seriously  consider.  Today,  recommendations  come  from
all sorts of places, from the internet, from Consumers Report, other
magazines, auto magazines, word of mouth. This is still an area of
considerable  research  by  psychologists  and  market  researchers.
One  of  the  big  issues  is  what  sources  of  information  do  people
trust? What do they rely on in making their decision?

Understanding  the  differences  between  work  practices  in  dif-
ferent  dealerships  and  how  those  different  work  practices  lead  to
better  or  worse  dealer  performance.  In  this  kind  of  problem,  the
dealership  is  often  treated  as  a  special  culture  which  is  studied
using  methods  adapted  from  cultural  anthropology,  and  it  is  been
very successful.

Second  question,  what  has  social  science  revealed  about  the  fac-
tors  that  influence  an  individual’s  vehicle  purchasing  decisions?
What questions remain unanswered? Although the developments in
economic and psychological methodology on models predicting indi-
vidual choice have been central to modeling customer demand. The
economist, Douglas McFadden, was very influential. He was award-
ed  a  Nobel  Prize  because  of  his  central  role  in  creating  many  of
these  models.  The  mathematical  psychologist,  Duncan  Luce,  re-
ceived  the  National  Medal  of  Science  for  his  role  in  creating  the
building  block  that  led  to  these  models.  These  models  are  funda-
mental to what GM and what other carmakers use in trying to un-
derstand  the  relative  importance  of  different  attributes  of  cus-
tomers.  We  also  employ  direct  assessment  techniques  for  trying  to
assess customer willingness to pay for attributes as well as for spe-
cific features like OnStar. And we do clinics again based on the re-
search in psychology and sociology about how to do clinics.

The whole question about how the internet has reshaped the pur-
chasing  process  is  currently  a  very  active  area  of  research  for
which  no  one  has  yet  developed  a  definitive  answer.  It  is  pro-
foundly  changing  the  market.  Does  the  internet  shape  customer
preferences  to  focus  on  attributes  that  are  more  communicable  on
the  internet,  like  cost  and  quality,  versus  less  communicable  at-
tributes, like vehicle styling and the interior comfort?

I myself have not specifically looked at the issue of fuel economy.
How are recent breakthroughs in research incorporated into mar-
keting  or  business?  In  what  role  might  the  NSF  play?  A  lot  of  our
previous  models  based  on  economics  assumed  individuals  are  ra-
tional.  One  of  the  real  paradigm  changes  has  been  in  research  in
economics  and  psychology.  The  Nobel  Prize-winning  work  of
Vernon Smith and psychologist, Daniel Kahneman as well as Herb
Simon,  have  strongly  undermined  that  perspective  and  suggest
that individuals are systematically not rational. We know basically
how they deviate from rationality, and that is led to a whole effort

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

58

of  trying  to  rethink  how  we  should  understand  customer  behavior
rigorously.  And  trying  to  operationalize  that  is  still  ongoing.  We
still don’t understand that.

There  are  clearly  some  success  stories  in  industry  collaboration.
I mentioned the Edelman Prize at the at the Institute’s forum con-
ference  as  an  example  showing  successful  applications.  There  are
some  non-successes.  I  think  it  is  critical  to  say  that  NSF  has  been
very  pro-active  in  trying  to  build  bridges  between  the  universities
and academia. When I worked at the NSF in the Decision Risk and
Management  Sciences  Program,  I  basically  was  concerned  with  a
program  that  explicitly  kept  matching  grants  between,  you  know,
NSF  and  industry  to  fund  academic  research.  I  was  also  involved
with administering some of NSF’s small business initiation grants.
There  is  a  lot  of  important  bridges  that  NSF  has  built.  Obviously
we can strengthen them and develop other kinds of things. For ex-
ample, one of my thoughts is we might have a faculty in residence
kind  of  program,  you  know,  in  different  kinds  of  corporations  be-
cause  a  lot  of  times  the  questions  that,  you  know,  industry  people
have  aren’t  easy  to  formalize.  If  you  have  an  acknowledge  scholar
there,  oftentimes  they  can  lend  perspective  because  you  really  of-
tentimes can’t communicate your problem via an email.

Chairman BAIRD. Dr. Bordley, I am going to ask you to wrap up
a  little  early.  We  are  going  to  have  a  vote  in  about  15  minutes,  so
in  order  to  make  sure  everybody  gets  to  ask  some  level  of  ques-
tions, then I am going to ask you to——

Mr.  BORDLEY.  All  right.  That  actually  finishes  my  testimony.  A
lot  has  been  done.  NSF  deserves  high  praise  for  what  has  been
done, but a lot more could be done. Thank you.

[The prepared statement of Dr. Bordley follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ROBERT F. BORDLEY

Mr.  Chairman  and  Committee  Members,  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify
today on behalf of General Motors. I am Bob Bordley, a GM Technical Fellow. I am
working  in  GM  R&D  and  Strategic  Initiatives  Group.  The  Committee  asked  me  to
respond to the following questions:
1. Please  describe  the  type  of  market  research  you  do  for  GM  and  how
your  background  and  experience  as  a  social  scientist  influences  your
work.
I  have  been  employed  at  GM  since  1978.  My  marketing  research  work  includes:
(1) Estimating  the  change  in  product  demand  given  changes  in  product

prices. This work draws heavily on conventional economics.

(2) Grouping  products  into  segments  (e.g.,  small,  mid-sized,  etc.)  based  on
which products customers consider comparable. (This addresses questions
like: do people first decide they want a vehicle made by a certain manufacturer
and  then  shop  among  the  available  vehicles  made  by  the  manufacturer  or  do
they first decide they want a mid-sized vehicle and then look across manufactur-
ers  in  determining  which  mid-sized  products  they  will  consider?  It  is  based  on
psychological work on how individuals decide which items are similar.

(3) Grouping  customers  into  segments  (e.g.,  lower  income  people  with  large
families,  people  who  want  some  style  but  are  price-sensitive,  people  who  are
want a vehicle that conveys status, etc.) This draws mainly on the socioeconomic
literature  about  the  different  social  classes  in  America,  their  needs  for  a  vehicle
(if they have large families or need towing capacity) as well as whether they view
the  vehicle  as  merely  a  means  of  transportation,  an  expression  of  personality  or
status, or something they want to enjoy.

(4) Modeling  demand  for  products  as  a  function  of  all  the  major  attributes  of
the product: performance, comfort, appearance, price, etc. This draws mainly on
the economic and statistical literature.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

59

(5) Modeling the decision process by which customers
(5.1) Become  aware  of  a  product:  (How  much  can  advertising  affect  awareness?)

This works draws heavily on psychology.

(5.2) Come to seriously consider the product: (Given the hundreds of products avail-
able,  what  are  the  simple  criteria  people  use  for  winnowing  the  set  of  choices
down  to  a  manageable  set  of  choices?  Do  they  screen  out  vehicles  with  a  poor
image  for  quality,  a  poor  image  for  environmental-friendliness,  etc.?)  This
draws on the psychological and sociological literature on how products acquire
an image and reputation.

(5.3) Come  to  shop  for  a  product  (Do  people  visit  a  lot  of  dealers  or  a  few?  How
much  does  the  increased  availability  of  information  on  the  internet  affect  the
shopping process?) This is an economic/psychological question.

(5.4) Come  to  buy  the  product.  (What  kinds  of  products  should  a  dealer  have  on
their  lot  to  maximize  the  chances  of  having  what  the  customer  needs?  What
kinds  of  financial  offers  are  more  attractive  in  sealing  the  deal?  How  should
dealers  determine  how  best  to  approach  each  customer  since  some  customers
are  very  detail-oriented,  others  are  more  holistically  oriented?)  Some  of  these
questions draw on economics, others draw on areas of psychology that are still
being researched.

(6) Modeling  the  impact  of  advisor  recommendations  on  the  products  cus-
tomers seriously consider. (Recommendations come from the Internet, consumers
report and other magazines, automotive magazines, word of mouth, etc.) This is
still an area of considerable research by psychologists and marketing researchers.
What sources of information do people trust?

(7) Understanding the differences between work practices in different deal-
erships  and  how  those  different  work  practices  lead  to  better  or  worse  dealer
performance. In this kind of problem, the dealership is often treated as a special
‘culture’ which is studied using adaptations of methods in cultural anthropology.
2. What  has  social  science  research  revealed  about  factors  that  influence
an individual’s vehicle purchasing decisions? What questions remain un-
answered? Have you looked specifically at the issue of fuel economy?

(1) Developments  in  economic  and  psychological  methodology  on  models  predicting
individual  choices  and  how  those  models  can  be  best  estimated  have  been  cen-
tral  to  modeling  customer  demand.  The  economist,  McFadden,  was  awarded  a
Nobel  Prize  because  of  his  central  role  in  creating  many  of  these  models.  The
mathematical psychologist, Duncan Luce, received the National Medal of Science
for  his  role  in  creating  the  building  block  that  led  to  McFadden’s  work.  These
models  help  GM  understand,  for  example,  the  relative  importance  of  quality,
performance, roominess, fuel economy, and price in affecting a customer’s chance
of  buying  a  vehicle.  We  also  employ  direct  assessment  techniques  for  trying  to
assess  customer  willingness  to  pay  for  these  attributes  (as  well  as  for  specific
features like OnStar.) Conducting these clinics is based on methodologies devel-
oped in psychology. The company also conducts massive surveys and, once again,
psychological  theories  about  how  questions  should  be  asked  in  surveys  have
been very important.

(2) The whole question of how the Internet has reshaped the purchasing process is
a  very  active  area  of  current  research—to  which  noone  has  yet  developed  a  de-
finitive  answer.  Does  the  Internet  shape  customer  preferences  to  focus  on  at-
tributes that are more communicable on the Internet (e.g., cost and quality rat-
ings)  versus  less  communicable  attributes  (like  vehicle  styling  and  the  interior
comfort of its seats)?

(3) I myself have not specifically looked at the issue of fuel economy.
3. How are recent breakthroughs in research incorporated into marketing
or business strategies? What role might the National Science Foundation
play  in  building  bridges  between  academic  social  science  researchers
and government and industry policy-makers?

(1) The previous models assume that individuals are rational. Research in both eco-
nomics and psychology (e.g., the Nobel-Prize winning work of economist, Vernon
Smith, and psychologist, Daniel Kahneman as well as Herb Simon) has strongly
undermined that perspective. This suggests that the entire paradigm may poten-
tially  have  to  be  rethought  on  the  basis  of  a  psychologically  sounder  under-
standing of human behavior.

(2) There  are  clearly  some  success  stories  in  industry/university  collaboration  as
well  as  many  more  stories  of  non-success.  The  fact  that  a  paper  gets  published

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

60

in  a  journal  which  cites  industry  support  and  funding  for  the  project  definitely
provides  no  guarantee  that  the  research  was  ever  used  (or  even  looked  at)  by
the  sponsoring  company.  However  the  Edelman  competition  of  the  Institute  of
Operations  Research  and  Management  Sciences  provides  many  examples  of
clearcut successes where universities were often involved. We need to learn from
these and other success stories.

It would be wrong to say that NSF has not already built some bridges between
university  and  industry.  The  Decision  Risk  and  Management  Sciences  Program
of  the  National  Science  Foundation,  when  I  was  a  program  director  there,  had
a  program  that  was  explicitly  concerned  with  funding  research  with  matching
support  from  industry.  NSF  also  has  small  business  initiation  grants  that  are
explicitly  focused  on  trying  to  encouraging  technology.  I  administered  some  of
those  grant  proposals  and  felt  that  this  program  was  also  very  useful.  (This  is
probably  also  true  for  other  NSF  programs  with  which  I  am  not  directly  famil-
iar.)  We  need  to  look  at  these  existing  programs,  understand  both  what  is  suc-
cessful  about  them  and  what  is  less  successful  about  them,  so  that  we  can
strengthen the bridges which NSF has already tried to build.

(3) Here  is  another  thought:  We  might  imagine  moving  to  a  model  where  a  person
with  an  endowed  chair  by  a  certain  company  would  be  committed  to  physically
spending a certain number of days a week on-site in that company’s location or
on-site  at  the  location  of  a  consortium  where  industry  practitioners  would  have
direct access. Currently endowed chairs are mainly housed in universities where
their occupants are more removed from the specific needs to industry. While it’s
important  to  have  some  time  spent  in  isolation  from  the  practical  problem—in
order to think about it—it’s also important to have some time spent directly in-
volved in the practical problem. A practical problem is frequently not something
that can be communicated from an industry person to an academic with a short
e-mail.  And  even  when  it  is  successfully  communicated  by  e-mail,  the  academic
solution  to  that  problem  often  turns  out  to  be  too  late  and  too  complicated  to
address  the  real  practical  issue.  The  Center  for  Naval  Analysis  used  to  have  a
program  (and  might  still  have  a  program)  where  researchers  were  rotated  be-
tween the research labs to work onboard a ship in order that they retain a real
feel for the needs of industry.

So a lot has been done to build bridges and NSF deserves high praise for its

accomplishments. But there is more that could be done.

BIOGRAPHY FOR ROBERT F. BORDLEY

CAREER SUMMARY

A  Dominican  Lay  Scholar  with  extensive  experience  in  developing,  applying  and

managing statistical, decision analysis and operations management models.
WORK EXPERIENCE
2007–Present, GM Technical Fellow, Operations Research Group, Warren, MI
2006–2007,  GM  Technical  Fellow,  Vehicle  Development  Research  Laboratory,  War-
ren,  MI.  Received  Award  for  Best  Decision  Analysis  Publication.  Supply  Chain
Design:  Determined  how  GM’s  supply  chain  should  react  if  GM  had  a  sudden
need  to  add  production  of  a  foreign  vehicle  at  an  existing  plant  (Part  of  Global
Flex initiative). Product Development: Quantified Impacts of late engine changes
using design structure matrix and workload model. Reanalyzed models relating
vehicle  attributes  and  customer  attributes.  Developed  an  alternative  approach
to robust design optimization based on decision analysis.

2003–2006,  GM  Technical  Fellow,  GM  NA  Product  Development  Center,  Warren,
MI.  Health  Care  Costs:  Worked  with  corporate  strategy  to  model  the  drivers  of
GM’s health care costs. Results led to reductions in brand drug coverage, initia-
tives  on  coordination  of  benefits  and  other  efforts.  Product  Development:  Mod-
eled  GM’s  new  product  development  process  to  identify  sources  of  cost  and
waste.  Particularly  targeted  opportunities  for  reducing  rework.  Led  to  initia-
tives focused on reducing product content change.

GM Proving Grounds, Milford, MI. GMNA Award for Creative & Incredible Perform-
ance in Engineering Design. Updating GM problem remediation tools (e.g., con-
trol  charts)  and  testing  by  applying  to  root  causes  various  product  problems
(fuel caps, fuel pumps, rattling, ignition switches, blower motors). Using Statis-
tical  Analysis  to  Properly  Target  Welcome  Call  Initiative.  Helped  specify  when
calls would be made and the vehicles to be emphasized.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Received 2004 Chairman’s Honors Award (savings>$360M/yr) and currently exceed-

ing $1B.

61

GM  Global  Engineering  Center,  Pontiac,  MI.  Used  influence  diagrams  to  identify

focused on root cause analysis.

the key drivers of GM warranty costs.
• Modeled  the  drivers  of  GM’s  JD  Power  Score.  Results  led  to  more  headcount
• Developed overall warranty cost driver model.
• Led team receiving 2002 GM’s People Make Quality Happen Award. (Realized
• Developed  battery  warranty  cost  driver  model.  Potential  Cost  savings  of
$30M/yr  identified.  Company  switched  to  more  heat-resistant  battery  design,
consistent  with  model  recommendations.  Developed  models  for  ground  war-
ranty, brake warranty, powertrain control modules.

savings: 250M/yr)

Enterprise Customer Network, Detroit, MI.

• Developed model of drivers of customer loyalty to assist in formation of GM’s

CRM strategy.

1998–2002,  Technical  Director,  GM  Corporate  Strategy  &  Knowledge  Development,
Detroit,  MI.  Provide  technical  support  in  decision  analysis  and  marketing  to
strategy formulation and operations improvement projects.
• Validated and implemented algorithm creating current product segmentation.
• Used statistical analysis to identify key drivers of dealer dissatisfaction, lead-
ing  to  development  of  best  practices  for  improving  VSSM  dealer  relations.
Subsequent  corporate  focus  on  these  drivers  improved  GM’s  dealer  satisfac-
tion from worst in the industry to average
• Developed  marketing  modules  of  enterprise  model  commissioned  by  Strategy
Board, including modules to value the impact of changing the number of GM
product entries and to project GM’s long-run share given current policies.
• Conducted  statistical  analyses  supporting  the  design  of  GM  web  tool,
• As part of a three-person team, guided the use of CART software for revising
• Developed  a  panel  on  social  cycles  as  part  of  creation  of  New  Product  Con-
• Led  successful  Dialogue  Decision  Process  projects  in  technology  partnering,
• Used Enterprise Miner to prove that the current needs segmentation is more
• Developed a 120-page overview of the approaches used by 60 major corporate

cepts war room. Team received 1998 President’s Council Award.

accurate than Claritas or demographic segmentations.

information technology and procurement.

GM’s needs segmentation.

AUTOCHOICE.

strategists.

1993–1997,  GM  Vehicle  Development  &  Technical  Operations,  Warren,  MI.  Man-
ager,  Portfolio  Planning  Department.  Coordinated  the  review  &  documentation
of GM’s R&D projects.
• Led  decision  analysis  on  more  than  50  R&D  projects.  Work  stimulated  dra-
matic  changes  in  some  projects.  Team  received  GM  Award  of  Excellence  in
1994.
• Managed  creation  of  a  database  to  enable  customers  to  access  GM  R&D
• Managed the implementation of new project budgeting system.

projects more easily.

1991–1993,  GM  Research  &  Development,  Warren,  MI.  Manager,  Management  &

Marketing Sciences. Managed a team of 12 R&D professionals.
• Managed development of a model prioritizing product problems based on their
• Developed  the  mathematical  model  that  was  the  basis  of  Pricewar,  a  widely

impact on product repurchases.

used GM product pricing software package.

1990–1991, National Science Foundation, Washington, D.C. Director, Decision, Risk
&  Management  Science  Program.  Administered  review  and  recommended
awards of grants from a $3 million budget.
• With other grant officers, successfully lobbied for creation of a social sciences

directorate at NSF.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

62

• Awarded first grants to industry as part of NSF’s private sector initiative.
• Successfully  championed  the  funding  of  educational  grants  to  teach  students

• Successfully  lobbied  for  doubling  the  research  budget  on  biotechnology  social

decision-making.

impact research.

1987–1990,  Operating  Sciences  Department,  GM  Research  Laboratories,  Warren,
MI.  Manager,  Decision  Support  Systems.  Managed  a  diverse  team  of  nine  pro-
fessionals in marketing, intelligence vehicles and risk analysis.
• Managed development of first needs-based segmentation.
• Managed development of in-vehicle navigation system.

1985–1987,  GM  Trilby  Vehicle  Design  Project,  Troy,  MI.  Supervisor,  Mission  Anal-
ysis Group. Managed a four-person team developing a mission statement for the
Trilby prototype vehicle.
• Led business case analysis for proposed new vehicle.
• Developed  a  template  specifying  how  the  ‘‘voice  of  the  customer’’  could  feed

into vehicle engineering.

1982–1985,  Societal  Analysis  Department,  GM  Research  Laboratories,  Warren,  MI.
Staff Research Engineer. 1978–1981, Associate Senior Research Engineer. Con-
ducted research & consulting work in economics, finance and environment.
• Discovered  the  importance  of  second  choice  data  in  potentially  segmenting
products.  This  idea  was  central  to  the  development  of  GM’s  initial  product
segmentation.

• Developed a model of air pollution for Environmental Activities Staff.

TEACHING EXPERIENCE
2002–present, Adjunct Professor, Industrial & Operations Engineering Department,

University of Michigan Ann Arbor, MI. Taught Course in Decision Analysis.

2000–2002, University of Michigan, Dearborn, MI. Adjunct, Lecturer, School of Man-

agement. Taught Courses in Operations Management.

1995–2000, Oakland University, Rochester, MI. Adjunct Full Professor, Systems En-
gineering  Department.  Taught  courses  in  engineering  risk  analysis  at  Oakland
University  campus.  Taught  courses  at  Vienna  on  behalf  of  Oakland  University
and Vienna Technical University.

1996–1998, Wharton, Philadelphia, PA. Guest Lecturer, Marketing.
EDUCATION
2005,  Sacred  Heart  Seminar,  Detroit,  MI.  Master  of  Arts  in  Pastoral  Studies

(summa cum laude).

1979, University of California, Berkeley, CA. Ph.D., Industrial Engineering & Oper-
ations Research. Thesis: ‘‘Studies in Mathematical Group Decision Theory’’ (Dr.
T. Marschak). Awarded 3-Year National Science Foundation Fellowship.

1979, MBA, Finance.
1977, MS, Industrial Engineering & Operations Research.
1976,  Michigan  State  University,  Lansing,  MI.  MS  Systems  Science  with  specialty

in Economic Systems.

1976, BA in Public Policy. Graduated Magna cum Laude.
1975, BS, Physics. Awarded 4-Year Full Scholarship, National Merit Scholarship.
REFEREED PUBLICATIONS
(74) ‘‘How to Make Risky Decisions Visually.’’ Visual Communication, 2007.
(73) ‘‘Statistical Decision Making without Math.’’ Chance, 2007.
(72) ‘‘The Rosary and RCIA’’. Catechumenate, 2006.
(71) ‘‘Econophysics and Individual Choice.’’ Physica A: Statistical Mechanics and its

Applications. Vol. 354. pg. 479, Elsevier, 2005.

(70) ‘‘Multiattribute Preference Analysis with Performance Targets.’’ Operations Re-

search. (Vol.5, 6) Nov-Dec, 2004.

(69)  ‘‘Reformulating  Decision  Theory  using  Fuzzy  Set  Theory  and  Shafer’s  Theory

of Evidence.’’ Fuzzy Sets and Systems. 139, 2 (October, 2003), 243–266.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

63

(68) ‘‘Determining the Appropriate Depth and Breadth of a Product Portfolio.’’ Jour-

nal of Marketing Research, Spring, 2003.

(67)  ‘‘Decision  Rings:  Making  Decision  Trees  Visual  &  non-Mathematical’’  IN-
FORMS Transactions on Education, 2002, Vol. 2, No. 3, http://ite.informs.org/
Vol2No3/Bordley/

(66)  ‘‘Representing  Trees  using  Microsoft  Doughnut  Charts.’’  American  Statistician,

56, 2, 1, 2002.

(65)  ‘‘Relating  Value-Focused  Thinking  and  Interactive  Planning.’’  Journal  of  the

Operational Research Society, December, 2001.

(64) ‘‘Foundations of Target-Based Decision Analysis.’’ 2002, in Encyclopedia of Life

Support Systems, EOLSS Publishers, Oxford, UK. www.eolss.net.

(63)  ‘‘Teaching  Decision  Theory  in  Applied  Statistics  Course.’’  Journal  of  Statistical

Education, Vol. 9, #2, 2001.

(62)  ‘‘Integrating  Gap  Analysis  and  Utility  Theory  in  Service  Research,’’  Journal  of

Service Research, March, 2001.

(61) ‘‘Naturalistic Decisionmaking and Prescriptive Decision Theory,’’ Journal of Be-

havioral Decision-making, 2001.

(60)  (with  L.  Calzi)  ‘‘Decision  Analysis  using  Targets  instead  of  Utility  Functions.’’

Decisions in Economics and Finance. 23, 53–74, 2000.

(59)  (with  J.  Kadane).  ‘‘Experiment-Dependent  Priors  in  Psychology  and  Physics.’’

Theory & Decision. December, 1999.

(58) (with Dennis Blumenfeld and Mark Beltramo.) ‘‘Consolidating Distribution Cen-
ters  can  Reduce  Lost  Sales.’’  International  Journal  of  Production  Economics,
1998.

(57) ‘‘R&D Project Generation versus R&D Project Selection.’’ IEEE Transactions in

Engineering Mgt. December, 1998.

(56)  ‘‘Keeping  it  Sophisticatedly  Simple  in  R&D  Management.’’  Engineering  Econo-

mist, 1998.

(55)  ‘‘Stochastic  Mechanics  &  Classical  Mechanics  with  Finite  Differences.’’  Journal

of the Physical Society of Japan 66, 10, 1997.

(54)  ‘‘Teaching  Precalculus  Classical  Mechanics  instead  of  a  Calculus-Based  Clas-

sical Mechanics.’’ European Journal of Physics. #5, 9, 1997, pg. 327–333.

(53)  ‘‘Quantum  Mechanical  and  Human  Violations  of  Compound  Probability  Prin-
ciples: Toward a Generalized Heisenberg Uncertainty Principle.’’ Operations Re-
search. November, 1998.

(52)  ‘‘Filling  in  Incomplete  Survey  Responses.’’  Communications  in  Statistics:  Sim-

ulation & Computation, 26, 4, 1997.

(51)  ‘‘Experiment-Dependent  Probabilities  in  Quantum  Mechanics  &  Psychology,’’

Physics Essays. 10, #3, 1997.

(50)  ‘‘Discrete-time  General  Relativity  &  Hyperspace,’’  in  Il  Nuovo  Cimento,  1997.
(49)  (with  Ron  Harstad.)  ‘‘Lottery  Qualification  Auctions,’’  in  Bayes,  M.  (ed.)  Ad-

vances in Applied Micro-economics: Auctions, Volume 6, JAI Press, 1996.

(48) (with Jim McDonald, Anand Mantrala).‘‘Something New, Something Old: Para-
metric  Models  for  the  Size  of  Distribution  of  Income.  3Journal  of  Income  Dis-
tribution, 6, 1, 1996.

(47)  ‘‘Relating  Probability  Amplitude  Mechanics  to  Standard  Statistical  Models.’’

Physics Letters A. 204, 26–32 (1995).

(46)  ‘‘Modeling  Unforseen  Events  with  Similarity  Templates  Changes  Bayesian
Probabilities  into  Pignistic  Probabilities.’’  International  Journal  of  Approximate
Reasoning (1995).

(45)  ‘‘Possible  Convexity  of  the  Indirect  Utility  Due  to  Nonlinear  Budget  Con-

straints.’’ Economic Letters, (1994).

(44) ‘‘ Making Social Tradeoffs Among Lives, Disabilities and Costs.’’ Journal of Risk

and Uncertainty, 9, 2 (1994), 135–150.

(43)  ‘‘An  Overlapping  Choice  Set  Model  of  Automotive  Elasticities.’’  Transportation

Research, 28B, 6 (1994), 401–408.

(42) ‘‘Estimating Automotive Elasticities from Segment Elasticities and First Choice/
Second Choice Data.’’ Review of Economics and Statistics. 3, August, 1993, 455–
462.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

64

(41)  (with  Jim  McDonald).  ‘‘Estimating  Aggregate  Automotive  Income-Elasticities
from  the  Population  Income-Share  Elasticity.’’  Journal  of  Business  and  Eco-
nomic Statistics, 2 (1993).

(40)  ‘‘An  Intransitive  Expectations-Dependent  Variant  of  Prospect  Theory.’’  Journal

of Risk and Uncertainty, 5 (1992).

(39) (with G. Hazen) ‘‘Nonlinear Utility Models Implied by Small World Intercorrela-

tions.’’ Management Science, (1992).

(38)  (with  G.  Hazen).  ‘‘Intertemporal  Risk-Aversion  and  Calibration  Uncertainty
May  Explain  Violations  of  the  Independence  Axiom.’’  in  J.  Geweke.  Decision-
Making  under  Risk  and  Uncertainty:  New  Models  and  Empirical  Findings.
Kluwer Academic Publishers, London, 1992.

(37) ‘‘The Dogit Model is Applicable even without Perfectly Captive Buyers.’’ Trans-

portation Research, (1990).

(36)  (with  G.  Hazen)‘‘SSB  &  Weighted  Linear  Utility  as  Expected  Utility  with  Sus-

picion.’’ Management Science, 4, 1990.

(35)  ‘‘Discounted  Longevity  as  a  Risk-Reduction  Measure.’’  Operations  Research  38,

5, (1990), 815–819.

(34)  ‘‘Relaxing  the  Loyalty  Assumption  in  the  Colombo/Morrison  Model.’’  Marketing

Science, (1989).

(33)  ‘‘An  Intertemporal  Utility  Function  Concave  in  Gains  and  Convex  in  Losses.’’

In Annals of Operations Research (ed. By I. LaValle & P. Fishburn, 1989).

(32) ‘‘Fuzzy Set Theory, Observer Bias and Probability Theory.’’ Fuzzy Sets and Sys-

tems. (1989).

(31)  ‘‘Reflection  as  an  Explanation  of  Bell’s  Inequality  Violations.’’  Physics  Letters

(1989).

(30)  ‘‘Generating  Market  Elasticity  Estimates  Using  Cross-Sectional  First  and  Sec-

ond Choice Data.’’ Journal of Business and Economic Statistics (1988).

(29)  ‘‘An  Additive  Group  Utility  for  a  Funds  Manager.’’  Management  Science,  34,  7,

(1988), 835–842.

(28)  ‘‘The  Energy  Function  in  Optimal  Control  Theory.’’  Journal  of  Optimization

Theory and Applications, 57, 3, 1988.

(27) ‘‘The Cost of Delayed Lottery-Resolution.’’ Operations Research, 36, 1 (1988).
(26)  ‘‘The  Sum  of  Two  Bell-Shaped  Curves  Can  Be  Sinusoidal.’’  Physics  Letters

(1987).

(25)  ‘‘An  Intuitive  Form  of  Non-localism  for  Quantum  Mechanics.’’  Physics  Letters

(1987).

(24)  ‘‘Satiation  and  Habit  Persistence  (or  the  Dieter’s  Dilemma).’’  Journal  of  Eco-

nomic Theory (1986).

(23)  ‘‘Linear  Combination  of  Forecasts  with  an  Intercept:  A  Bayesian  Approach.’’

Journal of Forecasting (1986).

(22)  ‘‘One  Person/One  Vote  is  not  Optimal  given  Information  on  Factions.’’  Theory

and Decision (1986).

(21)  ‘‘Higher  Derivatives  of  Velocity  and  Quantum  Mechanics.’’  Physics  Letters

(1986).

(20)  ‘‘Comparing  Different  Decision  Rules:  A  Simulation.’’  Behavioral  Science  10

(1985).

(19)  ‘‘Using  Factions  to  Estimate  Preference  Intensity:  An  Argument  Against  One

Person/One Vote.’’ Public Choice 3 (1985).

(18)  ‘‘A  Precise  Method  for  Evaluating  Election  Schemes.’’  Public  Choice  2  (1985).
(17)  ‘‘Relating  Elasticities  to  Changes  in  Demand.’’  Journal  of  Business  and  Eco-

nomic Statistics (Summer, 1985).

(16)  ‘‘A  Model  of  Risky  Shift.’’  Organizational  Behavior  and  Human  Performance

(December, 1983).

(15)  ‘‘Deriving  the  Schroedinger  Equation  and  Hamilton’s  Principle  from  General-
ized  Consistency  Conditions.’’  International  Journal  of  Theoretical  Physics  9
(1983).

(14)  ‘‘A  Pragmatic  Approach  to  Evaluating  Election  Schemes  through  Simulation.’’

American Political Science Review 3, (March, 1983), 123–141.

(13)  ‘‘A  Central  Principle  of  Science:Optimization.’’  Behavioral  Science  (January,

1983).

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

65

(12) ‘‘A Standard (Non-Quantum) Probability Model of Quantum Behavior.’’ Journal

of Mathematical Physics 9 (1983).

(11)  ‘‘The  Combination  of  Forecasts:  A  Bayesian  Approach.’’  Journal  of  the  Oper-

ational Research Society (Feb., 1982).

(10) ‘‘A Multiplicative Formula for Aggregating Probability Estimates.’’ Management

Science 10 (1982).

(9) ‘‘Deducing Warr’s Power Function.’’ Social Forces (September, 1982).
(8) (with Ron Wolff). ‘‘The Aggregation of Individual Probability Estimates. Manage-

ment Science (August, 1982).

INVITED PUBLICATIONS
(7)  ‘‘The  Psychology  of  Individual  Choice.’’  Proceedings  of  the  American  Statistical

Association. American Statistical Association, Alexandria, Virginia (1993).

(6)  ‘‘Murphy’s  Law  and  Non-Informative  Priors.’’  in  C.R.  Smith  (ed.)  Maximum  En-

tropy & Bayesian Methods. Seattle, Washington, 1991.

(5) ‘‘Bayesian Group Decision Theory.’’ in B. Grofman & G. Owen. Information Pool-
ing and Group Decision-making. Decision Research Series. Jai Publishers, Lon-
don (1986).

(4) Book Review of ‘Rationality & Consensus in Science and Society.’’ Nous (Decem-

ber, 1986).

(3)  Book  Review  of  Shapira.  ‘‘Risk-Taking:  A  Managerial  Perspective.  Interfaces

July, 1996.

(2) Book Review of Bell & Schleiffer. ‘‘Risk-Management’’ Interfaces Sept. 1996
(1)  ‘‘Quantifying  Societal  Concerns  in  R&D  Project  Selection’’  in  M.  Shahinpoor  &
J. Weinrhach. Environmentally Conscious Design & Manufacturing. ECM Press,
New Mexico, 1996.

PROFESSIONAL ACTIVITIES
AMERICAN STATISTICAL ASSOCIATION
Program Chair, Section on Marketing in Statistics, American Statistical Association,

2002–2004

General  Chair,  Section  on  Risk  Analysis  American  Statistical  Association,  1997–99
Program Chair, Risk Analysis Section, American Statistical Association, 1996–97
Program Chair, Risk Analysis Section, American Statistical Association, 1995–96
Member,  Council  of  Representatives(for  Risk  Analysis),  American  Stat.  Association,

1994

Member,  Council  of  Sciences,  International  Society  for  Bayesian  Analysis,  1994–

1995

Session Chair, 1987, International Society of Forecasting
Session Chair, 1989, Southern Economic Association Meeting
Program  Committee,  International  Symposium  on  Automotive  Technology  &  Auto-

mation

Advisor on NSF Contract

INFORMS Society
Councilmember, Decision Analysis Society, 2002–2005
Chair, INFORMS Award Committee for the Teaching of Practice
Councilmember,  Institute  for  Operations  Research  &  Management  Science  (IN-

FORMS), 1995.

Councilmember, Operations Research Society of America (ORSA), 1994
Member, Management Sciences Roundtable (Member, Membership Subcommittee)
Chair,  Marketing  Strategy  Committee,  Institute  of  Management  Sciences  (TIMS),

1993–94

Co-Chair,  Fall  1994  TIMS/ORSA  Program  Committee(Responsible  for  invited  pa-

pers)

Member, Meetings Committee, INFORMS, 1995
Councilmember, ORSA/TIMS Decision Analysis Section (1987–1990).
Chair, ORSA/TIMS Marketing Strategy Committee (1993–1994)
Decision Analysis Cluster Chair, 1987, 1994 TIMS/ORSA Meetings

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

66

Session Chair: 1985, 1986, 1988, 1992 TIMS/ORSA Meetings
Vice-President, Southeast Michigan Chapter of ORSA/TIMS, 1992–1995
Secretary, Southeast Michigan Chapter of ORSA/TIMS, 1987
Co-Founder, Southeast Michigan Chapter
American Marketing Association
Review Board, Journal of Marketing
Ad  Hoc  Reviewer,  Management  Science,  Jr.  of  Academy  of  Mgt.,  Production  &

Operat. Mgt. Soc., etc.

PRODUCTION & OPERATIONS MGT SOCIETY
Vice-President  for  Publications,  Production  &  Operations  Mgt.  Society  (1999–2000)
Vice-President for Finance, Production & Operations Mgt. Society (1995–1996)
Member, Board of Governors, Production & Operations Mgt. Society (1992–1994)
Area Editor, Production & Operations Mgt. Journal (1993–1995)
Member, Josephy Orlicky Operations Mgt. Award Committee (1993)

GOVT. COMMITTEES
National Advisory Council on Environmental Policy—Envir. Protection Agency
Member, Pollution Measurement Subcommittee
Chairperson, Materials Accounting Data Working Party
Member, Toxic Data Reporting Subcommittee

ALUMNI ASSOCIATIONS
James Madison College, Michigan State University
Alumni  Association  President,  1985–88,  Boardmember,  1981–83,  Vice-President,

1984–85

Vice-Chair, James Madison College Board of Visitors, 1995–1997
Chair, Program Committee, James Madison College Board of Visitors, 1997–1998
Delivered many papers at
TIMS/ORSA, International Federation of Operations Research, International Society
of  Forecasting,  Public  Choice,  Bayesian  Research  Conference,  American  Phys-
ical  Society,  Economic  Sciences  &  Public  Choice  Conference,  Foundations  of
Utility & Risk Conference, Judgement/Decision-making Conference, NBER–NSF
Seminar on Bayesian Inference in Econometrics & Statistics, University of Chi-
cago,  Northwestern  University,  University  of  Michigan,  University  of  Arizona,
University of California at Irvine.

Ad Hoc Reviewer for
Physics Letters, IEEE Transactions, JASA, Mgt. Science, International Economic Re-
view,  American  Political  Science  Review,  Journal  of  Risk  and  Uncertainty,  Na-
tional  Science  Foundation  grant  applications,  Kentucky  Planning  Office  grant
applications.

Society Memberships:
Institute for Operations Research & Mgt. Science
Society for Risk Assessment
International Society for Bayesian Analysis
American Physical Society
International Platform Association
Royal Economic Society
American Economic Association
Public Choice Society
American Statistical Association
Phi Beta Kappa
Judgment/Decision-Making Society
Phi Kappa Phi

FELLOWSHIPS/HONORS
National Merit Scholarship

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

67

National Science Foundation 3-Year Fellowship
Alumni Distinguished Scholarship, Michigan State University
Lilly Fellowship
Award of Excellence, General Motors R&D, for R&D Project Selection Process
1998  President’s  Council  Award,  General  Motors  Corporation,  for  work  on  Portfolio

Concepts Process

2002 UAW–GM People Make Quality Happen Award
2003:  GMNA  Award  for  Creative  &  Incredible  Performance  in  Engineering  Design
2004 GM Chairman’s Honors
2006 Decision Analysis Publication Award

DISCUSSION

Chairman  BAIRD.  Thank  you  very  much.  Thanks  to  all  our  wit-
nesses.  I  want  to  welcome  Dr.  Roscoe  Bartlett  to  our  panel  here.
Thank  you  very  much,  Dr.  Bartlett.  We  have  also  been  joined  by
Dan Lipinski. Thanks, Dan, for being here. I am sorry, Dr. Dan Li-
pinski.  One  of  the  nice  things  about  this  committee  is  we  actually
have  people  who  know  something  about  science  on  it  which  is  a
nice  thing.  Jerry  McNerney  is  telling  me  he  has  to  leave  fairly
shortly,  so  I  am  going  to  yield  my  first  five  minutes  to  Dr.
McNerney. First question.

Mr.  MCNERNEY.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  have  to  say,  I
found  your  testimony  very  interesting  and  stimulating;  and  from
what  it  sounds  like,  we  need  to  develop  a  herd  mentality  toward
conservation  and  develop  strongly  held  beliefs.  Of  course  this  is
something  that  we  want  to  move  toward  in  bringing  conservation
and  good  behavior  about.  Modeling  is  an  important  part  of  that.
Could  you  tell  me,  Dr.  Bordley,  and  maybe  any  of  the  other  wit-
nesses, what state are we at in terms of modeling behavior of soci-
ety  as  a  whole  in  terms  of  directing  behavior  towards  something
like more conservation behavior or attitudes? Is that something we
can get our hands around? Is that something we need to have more
funding in to get more students involved in it or where are we with
that?

Dr. BORDLEY. Right now, obviously we have got a lot of modeling.
For example, Nick’s multi-logent models to try to better understand
customer  behavior  and  make  kinds  of  decisions.  We  are  clearly—
obviously we are clearly not exactly on the mark in predicting peo-
ple’s  behavior  as  well  as  we  would  like.  You  have  big  fluctuations,
like  oil  price  changes  can  come  up  and  dramatically  change  the
market. I mean, you get hit with curve balls.

So  we  have  an  awful  lot  of  work  going  on  in  the  modeling.  We
are  drawing  on  all  the  social  sciences,  and  quite  honestly,  we  are
nowhere near where we would like to be in terms of accurate mod-
els. We are a lot better than where we were five or seven years ago,
but  it  is  definitely  an  area  of  current  research;  and  we  pay  very
close  attention  to  the  evolving  social  sciences  to  develop  better
models.

Inputs  to  models  are  always  a  big  issue  and  uncertainty  about
inputs, too. You know, you don’t understand all the things that are
driving  customer  behavior,  what  kinds  of  search  advisors  they  are
looking  at.  So  there  is  a  lot  of  things  that  make  modeling  hard  as
well  as  the  proper  assumptions  to  make  about  customer  behavior,

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

68

which is why those realization that customers don’t follow economic
rationalities to—you know, big deal for us.

Mr. MCNERNEY. One other question to give more time. The mod-
eling  is  an  important  tool,  but  our  influence  in  the  fed  is  also  an
important  tool.  How  can  we  make  policy  that  would  influence  the
automakers and the other manufacturers to make the right choices
because  they  have  a  lot  of  leeway  in  terms  of  how  they  direct  cus-
tomers? I mean, you see advertisements where they are promoting
SUV’s, big vehicle purchases. How can we and the fed influence the
manufacturers to make the choices to direct their customers toward
conservation?

Dr. BORDLEY. Well, I guess one of the things unfortunately is we
found  that  as  I  mentioned  the  internet,  Consumers  Report,  what-
ever. Increasingly people are looking to information sources outside
of  General  Motors  or  the  car  makers  in  evaluating  basically  what
kinds  of  vehicles  they  are  going  to  buy.  You  know,  Consumers  Re-
port  is  strongly  influential,  basically.  You  have  Kelly  Blue  Book,
lots of sources out there. So advertising is still a factor but it is no-
where  near  as  important  as  it  used  to  be,  and  we  are  finding  to
some  extent  that,  you  know,  we  are  in  a  very  competitive  market.
Things have just changed so much, and so, you know——

Dr. CIALDINI. Dr. McNerney, I might have an answer as well for
that  question  and  that  is  in  the  messaging  literature,  in  fact,  we
just  heard  about  Dr.  Kahneman  who  won  the  Nobel  Prize  a  few
years ago. His theory, a prospect theory, suggests that if we inform
an  audience  what  they  stand  to  lose  if  they  fail  to  move  in  the  di-
rection  that  we  are  suggesting,  that  will  be  more  mobilizing  than
telling them what they stand to gain if they do move in that direc-
tion.

So  our  message  to  the  large  automobile  manufacturers  can  be
structured and framed in terms of what stands to be lost, what will
be  missed  if  they  fail  to  take  the  action,  rather  than  what  kinds
of gains they will attain if they do.

Mr.  LAITNER.  Dr.  McNerney,  if  I  might,  I  am  a  modeler.  I  spent
10 years with the USEPA doing modeling, and I left the agency be-
cause  I  think  they  are  pursuing  a  very  bad  practice  of  economic
modeling. Their models tend to assume, for example, what they call
the  full  employment  assumption.  You  may  think  it  is  jobs,  but  to
an  economist  that  means  that  all  resources,  whether  capital,
whether  labor,  or  energy,  are  fully  utilized  and  already  efficiently
allocated.  So  along  comes  Congress  and  wants  to  do  something
about climate or energy policy or international security, their mod-
els  by  definition  imply  a  net  cost  to  the  economy  because  we  are
already  optimal,  anything  we  do  must  impose  a  cost.  But  in  fact,
I  think  we  would  recognize  that  there  are  so  many  inefficiencies
throughout the economy that if their models had a better ability to
capture  the  technologies  already  available  to  us  and  the  behaviors
that  could  see  a  different  way  of  doing  things,  a  different  way  of
innovating,  a  different  way  of  adopting  technologies,  you  might
have a more satisfying outcome; and one of the things I think this
subcommittee  could  do  is  send  a  signal  to  the  economic  modeling
community and say, hey, there are better technologies your models
are not capturing. There are better behaviors that you could be im-
plementing and better policies than the price signal alone you could

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

69

be  incorporating  in  your  modeling  efforts,  and  you  would  see  a
much  more  satisfying  end  result.  As  an  example,  finally,  modelers
tend  to  use  what  we  call  a  constant  elasticity  of  substitution.  You
can  imagine  invariant  over  time  the  same  elasticity  regardless  of
changes  in  perception,  availability  of  technology,  changes  of  in-
comes.  That  is  not  a  very  satisfying  way  to  provide  you  with  the
kind  of  policy  insights  you  may  require  to  know  what  better  poli-
cies make sense for this economy.

Chairman BAIRD. We see that also in health care policy, dramati-

cally illustrated there. Dr. Ehlers.

Mr.  EHLERS.  Thank  you.  It  is  fascinating  to  listen  to  this  and
imagine  what  we  could  be  doing.  Of  course,  some  folks  would  con-
sider this mind control. I would prefer to consider it as unleashing
the  mind,  getting  it  away  from  built-in  prejudices.  But  what  I  am
curious, and this is for all of you, what role do you see the Federal
Government  playing  in  changing  consumer  behavior,  particularly
as it applies to energy usage and dealing with the energy situation
we have today? Any suggestions, recommendations, et cetera?

Dr.  BORDLEY.  I  guess  I  had  a  thought  that  I  raised  with  the
Chairman  beforehand  which  is  you  like  to  look  for  win-win  situa-
tions,  you  know,  where  the  customer  wins  and  the  environment
wins. One of the things that people don’t like is being stuck in traf-
fic jams, and they don’t like stopping and starting at various traffic
lights. And there is a continuing effort, you know, in traffic science,
you  know,  this  whole  business  about  trying  to  help  coordinate
when people leave on trips so they avoid congestion and get to their
routes  more  efficiently  and  more  effectively.  It  is  a  win-win  situa-
tion. The advent of the internet, which as I mentioned is a real big,
major deal in the car industry, allows for a lot more improved com-
munication and coordination between individuals that allows them
to,  for  example,  avoid  traffic  jams,  you  know,  and  spend  less  time
at  stopping  lights  and  so  on  and  so  forth.  The  advent  of  tech-
nologies like OnStar that allow you to communicate with the vehi-
cle  likewise  improves  that.  So  there  is  an  example  I  think  of  one
thing  that  can  happen  to  encourage  that  kind  of  coordination  so
people,  you  know,  waste  less  time  in  traffic  jams  or  at  stop  lights
and  at  the  same  time  waste  less  fuel,  you  know,  win-win  for  all
concerned using the coordination powers of the Internet.

Mr.  EHLERS.  But  if  you  succeed  at  that  then  my  method  won’t
work.  My  method  is  to  try  to  do  what  most  people  don’t  do.  That
is  why  I  come  to  work  before  most  people  and  go  home  after  most
people  do.  That  is  not  a  very  popular  alternative,  but  it  certainly
gets me both ways much faster.

Dr. BORDLEY. That is where the social sciences really come in be-
cause  obviously  if  we  all  do  the  same  thing,  we  are  all  going  to  be
in  the  same  traffic  jam.  So  the  question  is,  it  is  almost  like  auc-
tioning,  which  is  one  of  the  areas  of  social  science,  you  are  almost
auctioning  off  the  space,  like  we  can  make  an  agreement  like,  for
example, the Chairman leaves 10 minutes early for work, you leave
on time for work, I leave 10 minutes later, we all avoid traffic jams.
So  some  kind  of  coordination.  People  loosely  try  to  do  that,  you
know,  we  all  leave  early  or  whatever  as  far  as  that  goes.  But  we
can  coordinate  a  lot  more  precisely  with  the  internet,  and  it  will
take  some  social  science  work  on  auction  theory  about  how  to  do

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

70

that;  but  that  is  one  possibility,  that  technologically  we  have  the
technology  to  do  it  but  it  is  going  to  take  the  social  science  issues
to figure out how to coordinate among us so we can collectively re-
duce the amount of time we are wasting and the amount of energy
as well. Does that make sense?

Mr.  EHLERS.  Yeah.  Any  other  comments  about  the  role  of  the
Federal  Government  in  changing  consumer  behavior  and  energy
issues? Dr. Wegener.

Dr.  WEGENER.  Thank  you.  Certainly  when  the  Federal  Govern-
ment invests in research, there are a number of ways in which that
research  can  make  a  difference  in  what  you  are  describing.  Cer-
tainly  investing  in  basic  research  can  provide  tools  to  individuals
like  Dr.  Laitner  described  where  they  have  a  product  but  haven’t
brought  it  to  market,  haven’t  found  ways  to  make  it  work.  And
basic research that may be across many different content domains,
health,  energy,  other  types  of  topics,  can  provide  tools  for  those
companies,  for  those  marketers  and  such  to  take  a  good  product
and make it work in the marketplace. Certainly the model that we
use in the Energy Center where I work as well is that in the tech-
nology development itself, it is a different kind of perhaps research
investment  and  maybe  for  interdisciplinary  teams  and  such  rather
than the basic work, but that can help those technology developers
to  identify  and  address  on  line  and  up  front  what  those  public  ob-
stacles  may  be,  and  that  will  pay  dividends  down  the  road  in  the
same  places.  But  deal  with  it  before  there  is  a  product  and  mar-
keting after the product has been developed, but deal with it before
the obstacles are encountered.

Mr. EHLERS. Dr. Ellig.
Dr. ELLIG. Two quick suggestions. One thing the Federal Govern-
ment  could  do  it  take  a  careful  look  at  institutional  barriers  that
might  be  thrown  up  by  other  levels  of  government  in  some  cases.
For  example,  if  I  go  home  and  look  at  my  electric  bill,  the  price
that  I  pay  for  electricity  tells  me  it  doesn’t  matter  when  I  use  it,
whether  I  use  the  washing  machine  or  the  dishwasher  at  5:00  on
a  July  afternoon  or  2:00  in  the  middle  of  the  night  in  December,
it  doesn’t  matter.  And  there  is  some  significant  rigidity  introduced
by  the  way  electricity  has  been  priced  in  the  U.S.  which  pretty
much  in  many  cases  discourages  people  from  shifting  their  use  to
off-peak times and doing things that would be energy efficient; and
there are some experiments out there, both laboratory experiments,
and  experiments  in  the  real  world  with  real  consumers  that  show
that  when  people  have  the  opportunity  to  pay  a  price  that  varies
based  on  market  conditions,  they  actually  do  alter  their  behavior
and move their use to off-peak times.

The  other  thing  just  thinking  about  the  traffic  issue  and  having
spent some time in the Federal Government in a management posi-
tion, to the extent that federal agencies can better define what they
are accomplishing in terms of outcome for the public and then link
the  performance,  evaluation,  and  compensation  of  employees  to
that, it is easier to let people work without much supervision which
means it is easier to keep people productive when they are telecom-
muting.  I  happen  to  work  for  an  institution  where  we  are  com-
pletely  evaluated  based  on  what  do  you  accomplish,  not  when  are
you  in  the  office,  how  much  face  time  do  you  have  with  relevant

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

71

people.  Having  been  in  the  Federal  Government,  I  know  that  the
idea  that  you  would  evaluate  people  based  on  what  they  accom-
plished  rather  than  face  time,  time  in  the  office,  number  of  hours,
is  foreign  to  a  lot  of  folks  even,  and  it  is  because  of  a  tremendous
focus  on  trying  to  measure  outputs  and  inputs,  rather  than  actual
results.

Mr. EHLERS. And in many cases it is hard to measure either one.

Thank you.

Chairman BAIRD. Dr. Ehlers, thanks very much. We face a some-
what similar challenge here in Congress, the issues we are talking
about,  vis-a´-vis  trying  to  involve  social  sciences  more  and  the  pol-
icy-making and actually gain respect for them. In the halls of Con-
gress when it comes to NSF funding, we have had some interesting
battles  about  whether  social  science  somehow  would  be  a  second-
class citizen in NSF funding.

I  am  interested,  Dr.  Wegener—and  you  are  in  an  institution
where  they  specifically  apparently  incorporated  that.  So  my  ques-
tion  would  be  how  would  the  physicist,  the  engineers,  the  others
interact with you? Have they come to see the value or do they say,
oh  God,  now  we  have  got  to  go  talk  to  those  social  scientists  and
pretend  we  care.  So  I  am  interested  in  that,  and  then  I  would  be
interested  in  any  of  your  comments  for  how  your  disciplines  and
the  insights  for  your  disciplines  can  help  your  associations  and
those  of  us  who  care  about  social  science  can  convey  to  our  col-
leagues  the  importance  of  this  endeavor  we  are  talking  about.  So
first, Dr. Wegener, and then open it up.

Dr.  WEGENER.  Yes,  so  I  deal  with  those  issues  every  day  now  it
seems  in  terms  of—and  with  mixed  results  I  would  have  to  say,
that  for  some  of  our  scientists  in  other  parts  of  the  technology  de-
velopment wings of our Energy Center, they absolutely understand
the need for issues like attitude change and consumer behavior, al-
though  you  might  be  able  to  predict  that  some  of  these  areas  for
example in the area of biofuels where some of the technologies that
are  being  developed  would  include  genetically  modifying  cellulosic
feed stocks for biofuels, for example, have already noted resistance
from  environmental  groups  and  others  about  that  kind  of  tech-
nology.  And  so  they  understand  that  there  is  a  human,  social  as-
pect  to  the  technology  development  itself.  And  so  they  have  been
eager  to  talk  with  us  about  those  issues.  You  might  also  imagine
the  folks  that  study  nuclear  power  for  example  who  know  that
there  are  social  pressures  and  opposition  in  some  cases  to  that
technology are certainly interested to talk with us.

In some other areas, we are just not really on the map for those
scientists yet, although I have not I would say met a lot of real re-
sistance  to  talking  about  those  issues;  but  I  think  our  successes
have been varied and in some predictable ways for technologies for
which they already notice that there is that social issues.

Dr.  CIALDINI.  I  have  had  success  with  my  colleagues  in  the  nat-
ural  and  physical  sciences  by  validating  the  worth  of  their  efforts
and  suggesting  that  what  we  can  do  is  assure  that  those  efforts
will  be  implemented  and  adopted  as  a  consequence  of  the  hard
work that they have done.

Mr. LAITNER. If I might respond, Mr. Chairman, as an economist
and  a  modeler,  I  think  the  best  way  to  begin  is  that  Kenneth

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

72

Boldling,  an  American  economist,  once  commented  that  images  of
the  future  are  critical  to  choice-oriented  behavior.  If  the  modeling
doesn’t allow different images to unfold in the way we might deploy
technology,  the  way  we  might  involve  other  kinds  of  policy  than  a
mere very high price signal, that we may not see any kind of reac-
tion because we are hesitant. We think we are going to end up with
nothing  but  a  penalty.  If  your  model  assumes  that  a  $100  invest-
ment  in  a  new  refrigerator  is  a  pure  cost  as  opposed  to  an  invest-
ment  with  a  return  on  it,  you  get  a  whole  different  set  of  results.
So  we  are  trying  to  work  with  sociologists  and  others  to  under-
stand that we can shift perception on the innovation side and that
we  can  shift  perception  on  the  consumer  side  in  order  to  facilitate
an adoption of technology. So rather than this idea of the constant
elasticity, behavior that never changes regardless of the size of the
price,  the  severity  of  the  problem,  always  the  same  behavior,  we
are  trying  to  dissolve  that  and  show  that  there  are  ways  of  incor-
porating different behaviors that do result in a positive and a ben-
efit to the economy.

Chairman BAIRD. If I would apply that argument along with the
kind  of  comments  from  your  colleagues  to  the  right,  that  might  be
the  kind  of  argument  we  could  try  to  help  our  colleagues  here  un-
derstand,  that  the  efficacy  of  the  investment  in  the  physical,  engi-
neering, and mathematical sciences will be enhanced not detracted
from  by  an  investment  in  the  corresponding  social  sciences.  And  I
think  that  is  incumbent  upon  the  social  sciences  themselves  to
demonstrate that in some fashion.

Dr.  BORDLEY.  If  I  could  also  speak.  I  basically—I  have  sort  of
worked  from  both  ends.  I  have  done  most  of  my  work  in  modeling
but I have also worked on the other end, you know, where you are
actually  trying  to  put  stuff  together  and  everything  else  like  that.
Vehicle development or—when you take a new technology, basically
trying to build a vehicle or complex system, there is a very complex
coordination  system  among  lots  of  different  individuals  at  various
kinds  of  levels.  You  know,  it  is  a  massively  complex  kind  of  thing.
Individuals  have  different  kinds  of  incentives,  this  whole  project
management kind of thing. You are talking about thousands of peo-
ple  basically,  getting  down  to  the  actual  guys  who  basically,  you
know, screw on nuts or whatever, take things apart and, you know,
I have been in both worlds. And I think that is an area, you know,
technology  transfer,  I  mean,  it  involves  people  ultimately.  We  can
get distracted about these kinds of things and directional things in
saying  here  is  a  great  new  technology.  But  translating  that  into  a
product  that  can  actually  be  built,  you  know,  cost  effectively  and
made  into  the  market  by  real  people.  That  is  a  lot  of  very  social
science, you know, kind of interaction, very complex, and at least—
I  mean,  in  my  mind  basically,  that  is  not  an  area  we  shun  at  all
because that is clearly a big issue. So I think it is a very clear area.

Chairman BAIRD. Dr. Ellig.
Dr.  ELLIG.  Yeah,  I  think  graduate  education  plays  a  big  role  in
how people develop attitudes toward other disciplines, toward other
tools  and  so  forth.  And  so  to  the  extent  that  we  can  get  graduate-
level education for social sciences and natural sciences to help folks
appreciate, you know, the other methods and what the other folks,
the  other  disciplines  have  to  offer.  There  is  probably  a  big  payoff

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

73

there  in  terms  of  creating  a  body  of  people  who  are  then  pre-
disposed to work with scholars and other disciplines and use other
methods  rather  than  saying,  oh,  we  are  the  only  ones  who  really
understand the world.

Chairman BAIRD. I appreciate that perspective. In fact the Amer-
ica Competes Act, the NSF reauthorization bill that Dr. Ehlers and
I  worked  on  does  a  number  of  things  to  try  to  encourage  inter-
disciplinary research. Dr. Bartlett.

Mr.  BARTLETT.  Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  very  much  for  arrang-
ing  this  hearing.  I  think  that  the  social  sciences  in  our  energy  fu-
ture will have the biggest challenges and perhaps the most respon-
sible position.

There  are  three  groups  that  have  common  cause  in  wanting  to
move  from  fossil  fuels  to  alternatives.  You  have  been  mentioning
just  one  of  those  groups,  and  that  is  the  group  that  believes  that
our  use  of  fossil  fuels  is  increasing  CO2 which  is  changing  the  cli-
mate  and  resulting  in  global  warming.  There  are  those  who  will
argue  that  if  you  look  back  through  the  past  you  will  see  that  the
CO2 increases  occurred  after  the  global  warming,  therefore  the  re-
sult of global warming, not the cause of global warming. There will
be others who will argue that the Earth at one time had been very
much  warmer.  There  were,  as  a  matter  of  fact,  subtropical  seas  in
northern Siberia and the north slope of Alaska and so forth or else
there wouldn’t be gas and oil there, right? There will also be others
who  argue  that,  gee,  a  warmer  Earth  wouldn’t  be  all  that  bad.  If
I  am  living  in  Siberia,  you  would  have  a  hard  time  convincing  me
that a warmer Earth would be all that bad.

And  so  you  have  the  problem  of  convincing  everybody  that  this
is  something  that  we  need  to  vent  our  energies  to  because  they
may  argue  that  the  Earth  is  warming  and  we  have  nothing  to  do
with  it;  so  the  Earth  may  be  different  but  it  won’t  be  necessarily
worse. So it is going to be hard to marshal everybody to follow this
drummer.

The  second  group  that  has  common  cause  in  wanting  to  move
from  fossil  fuels  to  alternatives,  the  group  that  believes  that  be-
cause  we  have  only  two  percent  of  the  world’s  oil  and  use  25  per-
cent  of  the  world’s  oil  and  import  almost  two-thirds  of  what  we
used,  that  this  is  a  totally  unacceptable  national  security  risk  and
we  really  got  to  do  something  about  that.  And  what  you  need  to
do,  of  course,  is  move  from  fossil  fuels  to  alternatives  so  that  we
are  less  dependent  on  oil  since  we  have  only  two  percent  of  it  and
use 25 percent of it. We need to change that.

Not  everybody  will  agree  that  this  ought  to  be  a  priority  that
would  result  in  them  changing  their  lifestyle  because  they  will
argue, gee, we think that if we just had better dialogue with those
Arab  nations,  they  will  play  nice  and  the  guy  who  has  the  dollars
buys the oil anyhow and it really won’t matter if we don’t have the
oil  because  it  is  out  there  in  the  world,  and  it  is  a  global  economy
and we will have the oil.

There  is  a  third  group  little  mentioned  but  growing  in  recogni-
tion.  That  is  the  group  that  believes  that  the  energy  is  just  not
going  to  be  there.  In  1956,  M.  King  Hubbard  predicted  the  United
States  would  peak  in  1970.  Right  on  schedule,  we  peaked  in  1970.
By  1980,  we  absolutely  knew  we  were  sliding  down  the  other  side

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

74

of  Hubbard’s  feet,  and  our  response  to  that  was  to  drill  more,  to-
tally,  totally  the  wrong  response.  For  the  last  30  months,  oil  pro-
duction world wide has been—by the way, I noticed that sir, while
you  were  referring  to  EIA,  please  have  a  lot  of  reserve  and  con-
fidence in what EIA is telling you there. They are a bunch of econo-
mists  who  are  predicting  that  if  you  understand  the  past  you  can
predict  the  future.  And  they  are  exactly  right  if  our  resources  are
infinite. They are not infinite. In a thousand years of recorded his-
tory,  we  are  about  150  years  into  the  age  of  oil.  The  best  evidence
is  that  in  another  150  years,  we  will  be  through  the  age  of  oil.  No
more for all practical purposes. No more oil, gas, or coal. What kind
of a world will our great, great grandchildren live in.

So  you  have  a  huge  challenge,  and  marshalling  people  to  do  the
right thing—and I think that properly articulated, it is undeniable
that  oil  is  not  forever,  that  we  will  reach  a  peak  at  some  time.  I
think  the  evidence  is  pretty  much  overwhelming.  Conventionally,
we  have  already  reached  that  peak.  We  are  now  static  because  we
are having some unconventional oil like Albert tar sands and really
heavy sour oil that we are exploiting today.

So absent national leadership, we don’t have much energy in this
country. We have even less responsible national leadership. Absent
national leadership, what can you all do so that we move along the
right path?

Mr.  LAITNER.  Well,  Dr.  Bartlett,  if  I  might  lead  off,  there  is  a
fourth group I might add to that list and that is a group that says
between  now  and  say  the  year  2030,  this  nation  will  absolutely
have to invest literally trillions of dollars in new energy supply, in-
frastructure, highways, buildings, and that if we are going to have
to make that investment anyway, why wouldn’t we want to ask the
question,  what  is  the  smart  mix  of  resources  that  best  get  the  job
done that satisfy multiple concerns, whether you believe in climate,
whether  you  believe  in  peak  oil,  or  whether  you  have  other  con-
cerns?  Why  wouldn’t  we  want  to  put  all  of  our  resources,  energy
efficiency,  nuclear,  hydrogen,  renewables,  unconventional  fossil
fuels,  get  them  all  on  the  table,  do  an  honest  assessment  of  their
cost  and  their  performance,  see  which  blend,  not  picking  winners,
but  generally  what  direction  we  could  move  in  as  an  economy  and
satisfy  those  concerns  by  then  incorporating  both  the  hard  science
and the social sciences to help address that very difficult question.
We  are  either  going  to  lock  in  a  hard  future  because  we  are  not
making  a  smart  decision  about  the  investments  today  or  we  are
going to open up opportunity for some innovation which I said ear-
lier in my opening remarks. We have the means to move ourselves
into  a  solid  economic  prosperity  and  a  sustainable  path  if  we
choose  to  do  it,  but  that  requires  taking  the  field  with  a  full  com-
plement of players and really addressing the issue up front.

Dr.  WEGENER.  I  am  glad  that  Dr.  Bartlett  raised  this  issue  be-
cause  certainly  we  have  folks  within  our  Energy  Center  that  are
also  careful  to  say  that  we  are  talking  about  a  limited  and  pol-
luting  resource,  and  that  limitation  is  important.  I  do  have  an
economist  colleague  at  Purdue  who  says,  well,  we  will  never  actu-
ally  run  out  of  oil,  not  because  it  is  not  limited  but  because  it  will
become so scarce, it will become so expensive to use it people won’t
anymore. The problem is if we wait until that point where the eco-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

75

nomics  alone  push  us  to  do  other  things,  our  economy  will  have
taken so much of a hit already that we will not want to face it. And
so it is important for us to be pro-active and to work ahead of that
eventuality rather than to wait for it.

Dr. ELLIG. I think we probably have to have a big dose of humil-
ity  in  speaking  about  how  we,  whether  it  is  us  experts  or  law-
makers  or  regulators  or  anyone,  is  going  to  shape  things  to  deal
with  things  that  could  happen  in  the  future  and  appreciate  that
there  are  very  real  limits  to  either  what  folks  like  us  can  know  or
to  frankly,  you  know,  what  folks  you  all  can  accomplish  through
law and through regulation and so forth. And so we should just be
careful  to  realize  that  anytime  one  of  us  says  something  must  be
done  or  anytime  one  of  us  says  here  is  what  the  problem  is,  that
is reflecting not just maybe some technical expertise but also a set
of  value  judgments  and  some  assumptions  about  the  future  that
may or may not be right.

Chairman BAIRD. Those bells you hear, those of you as social sci-
entists  remember  Pavlov’s  dog.  We  now  have  15  minutes  to  get  to
the meat. And so that means our final questioner will be Dr. Lipin-
ski,  and  I  very  much  appreciate  that  and  we  will  finish  after  Dr.
Lipinski  and  thank  you  very  much.  If  people  leave  now,  it  is  be-
cause they are going to votes, not they are being rude.

Mr. LIPINSKI. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. We have plenty of time
since  the  15  minutes  is  really  more  than  15  minutes,  but  I  won’t
go on that long.

I  want  to  thank  Chairman  Baird  for  holding  this  hearing  today.
I am a social scientist. I was teaching political science before I was
elected  to  Congress.  I  also  have  a  background.  Before  that  I  was
an  engineer.  I  studied  an  interesting  program  called  engineering
economic  systems  at  Stanford  and  had  Amos  Tversky  as  a  teacher
there  also.  So  all  of  the—of  what  you  said  I  think  is  very  inter-
esting,  very  important  for  our  understanding  as  we  here  try  to—
if  we  work  on  creating  public  policy  to  try  to,  you  know,  get  the
outcomes that we would like to see, there are so many factors that
go  into  what  those  outcomes  are  going  to  be.  There  are  so  many
different directions I could possibly go, but let me start with a more
general question and then I want something more specific. My first
question  is  I  know  Dr.  Ellig  talked  about  graduate-level  education
is  so  important  in  terms  of  really  teaching  graduating  students
that interdisciplinary work is important and it is good. I would like
to know anyone who has any—what their view is right now of how
much  incentive  there  is  right  now  among  scholars  doing  social
science to actually do interdisciplinary work because certainly as a
political scientist I do not see a whole lot where I was at in my ex-
perience.  I  know  it  differs  by  institution,  but  overall,  do  you  see
there being that much incentive out there to do that kind of work?
Is  that  rewarded  in  any  way  in  academe?  It  certainly  seems  like
it  is  rewarded  out  in  industry.  Anyone  who  has  any  comments  on
that.

Mr.  LAITNER.  Dr.  Lipinski,  I  might  open  up  because  we  have
seen  that  unfold  with  our  forthcoming  conference  in  November  in
Sacramento.  Apologies  it  may  not  be  in  your  district.  The  build-
ing—or  the  Behavioral,  Energy  and  Climate  Change  Conference
that is being convened, and I have been stunned and my colleague,

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

76

Dr.  Karen  Earhart-Martinez  with  me  here  today,  has  been  even
more  so  because  she  has  been  fielding  an  incredible  number  of
questions  from  a  multi-disciplinary  field  across  all  parts  of  the
country, people really wanting to see more of this interdisciplinary
approach  and  incorporating  the  social  sciences  into  the  thinking
about  energy  policy.  So  I  might  comment  that  convening  the  con-
ference  on  a  shoestring  budget  brought  forth  a  really  unprece-
dented  number  of  inquiries  and  interest  to  see  not  only  in  terms
of  policy  but  the  question  you  asked,  what  kinds  of  interdiscipli-
nary  actions  can  occur,  and  the  good  news  is  I  am  learning  about
even  more  I  did  not  know  existed.  I  did  not  know  about  Dr.
Wegener’s  efforts  until  this  testimony  here  today,  and  we  are  just
learning  about  Bob  who  is  I  am  glad  to  say  is  going  to  be  one  of
the  speakers  at  that  conference  in  November.  So  the  good  news  is
it  is  almost  as  if  it  is  been  under  a  pressure  cooker,  people  just
churning and wanting to get out and be much more involved in an
interdisciplinary  way  but  not  having  the  means  to  do  so,  both  the
funding  and  the  connections  and  the  infrastructure  to  make  that
possible.  But  that  is  starting  to  happen,  but  I  think  you  are  going
to see a lot more compelling interest in that kind of a direction.

Mr. LIPINSKI. Dr Ellig.
Dr. ELLIG. I think at least in economics, the incentives facing the
more junior, untenured professors are still to, you know, publish in
the  top  journals  by  doing  the  things  that  economists  are  normally
expected to do, rather than doing a lot of interdisciplinary stuff un-
less  the  interdisciplinary  work  involves  some  new  type  of  neato
technical  technique  because  then  it  can  get  into  the  top  journals
where  technique  is  prized  very  highly.  And  so  I  think  where  you
have seen economists doing good interdisciplinary work is when ei-
ther in unusual cases where there is a particular academic depart-
ment  that  explicitly  decides  it  is  going  to  be  different—I  have  to
say  my  colleagues  at  George  Mason  University  comprise  one  such
department—or where there is some sort of an institution on cam-
pus that is explicitly designed to promote this, like the Center, Dr.
Wegener  is  with,  or  you  know,  once  you  get  up  to  the  Nobel  level
and  other  situations  where  more  senior  scholars  aren’t  subject  to
some of the more mundane incentives of their discipline, then they
have  a  lot  more  freedom  to  kind  of,  you  know,  go  out  and  follow
wherever the path may lead.

Mr. LIPINSKI. And I am very happy to hear that we are—the dis-
ciplines  are  moving  in  that  direction  but  what  Dr.  Ellig  said,  cer-
tainly  it  was  my  experience  in  political  science  in  terms  of  what
was, as a junior scholar, valued; and I certainly think that we need
for  the  sake  of  the  social  sciences  and,  you  know,  for  the  sake  of
helping  our  country  and  our  world  move  forward,  interdisciplinary
work  is  certainly  very  necessary.  I  always  look  back,  and  this  is  a
much  more  general  factor  that  influences  people  is  the  way  that
they  are  brought  up,  and  I  always  say  I  am  a  child  of  the  ’70s,
grew  up  in  the  ’70s,  and  saving  energy  and  the  environment  were
very  important  and  showed  up  so  much  in  popular  culture;  and  as
a  kid  I  grew  up  with  those  things.  They  still  are  with  me  today,
and  I  see  that  as  one  factor  influencing  my  behavior;  but  I  wish
we had more time but I think that is going to be it. But I am very
interested  in  all  of  your  research  in  what  we  need  to  do,  what  the

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

77

factors  are  that  influence  people’s  work.  It  is  up  to  the  Chairman
if——

Chairman BAIRD. Very, very, very briefly.
Dr.  WEGENER.  I  would  like  to  say  very  briefly  I  think  that  in  a
lot  of  places  that  there  are  not  the  incentives  that  there  could  be
to encourage this kind of interdisciplinary work. People are largely
doing  it  out  of  their  own  desires  rather  than  incentives  to  bring
them  there.  But  also  I  think  it  is  really  important  for  us  to  strike
a  difficult  balance  between  that  interdisciplinary  work  but  strong
training  in  disciplines  that  people  can  take  to  those  interactions,
and that is always a difficult balance to find.

Chairman  BAIRD.  I  want  to  thank  our  panelists.  As  a  way  to
close  this,  Dr.  Laitner,  I  am  going  to  give  you  one  opportunity  for
the  shameless  plug  for  the  conference  because  I  think  it  is  abso-
lutely the perfect sequel to this hearing. Can you tell us about the
conference very briefly and location, time, and date.

Mr.  LAITNER.  Thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Chairman.  Yes,  it  is  a
conference entitled Behavioral, Economic and Climate Change Con-
ference  designed  exactly  to  bring  together  the  panoply  of  dis-
ciplines,  whether  anthropology,  sociology,  psychology,  economics,  a
way to see what might be done to provide amore satisfying and un-
derstanding and movement toward a prosperous energy policy, one
that  addresses  a  number  of  these  concerns  in  Sacramento  Novem-
ber 7th to 9th. In my testimony I do give the URL and other infor-
mation.

Chairman BAIRD. Terrific.
Mr. LAITNER. But thank you.
Chairman BAIRD. What is URL?
Mr. LAITNER. Uniform Resource Locator, the website.
Chairman BAIRD. Oh, I know that, but what is——
Mr. LAITNER. We are apparently not communicating.
Chairman  BAIRD.  I  know  what  URL  means.  I  mean,  what  is  the

URL for the conference?

Mr.  LAITNER.  It  is  on  the  ACEEE  website.  If  you  go  to

www.aceee.org you will find it there.
Chairman BAIRD. That is all right.
Mr. LAITNER. Thank you.
Chairman BAIRD. That is pretty good. You appreciate the normal
ignorance  of  Members  of  Congress,  and  I  can’t  fault  you  for  that.
Let  me  thank  our  panelists  and  my  colleagues  for  a  very  inter-
esting  hearing,  all  of  those  who  helped  to  put  this  together.  With
that,  the  hearing  stands  adjourned,  and  I  thank  everyone  for  par-
ticipating.

[Whereupon, at 11:26 a.m., the Subcommittee was adjourned.]

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 21:06 Nov 23, 2007 Jkt 037984 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE07\092507\37984 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

